Part 3. Chapter 121 to Chapter 160.

 It was an unexpected name.
 Elise froze as if she had heard the most shocking news in
 the world.
 “Did the Duke of Vassenberg tell you this?”
 Of course, she couldn’t answer.
 Raymond continued, as if he had expected this.
“Fritz Schuvan’s name must have come up during the
 interrogation. There’s no way the Duke wouldn’t know what
 I’ve found out.”
 Her heart pounded with anxiety, and her chest felt tight.
 She felt nauseous, as if she was about to vomit.
 “The reason Fritz Schuvan hasn’t been caught yet is
 because the Duke is working behind the scenes.”
 Working behind the scenes.
 She had a sense of what he was going to say next. She
 didn’t want to hear it, but his explanation was relentless.
 “To set a trap and accuse the entire Count’s family of
 treason, including Fritz Schuvan.”
 As if delivering an ultimatum, Raymond decisively added.
 “Everyone related to the Schuvan family will be in danger.
 Including you and your mother.”
By now, Elise’s face had completely lost its colour.
 Her stomach churned like it was about to roll itself over. She
 pressed down on her chest, barely managing to hold back
 the urge to vomit.
 “That, that can’t be true.”
 She denied it. She had no choice. Though she hadn’t
 realised it, Cardale was her only salvation. Her sole source
 of kindness and warmth.
 “Why do you think the Duke has been restricting your
 outings?”
 But Raymond, someone who didn’t want her to have any
 hope, cut her off.
 “It was all to blind you. To keep you from noticing the truth
 and to deceive you until the bitter end.”
 “No, the Duke…”
He isn’t like that. Elise shook her head repeatedly, looking
 like she was about to burst into tears.
 “I guess there’s no choice.”
 Raymond sighed, as if pitying her for not understanding.
 “I didn’t want to tell you this much for fear you’d be
 scared…”
 Lowering his voice as if sharing a secret, he continued.
 “The Duke is a dangerous and cruel man.”
 His voice, like the whisper of a devil, penetrated Elise’s ears.
 “He is merciless, he sheds blood without tears. They say
 that in the war with Helmut, nothing survived where the
 Duke had passed.”
The calmness of the man’s voice as he recounted the
 horrific tale only added to the sense of dissonance.
 “It was a brutal massacre.”
 “Stop…”
 Elise shut her eyes tightly. It was too cruel of a story. But
 Raymond was indifferent.
 “They say those who stay by his side are one of two things
 to him.”
 “Please…”
 “Those who are useful or those who are valuable.”
 Eventually, tears fell from Elise’s eyes.
 “Please, I beg of you, stop. Please…”
She pleaded in agony, unable to listen to Raymond’s words
 any longer.
 Because deep down, she knew better than anyone else that
 she was just a trivial being who could be discarded at any
 time.
 “Elise.”
 Raymond reached out to her, but before his fingers could
 touch her delicate cheek, she turned her head away.
 His rejected hand hovered awkwardly in the air before
 retracting.
 “I-I’m sorry. I think I should go now…”
 Elise’s voice trembled, thin and soaked with tears.
 “You must be busy… Thank you for the information.”
Even as she struggled to manage her distress and sadness,
 Elise bowed politely.
 As she turned to leave, Raymond quickly stepped in front of
 her.
 “You need to leave the Duke’s residence and find safety
 immediately.”
 “I can’t… do that.”
 “You don’t understand how dangerous this situation is.”
 Raymond’s voice grew louder. When Elise looked up with her
 tear-streaked face, she saw Raymond looking angry.
 Could he genuinely be concerned for her?
 Maybe he was right, and it really was a dangerous situation.
 Perhaps the sharp edge of a blade was already at her throat,
 and she was truly unaware of it.
“But…”
 Even so, Elise wanted to believe.
 The occasional kindness Cardale had shown her, the warmth
 that lingered in the bedroom, the promises he whispered
 while stroking her cheek.
 Avoiding Raymond’s gaze, Elise spoke.
 “…I can’t be the one to betray the Duke.”
 The smile slowly disappeared from Raymond’s face. His
 expression turned cold as he looked down at the top of her
 head.
 Then, he smiled again, but it was a different kind of smile.
 “You know, don’t you. That a traitor’s only fate is death?”
 She flinched. The terrifying implication made Elise look back
 to Raymond.
“Women can save their lives by becoming slaves… but they
 end up living lives more miserable than death.”
 His voice was as soft and gentle as usual. Yet it sent a chill
 down her spine.
 Raymond’s green eyes, which once resembled fresh sprouts,
 now felt as chilling as those of a sly serpent.
 Unconsciously, she took a few steps back.
 “I will help you,” Raymond proposed in a gentle voice.
 “I will also save your mother. I have the power to do so.”
 “N-no, it’s okay…”
 “Is it that you don’t trust me? Ah, perhaps it’s because I’m a
 marquis and not a duke.”
Raymond chuckled softly. His tone was strangely mocking.
 “If that’s the case, how about this? I have the royal family
 behind me. There are people who would gladly help at my
 request.”
 His green eyes gleamed strangely, like a snake ready to
 strike its fleeing prey.
 “I can easily arrange for you and your mother to be spirited
 away.”
 “I-I really need to go…”
 Elise’s voice trembled miserably. Her steps backwards were
 shaky and unsteady.
 “Are you afraid of me?”
 Raymond looked genuinely sorrowful.
 “You don’t need to be. Haven’t I told you I’m on your side?”
He smiled brightly, but Elise couldn’t find any trace of the
 Raymond Hartman she once knew in his face.
 “Perhaps I pushed you too hard. You need time to prepare
 yourself.”
 He spread his arms wide, as if to reassure her, just as her
 back hit the wall.
 “Don’t worry. When you need my help…”
 Elise turned and pushed against the wall with all her
 strength.
 Swish—the wall split into a square, revealing a hidden door.
 “…we will surely meet again.”
 The door closed behind her with a snap, cutting off
 Raymond’s words.
“Ugh…”
 Elise covered her mouth with her hand to stifle the rising
 nausea. Her stomach churned, threatening to expel itself.
 “Haa, haa…”
 Only after taking several deep breaths did the feeling finally
 subside. As Elise composed herself and stood upright, she
 noticed the ladies seated at the table.
 “Did you enjoy your tour of the garden?”
 The friendly face that asked her wore the same smile as
 before. However, Elise could no longer smile back at them.
 “Oh my, it’s already this late.”
 The woman who had shown the note rose from her seat,
 prompting the others to follow suit.
 “It was truly a delightful time.”
“I hope we can meet again.”
 Their deliberately loud voices were clearly intended for
 those outside to hear.
 “See you next time.”
 The door opened, and the ladies filed out. Elise was the last
 to leave and had a pale face. Michael, who had been waiting
 for her at the door, asked,
 “Lady, is something wrong? You don’t look well.”
 “No, I’m just a bit tired.”
 She forced a smile, swallowing her anxiety and fear. Michael
 looked at her with concern but didn’t press further.
 “I’ll escort you to the carriage.”
“Thank you.”
 Once in the carriage, Elise closed her eyes tightly. Her hands
 clasped on her lap trembled.
 Regret washed over her like a tide; she shouldn’t have come
 out. But spilled water cannot be gathered again.
 ‘Duke…’
 He was said to be a ruthless and cruel man, using people
 and discarding them when they were no longer useful.
 She was also threatened that she would eventually be
 brutally killed.
 Yet strangely enough, inexplicably so.
 At this moment, Elise missed Cardale terribly.

 The sun had just set.
 News arrived at Count Schuvan’s estate that Marissa had
 vanished without a trace.
 Gerhard lost his temper and raged. The items on his desk
 that were caught in his grip, crashed onto the office floor
 and loudly shattered.
 All the employees of the Schuvan household held their
 breath in the face of their master’s fury.
It had been the first time Gerhard had lost control of his
 emotions like this since the day Marissa had run away with
 his daughter, Elise.
 The Count was not to be disturbed in such a state. Those
 who had worked in this mansion for a long time vividly
 remembered how the healthy Countess had mysteriously
 died not long after that day.
 “Find her immediately.”
 Gerhard caught his breath, leaning on the desk with both
 hands, and spoke.
 “She couldn’t have gone far alone.”
 “Yes, my Lord.”
 The messenger who had brought the news, quickly bowed
 and hurried out.
Gerhard watched the messenger hastily ride off into the
 darkness through his office window and muttered to himself.
 “…Marissa has run away?”
 There had always been attempts to escape. That audacious
 woman was always looking for a chance to get away from
 him.
 The woman who once smiled so beautifully had lost her
 shine after losing her first child. She dared to try to distance
 herself from him.
 So Gerhard made sure she carried another child in her
 womb. To tighten the leash on her.
 Marissa, now weakened by a difficult childbirth, could not
 think of leaving him as she had intended.
 Then, the moment he felt somewhat reassured, she escaped
 with that leash still on her. This time, into a filthy, squalid
 slum.
So this time, he was not careless. He hid her thoroughly and
 monitored her meticulously.
 “A sickly woman managed to break through that
 surveillance?”
 No one had noticed her gone until she had already escaped
 the villa. How could that be?
 Marissa had made countless attempts to escape over the
 years, all of which had failed. And every method she tried
 had been blocked thereafter.
 Gerhard’s suspicions soon led him to think someone had
 helped her escape.
 “Was it Fritz?”
 No, Fritz wasn’t that meticulous. If he had the brains to
 devise such a scheme, he wouldn’t have needed to consider
 replacing the heir.
 But who else would search for Marissa? Only Elise might.
“Elise.”
 Then, a certain hypothesis flashed through Gerhard’s mind.
 “…Could it be the Duke?”
 His intuition was almost a certainty. As anger surged again,
 he slammed his fist into his desk. The impact was so strong
 it felt like his hand might shatter, but he didn’t feel any
 pain.
 “Cardale Vassenberg.”
 Just as a man who had lost his only toy clenched his fists
 and glared with bloodshot eyes.
 “Count, it’s Vanessa.”
 Gerhard’s movements abruptly halted. He only rolled his
 eyes to look at the door where the voice came from.
 Outside, it was as if someone was trying to peer through it.
“What is it?”
 “The Duke of Vassenberg has come to visit.”
 
 Gerhard was silent for a moment. How should he interpret
 this situation where the plunderer has visited his home
 willingly?
 “What should we do?”
 Only after hearing the repeated question did he finally
 speak.
 “Show him to the parlour.”

Cardale entered the Count’s parlour. As he seated himself
 with graceful yet unembellished movements, a teacup was
 placed on the table.
 However, he merely glanced at it. Though it wouldn’t likely
 harm him, he was not foolish enough to touch something
 unverified.
 “What brings you here without notice?”
 Cardale chuckled at the blunt question.
 It seemed Gerhard was quite agitated. He was unusually
 sharp, openly displaying his discomfort.
 “You know the reason. I’ve actually saved you some
 trouble.”
 His casual tone of superiority made a flicker of humiliation
 pass over Gerhard’s face.
 “Your Excellency, please…”
“I’m here to propose a rather nice deal to you.”
 Instead of listening to Gerhard’s insignificant protest,
 Cardale tossed a sealed document onto the table.
 Unnecessary conversation was pointless. Once he saw the
 document, he would understand.
 Gerhard, unable to hide his displeasure, picked up the folder
 and removed the contents. He intended to grasp the Duke’s
 intentions.
 And shortly after…
 
 His eyes widened in shock. His blood ran cold. His lips
 trembled, and the paper in his hand quivered.
 He couldn’t believe it. He checked several times, but the
 content remained unchanged.
Fritz Schuvan.
 It detailed his son’s treasonous actions meticulously.
 Gerhard clenched the paper and spat out his words like
 venom.
 “I don’t appreciate such slander.”
 “Do you think it’s slander?”
 The Duke asked with a leisurely smile, and in that moment,
 Gerhard knew. This was all true. Or, the Duke had already
 fabricated it perfectly to seem so.
 Moreover, he knew it was closer to the former rather than
 the latter. Fritz was indeed capable of committing such acts.
 No matter how foolish and greedy he was, how could he do
 something like this?
Treason was a grave crime that could wipe out the entire
 family. It wasn’t something that could be swept under the
 rug.
 Gerhard looked at Cardale. The man before him remained
 composed.
 “What do you want?”
 “Whether this ends with Fritz Schuvan, or the entire
 Schuvan family taking responsibility.”
 Cardale spoke calmly.
 “It’s all up to you, Count.”
 “Is the price for this Marissa?”
 “I have no idea what you mean.”
 The Duke’s nonchalant answer made Gerhard clench his
 teeth.
This was a negotiation. In negotiations, the ones who lost
 their temper and revealed their true intentions lost. Even if
 all his cards were laid out, he had to pretend otherwise.
 “…Very well.”
 Gerhard straightened his back, making his move.
 “Since you’re covering it up, why not make it as if it never
 happened?”
 “You’re quite greedy.”
 The Duke smirked.
 “And shameless, too.”
 “Losing my only heir is no different from the downfall of my
 family.”
“Well.”
 The Duke tilted his head, seeming amused.
 “As per Imperial law, even an illegitimate child is granted
 rights if acknowledged by the head of the family.”
 Gerhard flinched. He tried to hide his discomfort, clenching
 his pants under the table.
 However, the Duke’s next low words left Gerhard stunned.
 “His name is Damian, isn’t it?”
 
 Gerhard was rarely caught off guard. This was a secret kept
 even from Vanessa, Marissa, and the boy himself.
 “How did you…?”
“He seems more capable than Fritz Schuvan. He even
 inherited your silver hair.”
 Cardale leaned back, resting his elbows on the armrests and
 interlocking his fingers.
 “If your legitimate son becomes the new heir of the Schuvan
 family, your mistress might visit here more often, don’t you
 think?”
 His words were enough to wound Gerhard’s pride. However,
 he couldn’t deny the allure of the Duke’s proposition.
 “If the Count makes a wise decision, Vassenberg will support
 Damian Schuvan’s succession.”
 It implied that even if Fritz were implicated in treason, the
 Schuvan family would remain unscathed.
 The Duke’s deliberate use of Damian’s surname was clearly
 intentional.
 Gerhard’s eyes darkened.
‘I’ve devoted my life to the Schuvan name.’
 It was a family he had built with his entire life. Rather than
 allowing the Schuvan family to be dishonourably annihilated
 due to a worthless son, it would be better for Damian to
 inherit the title, even if he was illegitimate.
 ‘Especially with the Duke’s backing.’
 He even thought it might be for the best. Fritz, with his
 debauchery and stupidity, was more of a liability than an
 asset. Technically, his firstborn son was Damian, after all.
 Having rationalised his decision, Gerhard lifted his head.
 Even if he couldn’t fully trust Cardale Vassenberg, there
 were no other options.
 “The hunting festival is soon.”
 The Duke smoothly transitioned to the next topic, as if he
 had anticipated Gerhard’s agreement.
“In hunting, all sorts of accidents can happen.”
 Gerhard inhaled sharply.
 He wasn’t so naive as to miss the implication of the Duke’s
 words.
 Cardale’s red eyes gleamed with a vivid, bloody hue. Urged
 by that gaze, Gerhard finally managed to speak.
 “…Understood.”
 “Good.”
 Having finished his business, the Duke stood up without
 hesitation.
 “I’ll see you both at the hunting festival.”
One would be the traitorous father who sold his son, and the
 other would be the sacrificial pawn of this deal.
 But as the man walked out of the Count’s estate, his face
 remained composed and elegant.

 After Cardale left, Gerhard leaned back and caught his
 breath.
 He had exhausted all his energy from displaying his intense
 anger and by confronting the Duke. However, his eyes
 remained sharp and focused.
 Vanessa, who had been waiting outside, entered the parlour
 and handed him a glass of cold water.
 “Did the conversation go well?”
Instead of answering, Gerhard responded with a sharp
 question.
 “Where is Fritz right now?”
 Having overheard the conversation from outside, Vanessa
 calmly replied.
 “As you know, he hasn’t been back to the estate for several
 days.”
 “damn it.”
 He had to find Fritz and bring him to the hunting festival
 somehow. Gerhard gripped the armrests tightly, tapping the
 edge anxiously with his index finger.
 “Contact the textile factory immediately.”
 “The textile factory… Count?”
“Yes. Bring the one named Damian from there.”
 “Understood.”
 Vanessa bowed her head, hiding her expression, as her eyes
 gleamed sharply.
 The Duke had taken Marisa and was pushing Damian as the
 heir to the Schuvan family.
 ‘I’ve aligned myself with the right side.’
 A satisfied smile appeared on Vanessa’s lips.
 She had chosen Damian over Gerhard, calculating that this
 way, she could secure the title more quickly.
 The Count would never relinquish his position until his
 death, but Damian would become the Count in a few years
 at most.
 ‘Because I plan to make it so.’
Her eyes, just as greedy as Gerhard’s and Fritz’s, gleamed
 with a cold light before it disappeared.
 
 As Cardale left the Schuvan estate, Michael knelt on one
 knee before him.
 The news of the Duke’s arrival in the capital had been
 secretly conveyed only to the remaining elite members.
 Michael was one of them.
 Cardale brushed past Michael and asked, “Elise?”
 The succinct question carried multiple implications. Rising to
 his feet, Michael took a silent, deep breath. Though he had
 braced himself, delivering an unvarnished report required
 courage. He took a breath and relayed the situation in order.
 He reported that Elise’s food intake had decreased slightly,
 she had trouble sleeping and seemed anxious.
Cardale’s eyes slowly darkened. Sensing his master’s
 displeasure, Michael’s body tensed with anxiety.
 He clenched his hands tightly to remain standing in front of
 the man, who was now exuding a menacing aura.
 “What is the reason?” Cardale asked in a cold tone.
 Sweat trickled down Michael’s back. He swallowed dryly
 before responding.
 “We spotted someone presumed to be Fritz Schuvan at
 Rottenbaum Park.”
 “Fritz Schuvan,” Cardale chuckled.
 It was predictable. With Helmut’s informants’ base
 compromised, Fritz was likely trying to find a way out
 through Elise.
 Cardale had deliberately left Fritz Schuvan alone to avoid
 raising Gerhard’s suspicion before securing Marisa.
Instead, for safety, he had assigned Michael to Elise’s side.
 Yet, he received such an absurd report.
 “Has the maggot dared approach what’s mine?”
 “I apologise.”
 Michael bowed deeply and confessed the truth.
 “The lady hasn’t spoken, so it’s not certain, but the
 circumstances suggest so.”
 “You have disobeyed orders.”
 The voice, chillingly cold, sent shivers down Michael’s spine.
 As Elise’s guard, he had failed in his duty to keep a constant
 watch over her.
 “I will accept any punishment.”
Cardale, who had been glaring coldly at Michael, averted his
 gaze. There were still matters to conclude tonight.
 “I will hold you accountable after we finish this task.”
 “Yes, Your Grace.”
 Cardale lightly leapt onto his horse, but his grip on the reins
 was harsh.
 The black horse neighed roughly.
 Staring into the darkness, Cardale commanded his
 subordinates behind him.
 “Find Fritz Schuvan and drive him into the snake’s den.”
 “At your command.”
 Once Fritz was driven back to the Count’s estate, Gerhard
 Schuvan would take care of the rest, holding him until he
 could be thrown onto the stage Cardale had set.
“To the Imperial Palace.”
 With a kick, Cardale’s horse surged forward, quickly gaining
 speed. His shadows followed closely behind.
 
 “Duke, do you know what time it is? Dawn has just broken!”
 “Does the time of reporting matter when it’s an urgent
 matter?”
 Emperor Johann frowned but could not refute the Duke’s
 words. After all, he himself had urged Cardale, insisting on
 the urgency of the matter.
 Although, thanks to Theresia’s foolish mistake, it had all
 become a futile effort.
 With a sigh of resignation, Johann asked.
“So, how far has the investigation progressed?”
 “It’s finished.”
 “What?”
 His eyes widened as he straightened in his seat.
 “The traitors have already been identified?”
 Johann’s eyes grew even larger as he received the
 documents from his attendant. Skimming the list on the
 front, he looked at Cardale in disbelief.
 “Are these truly the ones who collaborated with the
 enemy?”
 “I’ve attached the evidence supporting their guilt on the
 following pages.”
 As Johann flipped through the pages, his expression shifted
 from shock to dismay, and then to anger.
Those involved in smuggling weapons to Helmut, those who
 provided Nodrat with intelligence, and those who supported
 with money and supplies.
 “How could they deceive me so completely?” he exclaimed,
 teeth clenched in fury.
 Cardale spoke with an impassive expression. “We need a
 trap to catch them all at once.”
 Dragging it out would only give them a chance to escape.
 The net had to be drawn while they still believed they were
 safe.
 Johann, seething with rage, looked at Cardale and asked,
 “Do you have a plan?”
 “Use the hunting festival.”
 Most of the Nordrat nobles would attend, and it was an
 event where numerous soldiers were mobilised
 simultaneously. There was no better opportunity.
“…Let it be so.”
 The Emperor nodded, looking down at the list again. His
 hand holding the paper trembled with suppressed rage.
 After concluding his audience with the Emperor and
 stepping outside, Cardale sneered coldly.
 “Too early to be shocked.”
 In truth, the list he had handed to the Emperor was missing
 two names. One was Fritz Schuvan, and the other…
 A bargaining chip.
 Sometime soon, perhaps, it would prove to be quite useful.
 Cardale’s lips tightened slightly. Everything was unfolding as
 he had planned, each piece fitting perfectly together like
 gears. He couldn’t be more satisfied.
Now, all that remained was to embrace the woman who had
 been waiting for his return.
 Thinking of Elise, Cardale absentmindedly touched the tie
 around his neck. A round, bejewelled brooch rested in his
 hand.
 A gift carefully chosen by his woman.
 It had undoubtedly pleased him greatly.
 Cardale decided to change his mind about returning home
 straight away.
 Even a small piece of jewellery for the woman who had
 waited patiently for him would suffice. It was a common
 enough practice to pick up a gift after being away for so
 long.
 Of course, the naive girl would probably be overjoyed just to
 see him bring her something, even if it was only a visit to
 meet his mother. Yet somehow, that thought didn’t excite
 him much.
The sky was gradually brightening. He noticed the busy
 maids hurrying about.
 He felt eyes glancing at him from time to time, but the Duke
 casually brushed past them.
 Perhaps it was too early in the morning, or perhaps it was
 because the Emperor was keeping a close watch, but there
 was no sign of the princess.
 That was fortunate for Theresia. It was obvious what her
 appearance would bring, and Cardale had made sure she
 would pay for ruining his mood, one way or another.
 “…Did you hear about the Countess?”
 “Of course! One of my friends works at that mansion. It’s
 been a total uproar.”
 Small talk could be heard here and there. Cardale paid it no
 mind. His unusually acute senses sometimes caught even
 unwanted things.
Voices, seemingly cautious not to be overheard, grew
 quieter and more secretive.
 “Stabbed her sleeping husband with a needle laced with
 poison?”
 “Yes. If the doctor hadn’t seen the puncture mark on his
 wrist, no one would have suspected a thing, and they would
 have proceeded with the funeral.”
 “Ugh, gives me chills.”
 “She was secretly seeing another man. Probably planned to
 live with him once her husband’s estate became hers.”
 It was a typical scandalous affair. Despite the outward
 appearance of dignity and elegance, such incidents were
 not uncommon in the debaucherous and chaotic social
 circles of the Empire.
 “Well, the Count had a bad reputation among most women
 anyway…”
The faint voice suggesting the son’s inheritance might spare
 her from execution was the last thing he heard.
 As always, Cardale casually brushed off the messy rumours
 and proceeded from the palace.
 He needed to hurry and pick a gift that would please his
 woman.

The knight hurriedly walked down the hallway.
 Despite the early hour, the Princess was awake. A faint
 smile appeared on Theresia’s lips as she heard the
 whispered message from her guard.
 “Well done, Dietrich. You may leave.”
 “Yes, Your Highness.”
With the knight bowing his head and now standing guard
 outside the door, the Princess turned her gaze towards the
 window. There stood a man with an expressionless face, like
 a statue – Raymond Hartmann.
 “It seems the Duke has received quite an interesting
 rumour,” she remarked with a playful smile.
 “Are my maidservants proving to be quite useful?”
 There was no immediate reply, but Theresia wasn’t
 particularly concerned. Leaning slightly forward from her
 seated position on the couch, she continued.
 “They have put in quite the effort to take Elise Schuvan to
 the post-banquet with the Duke.”
 At the proposal of providing an opportunity to the Crown
 Prince and a tea time, three were reluctant to participate in
 the ruse.
 “She seems deeply infatuated with the Duke already.”
Knowing it was a low blow, Theresia deliberately chose this
 approach.
 “People often say that when something disappears from
 sight, it also disappears from the heart. It’s not surprising
 that feelings can grow in the daily closeness they share.”
 To her expectation, anger flickered across Raymond’s once
 impassive and dry face. The knuckles of his clenched fist
 turned pale.
 Internally amused by confirming her prediction with her own
 eyes, Theresia comforted the man who was accumulating
 unwarranted anger.
 “Don’t worry too much. Spending time with the Little
 Marquis might revive her old feelings soon enough. After all,
 Elise Schuvan seemed to quite enjoy your affection.”
 
 “If necessary, maybe this time you should start by building
 a connection from the body.”
The Princess’s words dug into the ears of the man who had
 lost his fiancée, like a devil’s sweet whisper. His eyes
 darkened.
 “If that’s the only option left for me, then I should willingly
 choose it.”
 Raymond’s voice, now fractured with an undertone of
 bitterness, flowed out.
 “Even if it becomes an irreversible sin.”
 His gaze turned deep and bottomless, like being sucked into
 an abyss where the floor couldn’t be seen.
 His green eyes that once boasted a spring-like hue had long
 lost their beautiful glint.
 
 After Elise narrowly survived the poisoning, Marissa and
 Elise had to live in the main house instead of the annexe.
 Thanks to this, incidents of poison in their food disappeared.
They could also receive treatment from the resident doctor
 whenever they needed.
 However, they had to pay a different price.
 The two women never had a peaceful day. When they were
 in the annexe, they could live freely as long as they didn’t
 cross the fence. Now, even leaving their rooms was
 scrutinised.
 Whenever Marissa caught the attention of the Countess, the
 entire mansion would flip upside down.
 “Get these retches out of my sight! Clear them away so I
 don’t have to see them!”
 “You were the one who brought them to the main house,
 were you not?”
 Gerhard even had the audacity to summon his mistress into
 the bedroom, and the Countess showed no remorse in her
 anger.
“If you hadn’t done that in the first place, we wouldn’t have
 to see them like this.”
 Due to her husband’s boldness and lack of guilt, the
 hysterical Countess became more cruel and vicious.
 And always, it was Marissa and Elise who bore the brunt of
 that anger and fury.
 “This filthy, disgusting thing…!”
 Whenever the Countess barged into the room where the two
 women lived, the few belongings inside were destroyed and
 shattered.
 Sharp, loud noises echoed as if to shatter eardrums.
 “Just die already! Why do you insist on living to torment me!
 What exactly are you doing to make me so miserable!”
 Elise was still young, but she knew that the high master,
 who had tried to kill her and her mother, was not afraid of
 fear and anger.
So whenever the Countess visited, she could not even cry
 properly from fear and horror.
 “Elise, are you okay? Come here.”
 At those times, her mother would hold her close, covering
 her small ears to shield her. But she couldn’t hide her
 trembling.
 They survived the crime, but they now had to endure that
 wickedness.
 And for Elise, there was someone even more frightening
 than the Countess.
 “Fr-Fri-Fritz…”
 “Who dared to meddle with the Schuvan estate.”
 “Ahh!”
Thrown to the ground, Elise writhed in agony, unable to
 scream properly.
 It was her mother’s birthday. She had only gone to pick a
 few flowers.
 Intentionally leaving the room during Fritz’s tutoring session,
 but it wasn’t enough to avoid the targeted malice.
 “A bad dog needs to be beaten.”
 Laughter mixed with a mocking voice. The disdainful gaze
 felt piercing, causing Elise to tremble uncontrollably.
 Her neatly arranged flowers had long been trampled on the
 ground, beyond recognition.
 Thud, thud, thud!
 The one-sided beating followed.
Battered and unable to open her eyes, Elise clasped her
 hands together desperately.
 “I’m sorry, I’m sorry. Please forgive me…”
 Through cracked lips, her pleading words poured out.
 After venting his frustration after his scolding from his
 governess, Fritz finally stopped kicking her and caught his
 breath.
 “Heh, that’s better. There’s nothing like this for relieving
 stress against a punching bag.”
 The boy’s shoe-tip poked Elise’s cheek as she lay on the
 f
 loor.
 “Hey, if you go around babbling any nonsense, you know
 what will happen? If Father hears even a peep…”
 “Ah, I won’t tell anyone, I promise,” Elise replied quickly. Not
 answering a question promptly meant more punishment.
“If you dare to speak out of turn, your mother might end up
 like this, too. Understand?”
 Elise nodded vigorously with a pale, nauseated face,
 completely believing Fritz could really do that. Satisfied that
 his threat got the desired response in the end, Fritz turned
 away.
 “Well, it doesn’t matter anyways, she’ll be discarded soon
 enough.”
 Spitting on the ground, Fritz left.
 Elise struggled to get up for a while. Her whole body was
 sore and hurting. But the pain in her heart was even worse.
 “She’ll be discarded soon enough…”
 It felt like sharp needles were stabbing her heart. Blood
 trickled from her wounds. Her eyes felt hot, and her cheeks
 were damp.
 “Miss…!”
Gasping, Elise woke up abruptly at the sound of someone
 calling her. Linda was looking down at her.
 “I woke you because it seemed like you were having a
 nightmare. You were crying… Are you alright?”
 Her gaze was gentle and cautious. Elise touched her cheek
 with her hand. It felt damp, possibly from crying in her
 sleep. She felt her back, damp with cold sweat.
 As Linda gently wiped her face with a clean, soft
 handkerchief, Elise kept her head bowed and couldn’t bring
 herself to look at her.
 She felt ashamed and ugly.
 What if she had been sleep-talking? What if she had
 revealed her pitiful and miserable past?
 “Miss.”
At that moment, Linda knelt down to her level, and met
 Elise’s eyes.
 “Is there something troubling you?”
 “Me…?”
 Elise was startled, feeling exposed. Linda gently wrapped
 her hands around Elise’s, reassuring her.
 “You haven’t been sleeping well lately, hardly eating. I’m
 worried about you.”
 With a tender touch, Linda stroked Elise’s hand and said
 kindly,
 “If there’s anything I can help you with? I want to help.”

 To Elise, it sounded incredibly comforting.
 Due to being tamed by Cardale, she had been suffering from
 intense loneliness and fear during the past few days he had
 been absent. Whenever she became too distressed, she felt
 an urge to confide in someone, anyone, about her worries
 and anxieties.
 Like now.
‘Would I feel better if I confessed everything to Linda
 honestly?’
 She kept wavering. Her small lips trembled as if about to
 speak.
 No.
 Elise gathered her strength. Her weakened heart, affected
 by nightmares, constantly sought a place to lean on.
 “I’m sorry for worrying you. It’s just… not seeing the Duke
 for a few days…”
 She hesitated, stumbling over her excuse. It wasn’t a lie.
 She hadn’t realised how much she relied on his presence
 until now. Experiencing such unbearable anguish in his
 absence.
 If the person who had just asked hadn’t been Linda but
 Cardale instead, Elise would have spilt everything.
 “In that case, is there anything I can do for you, Miss?”
Linda’s question sounded a bit different. Elise was about to
 say there was nothing, when Fritz’s words came unbidden to
 her mind.
 “Just bring me money. Then I’ll secretly let you and your
 mother leave.”
 “If you say a word to the Duke, your mother will perish that
 day. Be careful what you say.”
 Fritz had nothing good to offer her. But at least his threats
 against her mother were genuine. He had wanted to crush
 her and bring her life to ruin.
 Moreover, if Raymond’s words were true, the traitor Fritz
 had nothing left to lose now.
 He commits ruthless acts without batting an eye in normal
 circumstances, she didn’t even want to imagine how horrific
 his actions could be if he were to lose his sanity.
 But even so, Elise couldn’t betray Cardale. That was why
 Elise had endured, unable to do much else.
Then, suddenly, a thought came to mind.
 ‘If I just give Fritz the money he wants… would everything
 be okay?’
 All Fritz needed was money for his escape. After that, he
 could evade arrest and flee the Empire, so naturally, Mother
 would be safe.
 And if by some chance Fritz really did bring Mother along…
 ‘Then, instead of fleeing with Mother, I could ask the Duke
 for help.’
 A way to protect Mother without betraying him. That was
 Elise’s best idea.
 ‘But how do I get the money…?’
 The small amount she had saved was spent on Cardale’s
 gifts, and now there wasn’t a single penny left.
‘Where could I get money…?’
 ‘Why not sell the jewels your mother wears in layers!’
 Elise glanced at the open dressing room. It was filled with
 expensive things.
 She had never thought of those luxurious clothes and
 accessories as hers. She thought of them as something to
 wear for Cardale’s happiness.
 Even so, it’s embarrassing how urgent the situation has
 become. But there weren’t many ways to make money in
 her situation, and there were even fewer options to choose
 from.
 “Linda, um, do you have…”
 “Yes, please tell me. Miss.”
 Elise hesitated to speak for a long time. Linda patiently
 waited for her.
After much hesitation, Elise finally opened her mouth.
 “Are there any items here that I can use?”
 “Everything received from the master belongs to you.”
 “So, um…”
 She bowed her head and tightly closed her eyes. It took
 courage to spit out such a reckless proposal.
 “Could I perhaps leave some items at the pawnshop… and
 borrow money? I’ll work to earn and repay it each time…”
 Finally finishing her words, she raised her head, seeing
 Linda’s eyes widen slightly.
 Elise faced Linda’s mixed expression of puzzlement and
 surprise, feeling a deep dislike for herself. She even found
 herself repulsive and pathetic.
“…Please keep this a secret from the Duke.”
 If she were smarter and more clever, she might have found
 a better way, or at least packaged her words more
 elegantly.
 “Do you need money?”
 Elise nodded her head. The concern evident on Linda’s face
 intensified her guilt.
 “You might consider asking the master instead-“
 “N-No, that won’t do!”
 Startled, Elise blurted out abruptly.
 “Miss?”
 “Oh, I, I…”
Elise stumbled over her words, surprised by her own
 actions.
 How strange would she appear? How shameless did she
 think herself?
 Her mind swirled with thoughts of no other way and foolish
 actions.
 “The Duke wouldn’t like it. If he knew I used gifts as
 collateral, I’d definitely repay it, so please… keep this a
 secret. Please.”
 Elise was trembling now. She did not know what she was
 saying.
 The hands placed on her knees clenched the dress so tightly
 that creases formed.
 It was then that warm hands covered her hands, pale white.
 “Don’t worry, miss. I’ll arrange the money for you.”
Elise’s eyes widened at Linda’s response.
 “R-Really?”
 “Yes. It’s not that difficult.”
 Elise’s tense body slowly relaxed at Linda’s affectionate and
 kind voice.
 “You should rest a bit for now. A breath and some sleep will
 make you feel better.”
 “But I can’t sleep well…”
 “I’ll bring you some herbal tea to help with sleep. The
 master will be back soon, and it’s best to greet him with a
 smile.”
 Elise’s expression brightened slightly knowing that Cardale
 would be returning soon.
After drinking the tea Linda had brought her, Elise lay neatly
 on the bed. Linda carefully pulled the thin blanket up to
 cover her neck.
 Whether it was the effect of the tea or not. Elise’s delayed
 sleep, which had been awful for several days, poured out all
 at once.
 “Thank you…”
 Just before her eyes closed, Elise sincerely expressed her
 gratitude.
 With Linda nodding gently in response, accompanied by a
 faint smile, Elise drifted into a deep slumber.
 
 Duke Vassenberg had returned.
 His return was earlier than expected. However, the
 household staff had received advance notice, and greeted
 the Duke with perfect preparations.
Accompanied by his aide Michael, and other attendants,
 they dismounted from their horses together.
 “You have returned, my lord.”
 Cardale brushed off the steward’s greeting, instead
 scanning the surroundings, searching for someone.
 However, the face he wished to see did not appear before
 him.
 “Where is Elise?”
 At the Duke’s inquiry, Norman turned slightly to the side.
 Linda, who stood behind him, spoke cautiously.
 “She fell asleep after drinking a sleep-inducing tea.”
 One of Cardale’s eyebrows twitched. He had already
 received reports from Michael that Elise was not in good
 health.
She was already a frail woman, and he had instructed her to
 take meticulous care of her health.
 “I’ve heard all the whispered rumours.”
 Not concealing his discomfort, Cardale headed towards
 Elise’s bedroom.
 The room was darkened meticulously with tightly drawn
 curtains.
 “Wait outside.”
 “Yes, my lord.”
 He stopped Linda as she was about to light a candle, and
 entered the bedroom alone.
 A small figure was lying in the middle of the bed. Faint
 breathing could be heard. Without even realising he was
 suppressing his footsteps, Cardale approached the bed.

 He silently gazed down at the woman who was sound
 asleep.
 Her face, now paler, seemed even more slender than when
 he had last seen her. Seeing her sunken cheeks, it seemed
 the reports about her not eating properly were indeed true.
 Though she had been meticulously cared for to look
 presentable, seeing her emaciated state after just a few
 days made him feel disheartened.
 But on the other hand, she had been eagerly awaiting the
 return of her master and had been anxiously sleepless the
 whole time.
 “How long has it been since you’ve been in this rough of a
 state?”
 Despite his reproachful words, his voice was gentle. Cardale
 reached out, his slender index finger tracing down the
 woman’s cheek.
“It’s always bothersome to see you like this.”
 Perhaps he didn’t realise he was sulking in his own way
 about leaving her alone.
 There was no choice but to take her with him from now on.
 He chuckled bitterly at his own foolish thoughts.
 “Duke…”
 Had he awakened her? For a moment, a sense of
 embarrassment crept over Cardale’s face.
 However, as he quickly examined Elise, who still had her
 eyes closed, her breathing was just as irregular as before.
 After staring at her for a long moment without blinking, he
 realised she was sleep-talking. He relaxed a bit.
 “Hah…”
He sighed in disbelief, running a hand through his hair. He
 had done all sorts of ridiculous things. Strangely, this
 unfamiliar act didn’t feel unpleasant.
 When would the sleeping deer wake up and come to the
 pond?
 Thinking about the small box in his pocket, Cardale turned
 his body.
 He wanted to see her face light up with pure joy at his news,
 her vivid blue eyes wide open when she opened the box.
 However, he gladly decided to exercise patience for his
 woman.
 It was when Cardale was about to leave the bedroom,
 feeling much better.
 “My lord.”
 Linda bowed politely. Beside her, Norman stood with a grave
 expression.
“We have something important to inform you of.

 The study of the Duke fell into a chilly silence.
 Cardale stared down at the note on the desk, his face
 devoid of emotion, making it impossible to discern his
 feelings.
 Norman and Linda grew even more tense at their master’s
 unresponsive demeanour. They knew well that when the
 Duke maintained such emotionless composure, it meant he
 was in a heightened state of anger.
 The Duke was strict even in the face of mistakes, but that
 was preferable. At least there was some hope for leniency.
 However, deception was an unforgivable offence in the
 Duke’s eyes. Anyone who dared to cross that line had
 always paid a dreadful price without exception.
The fact that his lord’s beloved was secretly exchanging
 messages with another man, especially her former fiancé,
 was one issue. Additionally, attempting to obtain money
 from unknown sources in secret only added to the gravity of
 the situation.
 Just these two facts alone foreshadowed an immense storm
 that would undoubtedly sweep through the Duke’s
 household.
 
 What could their lord be thinking at this moment?
 Though it was presumptuous to speculate, both loyal
 servants shared the same concern simultaneously.
 Even though it was their unavoidable duty to report on such
 unusual circumstances, they couldn’t help but feel
 sympathy for the delicate and gentle lady.
 They were also convinced that there must have been
 unavoidable reasons behind her actions.
But bringing that up was a different matter altogether.
 “Your Grace, you summoned me.”
 Michael, having received the summons and entered,
 paused. He sensed the atmosphere immediately. Norman
 gestured towards the note on the desk.
 With a dry swallow, Michael walked over to the desk and
 examined the note.
 “Themberd at 182 Avenue.”
 “With love, Raymond Hartman.”
 As soon as he confirmed these two sentences, Michael
 realised he had fallen into a trap.
 It had been suspicious from the beginning. No matter how
 much the Duke was admired, the realm of society didn’t
 warmly welcome connections with the mistress.
Yet those young nobles had approached Elise Schuvan
 without any hesitation, engaging her in conversation and
 requesting to spend time together.
 Michael distinctly perceived that strange disconnect.
 However, seeing Elise Schuvan visibly delighted upon
 meeting a new conversational partner, he suppressed his
 suspicions.
 Ultimately, his foolish choices led to the current situation.
 Michael, overwhelmed with responsibility, stiffly managed to
 move his body and knelt down on one knee.
 “Have you ever taken Elise to this place?”
 “Yes, I have.”
 With his answer, Michael tightly closed his eyes. He couldn’t
 even begin to gauge how to rectify this mistake.
 Therefore, unable to bring himself to confess, he simply
 bowed his head.
In the stern atmosphere that had settled, the Duke’s cold
 command rang out.
 “Report everything that happened while I was absent, down
 to the smallest detail.”
 
 Certainly, moments ago, Cardale had been quite content.
 No, he had been satisfied in every way. Just seeing the
 woman’s sleeping face made his tongue tingle with
 sweetness.
 To exaggerate slightly, he had even felt a bit excited. His
 heart raced so unexpectedly that it brought forth unfamiliar
 emotions and a sense of fulfilment.
 But as if to mock him, a note from Raymond Hartmann was
 thrust before his eyes.
 It was proof of his woman’s betrayal.
The innocent doe who had enjoyed unparalleled comfort
 within his fences, finding solace only within his embrace,
 had now been sneaking out through a hole in his fence. As if
 anticipating the moment to flee.
 Only belatedly did Cardale realise how lax he had been.
 While it was the instinct of prey to always be ready to flee
 whenever a hunter momentarily lost focus, he had thought
 it wouldn’t apply to what was his.
 Looking back, there were signs. Even the note was evidence
 of that. The moment he saw the note written by Raymond
 Hartmann’s hand, the day Elise had burned her fingers on
 the candle flashed like lightning in his mind.
 “I made a mistake, Your Grace. Please don’t blame Linda.”
 The faint smell of ash that had lingered in the room, the
 trace of fine dust remaining on the desk—all undoubtedly
 the aftermath of something being burnt.
 But unwilling to see the woman cower in pain, huddled and
 unable to show any sign of distress, he chose not to press
his trivial suspicions.
 However, as he considered burning the letter from Raymond
 Hartmann, he pondered if he, still lingering with regret, had
 successfully baited his woman with a lure around her.
 As he gripped the desk with increasing force, another point
 crossed his mind.
 “On the day Lady bought Your Grace a gift, she briefly
 crossed paths with Raymond Hartmann’s assistant.”
 Cardale grabbed the pin that had secured the cravat and
 pulled it out as if tearing it away. Elise had carefully handed
 it over as a birthday present.
 In the memory, the woman had shyly smiled.
 Cardale glanced down momentarily at the cravat pin
 adorned with a crimson decoration, much like Elise’s
 blushing cheek.
 His thumb briefly brushed over the pin’s sharp end, and
 then something else happened.
A cold smile crept onto Cardale’s lips.
 “Poisonous.”
 The short, venomous utterance silenced all three people in
 the room. Their eyes widened in disbelief. It was simply
 unimaginable.
 Elise Schuvan was far too tender-hearted to commit murder
 by poison. She lacked cunningness and couldn’t hide her
 emotions well. Hadn’t all her small lies been exposed?
 Yet, no one dared to speak out. The master’s aura was too
 ominous.
 Cardale twisted his lips as he handled the poisoned cravat
 pin.
 It was a common poison derived from the stems of a widely
 found toxic plant in the Empire. Though not sophisticated,
 its potency was enough to end a life with just a few pricks
 on the skin, especially if the victim was an ordinary person.
Haha, Cardale’s laughter echoed in the study.
 But even lifelong servants like Norman, experienced
 housekeeper Linda, and the Duke’s lieutenant and aide,
 Michael, did not think the esteemed lord of Vassenberg was
 genuinely laughing.
 In the brief moment that followed, the laughter subsided,
 leaving behind an eerie silence.
 “Foolish.”
 Cardale sneered. Cold fury gleamed in his red eyes.
 However, he did not believe Elise had poisoned him.
 On the contrary, he could see through the fact that it was
 not her who had foolishly tried to poison his beloved doe to
 prevent her from fleeing.
 He knew better than anyone that she couldn’t even think of
 such an act.
That timid and gentle woman, who was so afraid of
 accidentally stepping on an insect during her walks that she
 took great care not to harm even the smallest creatures,
 preparing for murder by poison? It was an absurd notion.
 Moreover, the conversation that reached his ears as though
 waiting in the palace after just a few months helped his
 judgement.
 “‘Stabbed her sleeping husband with a poisoned needle?'”
 The intention was too transparent to be deceived. Cardale
 had considered the possibility of Raymond Hartman aligning
 with Princess Theresia, so he had a good idea of where and
 how this mockery had originated.
 But the twisted mindsets stemmed from Elise Schuvan not
 believing him and exacerbating the situation to this extent.
 Behaviours resembling foolish acts that exposed
 vulnerabilities to enemies and enduring it all without asking
 for any help from me, those were the reasons.
 Moreover, she broke the promise of not deceiving him, of
 not lying.
“Ah…”
 Cardale roughly swept his hair back. The intangible force he
 exerted pricked the innocent’s skin painfully.
 “Your Grace.”
 Michael carefully spoke up.
 “At the very least, Lady wouldn’t have applied poison.”
 He revealed that Raymond had surprised Elise, causing the
 pin to break, and then repaired it.
 “During that process, someone else seems to have poisoned
 the pin with impure intentions.”
 “If the young lady had poison, I would have found it.”
When Linda intervened, Norman also cautiously expressed
 his opinion.
 “It may sound presumptuous, but could this have been
 orchestrated by someone else with ill intentions toward the
 young lady?”
 Cardale silently observed the three who were trying to
 defend Elise.
 “They might have thought he was just a blind lackey, but it
 seems he’s managed to win over his employees.”
 But the fact remained that the deer had escaped his trap
 without permission, and he was still being deceived.
 He needed a place to alleviate this dirty, low feeling.
 Then, shouldn’t Elise Schuvan pay the appropriate price for
 causing this?

Cardale issued a brief order.
“Keep quiet.”
He decided to cover up his wife’s foolishness.
From the beginning, he had no interest in Elise for her wit or
charm.
It was her innocence, not any cunning or quick thinking, that
had caught his attention and ensnared him.
Knowing this, he still took her in, and now, regardless of
what anyone said, she was his. It was a bit shabby to own
and stamp something as one’s own. Could it even be
discarded now?
Only, she needed some education to ensure she wouldn’t
make such a mistake again.
Norman examined his expression and asked.
“So, will the young lady continue to be treated as she is
now?”
“Of course.”
Cardale replied as if answering a trivial question.
“I will handle this myself.”
The butler breathed a sigh of relief. Judging by his master’s
intentions, it seemed unlikely that the young lady would be
dismissed from the estate anytime soon.
However, he was somewhat apprehensive. The expression
‘handle this myself’ from his master implied that he
wouldn’t just turn a blind eye.
He also knew the Duke could be excessively cruel at times,
and whenever the young lady defied him, his ruthless
nature would show without regret.
Compared to others, his actions were merciful, but the
delicate young lady struggled each time.
‘Moreover, recently, he has been particularly affectionate…’
No one openly mentioned it, but all the employees at
Vassenberg knew that the Duke held his lady in high regard.
And even more so that Elise Schuvan had tamed their
master.
They had come to understand the uneasy affection of the
master, and couldn’t help but worry about the damage his
lack of compassion might inflict on the vulnerable young
lady.
Elise might not have known that it could become a deep
wound that would never heal, one that could never be
undone.
While Norman was absorbed in worry, Linda asked.
“Sir, what will I do if the lady asks for money?”
“Give her as much as she wants.”
Cardale said, raising the corner of his mouth.
“It seems she’s probably been threatened by Fritz Schwan.”
“But will the escape funds be delivered?”
Michael was puzzled. Anyway, Fritz Schwan couldn’t escape
even to another country, let alone out of the jurisdiction of
Inghel. The rebels will all be caught and punished at the
upcoming hunting festival.
Moreover, now that the Duke understands everything, it’s
impossible for Fritz Schwan to meet Lady Elise and receive
money.
Cardale lowered his eyes slowly, reading the doubts of his
subordinates.
“Let’s see how long she can hold out without speaking first.”
The Duke’s faint voice mixed with laughter sent shivers
down not only Michael’s spine but everyone else’s.
“Just act as usual.”
While forgiving his lady, the man’s red eyes warned that he
would not easily overlook this.

Elise slept deeply for the first time in a long while. It was a
brief slumber without dreams.
She woke up feeling strengthened enough to get out of bed.
Her mind, though clouded with worries and anxiety, cleared
up slightly.
Her small hand pulled back the curtains that covered the
satin bed. Elise was surprised to see the room lit by a candle
and the view outside the translucent ivory-coloured
curtains.
‘What time is it now…?’
It was already fully dark outside. Her bare white feet
touched the rug next to the bed. Silently crossing the
bedroom, she swiftly drew the curtains from her window and
looked up at the sky.
Above the veil of the deep night, the stars shone brightly.
Fortunately, as her gaze lowered, she saw bright lights
throughout the mansion. It meant it wasn’t so late that
people had gone to sleep yet.
Elise sighed inwardly, reassured, and brushed off her chest
before feeling dejected again.
‘I thought I’d just close my eyes for a moment but ended up
sleeping so long…. Now everyone must know how lazy I
am.’
Lazy and hesitant—that’s what she had often heard from
Vanessa during her time at the county.
Though she had improved somewhat now, during her early
education, cutting down on sleep had been very
challenging.
She had often dozed off and made frequent mistakes, even
when awake, due to a foggy mind.
Her less than four hours of sleep was the cause, but no one
at the county had told her the truth.
Because of this environment, Elise still sometimes felt guilty
after spending months at the Duke’s estate.
The nights spent with Cardale were tolerable. But when she
had done nothing for the past few days, she felt like she had
become a useless woman who only ate.
Elise murmured, crestfallen.
‘When will the Duke return…?’
As a habit, her eyes searched for Cardale’s bedroom
window. As usual today, the room was pitch dark…
‘…Huh?’
Her blue eyes widened in surprise. The room, which hadn’t
been lit for days, was bright. When she caught a glimpse of
a black silhouette through the curtain, Elise knew.
‘The Duke…’
The one she had been waiting for had finally returned.

“Is the water not too hot for you?”
“No, it’s just right.”
She still felt embarrassed having her maids attend to her
bath. Nevertheless, Elise endured the shame of exposing
her nakedness.
Even though she could bathe alone, her body didn’t feel as
refreshed, and her hair lacked its usual shine without the
maids’ touch.
‘It’s been a long time since I’ve seen the Duke.’
She hadn’t been able to greet him properly, having foolishly
fallen asleep. So now, she wanted to prepare herself as best
as she could.
“Linda.”
“Yes, Miss. What is it?”
Elise hesitated. She feared that voicing her thoughts might
invite ridicule for entertaining such absurd ideas. Finally, she
spoke.
“Did the Marquis… I mean, did he look for me when he
returned home and found me absent?”
Linda sighed briefly and kindly informed her.
“Actually, the Duke was already looking for you.”
“Really?”
Elise’s cheeks reddened.
‘So the Duke did think about me, at least a little.’
Her heart warmed as much as the bathwater enveloping
her. Her anxious and restless mind melted away like
morning dew meeting the sun.
‘Things will be okay now.’
Because the Duke was here.
Though she couldn’t guarantee anything, a vague hope that
things might strangely turn out well emerged.
‘But I’m deceiving the Duke.’
Suddenly, a sharp question arose in her mind. Elise’s body
stiffened.
“Miss? Is something uncomfortable?”
“Oh, no.”
Elise quickly shook her head. As she lowered her head, her
reflection appeared in the water. She defended herself in
her mind against the voice that awaited her answer.
‘It couldn’t be helped…’
In truth, Elise knew better than anyone.
That she had broken promises and told lies. She had
pretended nothing was wrong. No matter how she packaged
it, the fact remained that she had deceived him.
‘But it’s too late to turn back now. Even if I tell him the truth
now, the Duke won’t forgive me…’
More than the anguish of deceiving him, Elise feared being
cast aside by him in the future. She didn’t want to be
abandoned. Just imagining his eyes looking down at her with
cold disdain made her heart twist as if it were sinking into
the ground.
‘I just can’t bring myself to confess…’
So Elise chose to stay by his side, shamelessly feigning
ignorance to her own mistakes.
She didn’t believe she could keep the secret forever. She
just wanted to push back the terrifying future that would
inevitably come.
“Miss, will you be leaving?”
After washing her body and smoothing her skin with
fragrant oils, she combed her long hair down smoothly. After
donning a thin, soft negligee and then a robe that draped
halfway down her body, her lengthy preparation was
complete.
“I will escort you.”
As usual, Linda guided her to Cardale’s bedroom. Walking
down the now familiar corridor, her anguish and worries
faded away, replaced by anticipation and excitement.
That’s how much Elise missed Cardale. She wanted to see
him.
“Please go in.”
Entering the bedroom, she glanced around. He stood by the
window, holding a glass of liquor.
“Duke.”
At her cautious call, the man turned his head slowly. Up until
that moment, her heart had raced with anticipation.
But when his crimson eyes met hers, Elise involuntarily
shivered.
It was strange. His gaze was too icy. Even the cosy
atmosphere of the bedroom felt cold.
‘…Must be my imagination.’
Ignoring the prickling sensation on her skin, Elise spoke.
“I… heard you returned home. But I fell asleep and couldn’t
greet you.”
Perhaps due to nervousness, her words stumbled out.
Instead of answering, Cardale casually swirled the longstemmed glass. The red liquor inside swirled gently.
Anxiously, Elise waited for his response, staring at the
swirling liquid.
“So?”
Finally, Cardale set the glass down on the windowsill.
“What is it you want to say?”
His question was as chilling as the cold. Elise’s heart sank.

“I, I…”
Her voice failed her, as if someone had gripped her throat.
Elise couldn’t speak and pursed her lips.
Cardale twisted his lips as he observed Elise’s scantily clad
figure.
“Judging by your attire, I can guess.”
His voice dripped with sarcasm. His gaze felt like it was
looking down on something base and lowly. Elise gripped
the edge of her negligee tightly, feeling herself tremble
faintly.
Just moments ago, she had carefully chosen this negligee
hoping he would like it. Now, she felt unbelievably cheap
and dirty under his disdainful gaze.
No, maybe that was the truth. After all, she had come here
in exchange for money from the very beginning.
But…
“Why are you silent? Just say you’ve come to do your duty.”
His cold mockery pierced her ears.
“I came by to serve you for the night.”
Tears welled up. It wasn’t a lie, but her heart felt strangely
heavy, and her emotions felt raw and painful.
…
Elise lowered her head to hold back the tears. She bit her lip
to keep from making a sound.
But she couldn’t help the sting in her eyes.
“Even if you miss me, you must be patient and wait.”
“I’ll come as soon as possible, so don’t cry because you’re
lonely.”
The tender voice that promised his return, the gentle touch
that wiped away her tears, the sweet kiss like eating wild
strawberries.
All those sensations were still vivid to Elise, as if they had
just happened minutes ago.
However, he had changed so much that it felt like a lie. He
was not the Duke she knew. He seemed like a different
person with the same face.
Unable to believe, no, unwilling to believe, Elise gathered
her courage and looked up.
Her finely trembling azure eyes searched Cardale’s face as if
feeling for traces of the affectionate past.
However, as if mocking her earnest wish and prayers, the
man’s gaze was relentlessly cold.
‘Did I make a mistake or do something wrong to upset him?’
But it had only been a few days since she last saw the Duke,
and she couldn’t recall any significant error.
It didn’t seem to be because she had fallen asleep and
failed to meet him, as Linda had speculated.
‘…!’
That was when it hit her like a bolt of lightning.
At that moment, Elise’s heart plummeted off a cliff. The
colour drained from her face as if all the blood had been
drained from her body. Her fingertips trembled as she
clutched her skirt.
‘Surely you’ve found out…’
She wanted to believe otherwise, but she couldn’t. It fit the
situation too perfectly to deny. There was no other plausible
reason.
‘He knows now. That I deceived His Grace…’
While Cardale was absent, she had woven countless lies.
She had even gone so far as to meet Raymond in a way to
avoid Michael’s eyes.
Why did she do that?
Now, Elise realised how foolish her actions had been.
To even think that she, someone born of a humble mistress,
could evade the gaze of the Duke of Vassenberg. It was
absurd.
She was foolish and unreasonable, repeating the same
mistakes. It made her disgusted with herself.
Will he have a mistress who has deceived him several
times? There was no way a mistress could be beaten and
thrown out against her master’s wishes.
The quiet voice in her heart laughed at her.
‘In the end, I knew it would come to this. I am going to be
abandoned.’
Her frightened eyes shook mercilessly. Fear swelled through
her body like a wave ready to engulf her.
“How long do you intend to keep silent?”
The chilling voice struck Elise then.
It jolted her awake, as if ice-cold water had been thrown
over her. Bloodless eyes stared back at her without warmth,
awaiting her response.
‘It’s shameless, but if I confess everything now and beg for
forgiveness…’
She could endure harsh words. She could bear any cruel
punishment. What terrified her more than anything was the
thought of being driven away from here, unable to ever see
him again.
“D-Duke.”
So, Elise tentatively spoke up, driven by her belated
confession.
“In fact, I…”
“Shut up.”
But the courage she had mustered scattered meaninglessly
at the cold command.
“If you’re going to make useless excuses or babble on, get
out.”
Cardale turned away with an impatient gesture, dismissing
her with disdain.
“N-No, please.”
Elise desperately raised her head.
“I came here… to serve the Duke.”
Her words cut herself deeper than any sharp wound,
bleeding slowly from the reopened scars, but she ignored
the pain. She forgot the sting.
She just wanted to feel his warmth. She wanted to be in his
arms.
“May… may I warm Your Grace’s bed?”
Her voice had grown damp without her realising it. Elise
swallowed hard.
‘Don’t cry. Don’t show any signs of hurt.’ If she revealed her
vulnerability, she might truly be banished from this
bedroom.
She awaited Cardale’s decision with desperate longing.
‘Please accept me. Please don’t reject me. Please let me
stay the night here.’
Suddenly, a faint memory resurfaced. It was the day she
first entered this bedroom.
“Then do as you wish.”
Ah… Elise’s small lips parted as she breathed out a silent
sigh.
It was just like back then. Hanging onto him, begging for
something he no longer wanted from her, openly throwing
herself at him to turn his heart.
He mocked her, not showing any mercy. She became a
pitiful sight, gasping for breath, before finally accepting his
body.
It was a memory that was buried deep in her heart, but it
was still a sad memory. She thought it was healing, but it
was still painful to touch.
‘I ruined everything.’
Tears filled her eyes at the thought of going back to that
time.
He didn’t listen to her confession. It meant he wouldn’t
forgive her. It also meant that all of his sweetness, warmth,
and comfort were gone.
Like a dream.
If only she could turn back time. If she hadn’t made the
choice to deceive him, she choked, imagining what it would
have been like now.
“Are you not going to do it?”
“Oh, no.”
Elise hurriedly shook her head at his irritated voice.
Cardale sat down on the sofa. Arrogant and languid, he
nodded his head. It was a summons. Elise wiped away the
moisture that had gathered in her eyes and walked
hesitantly towards him.
The man’s gaze slowly swept from her head to toe. Elise
knew exactly what he wanted.
Her hands trembled as she grabbed the thin fabric, pulling
out her arms and shoulders from the negligee. Immediately,
her nightgown fell to her feet.
With nothing covering her upper body, her fair and ample
chest was exposed.
Elise shrank slightly at the cool air that touched her
sensitive skin and lowered her arms under Cardale’s sharp
gaze.
She still had her underwear on below. But instead of taking
it off, she knelt down in front of the man.
Because that’s what he wanted.
A warning that she is just a slave for his desires, that he can
return to this position at any time.
He was trying to remind his mistress, who had dared to act
so arrogantly, of this fact.
“What are you waiting for?”
Cardale lightly kicked Elise’s kneeling knees.
His attitude was truly that of handling a servant, and her
heart raced with unease. However, she showed no emotion
and spread her thighs slightly apart, touching against his
calves.
‘It’s all my fault. So I shouldn’t resent the Duke.’
Just a while ago, she had vowed to do anything to avoid
being driven away.
But now that the moment had come, she disliked her
conflicting feelings, how hurt she was by his cruelty.
‘I’ve done this before. This would be the second time, so
what could be so difficult?’
But strangely, it felt even harder than the first time.
Enduring his cold gaze that felt like he was looking down on
mere dirt, enduring his sharp words like daggers, and even
the chilling air in this bare room—all of it overwhelmed her.
In truth, she was afraid of what lay ahead. The fact that this
was only the beginning made it even more frightening.
Tears she had held back welled up again in an instant.

Elise quickly bowed her head, a desperate gesture to hide
her plain face.
However, avoiding the penetrating gaze of a man with such
keen senses was impossible.
“That’s enough.”
A voice colder than it was moments ago, descended upon
her head.
“I won’t sympathise with a crying woman.”

Elise desperately held onto Cardale’s leg as he tried to rise
from the sofa. He frowned.
“What are you doing now?”
“I-I’m sorry. I won’t cry, so…”
“Even if it’s not you, there are plenty of women who would
gladly climb into my bed. There’s no need to force myself
upon a woman.”
His words were almost threatening. Elise felt her throat
tightening as she shook her head vigorously.
“No, I…”
Her grip on his leg tightened, as if holding onto her last
hope.
“It’s not that, I… I…”
She hastily wiped away her tears with one hand, pleading
desperately. Not because she didn’t want to do this, but
because she wanted to stay. She begged not to be thrown
away. Her other hand still firmly held onto his leg.
“Please, let me stay by your side. I beg of you.”
Her voice trembled with desperation.
Elise pleaded and pleaded, hoping earnestly that his cold
demeanour would soften even a little.

Cardale narrowed his eyes sharply. His intense gaze
scrutinised the woman kneeling before him.
Her small, round shoulders trembled slightly. Despite her
efforts to suppress any sounds, a faint whimper escaped
through her trembling lips.
Barely crying like this didn’t sit well with him. Nothing had
even properly begun.
If she was going to be this timid, then she shouldn’t have
entertained the thought of deceiving him from the start.
It was absurd where she found the courage to deceive him,
after just a few words of warning made her tremble like a
leaf.
To ensure she didn’t repeat the same mistake, it would be
better to push through to the end right here.
However, the weight of the woman clinging to his leg was
excessively light. The already petite woman seemed even
smaller in just a few days.
Still feigning indifference, Cardale finally spoke.
“Then smile.”
When the command came, Elise lifted her head. Her blue
eyes, trembling slightly, looked up at him.
To ensure the woman didn’t misunderstand the meaning, he
repeated his answer.
“Smile. As if you’re genuinely happy to embrace me. Like a
woman who does wish to be by my side.”
Cardale lowered himself and whispered into Elise’s ear.
“Because I don’t want to feel dirty, like you’re being forced
to embrace me.”
Her large, round pupils blinked. Understanding his words,
Elise nodded.
There was a moment of hesitation, but soon, her two hands
gently dropped from his leg. Elise picked up her negligee
from the floor and dabbed at the moisture around her eyes
and cheeks. She was meticulous, as if she didn’t want to
leave even the slightest trace.
“…Duke.”
After a while, the woman raised her head. Her face was
composed. The redness around her eyes remained
inevitably, but strangely, it suited her.
When overwhelmed by joy and tears, the woman’s eyes
would look just like this.
Blinking slowly, as if preparing her heart, Elise stared at
him. Then, very slowly, a change came over her expression.
The tension in Elise’s face eased, and her eyes softened into
crescent shapes. Her trembling lips, which had been
shaking, formed a delicate curve.
It was beautiful. But it wasn’t enough. Cardale knew that
Elise was genuinely happy when her cheeks blushed from
ear to ear, and her azure eyes sparkled like a lake catching
the sunlight.
However, Cardale decided to show tolerance towards her
efforts.
His large hand gently covered her pale cheek. In response,
Elise instinctively leaned her head against his palm, as if it
was a habit she couldn’t control.
Realising her action, she quickly straightened her head.
“I’m sorry…”
However, rather than questioning her behaviour, which had
grown accustomed to him, Cardale asked.
“Can you do this well?”
“Yes, yes…!”
Her up-and-down movement of her chin carried a desperate
look.
“I can do it. I’ll try my best. So that you can be satisfied…”
Cardale pulled back his hand slightly. Relief washed over
Elise’s face at his slightly softened expression. He leaned
back into the sofa and said,
“Try.”
Elise swallowed dryly.
It was barely obtained permission. She instinctively felt that
this opportunity wouldn’t come twice.
‘How should I…?’
Thankfully, she remembered everything Vanessa had taught
her. As embarrassing as it was, the vivid lessons remained
etched in her mind. Some movements had been practised
repeatedly until they became second nature.
Most of them were acts of seduction. Since she lacked the
talent to win people over with words, Vanessa had advised
her that using her body, even clumsily, would be better.
It was considered her best asset.
‘Will it please the Duke?’
Her tense heart pounded with worry and anxiety. Elise
nervously clenched and released her hands.
A little later, her small, trembling hand cautiously rested on
his left thigh.
No, more precisely, she aimed for a different area than the
thigh.
She could feel the tension of his well-built muscles in his
lower body. His large member was already swelling.
Elise jerked in surprise but didn’t remove her hand. Instead,
she felt relieved that there was some response. Due to him
saying he wouldn’t succumb to crying women, her heart had
been pounding with worry.
“How did you know it leans left?”
His voice had dropped much lower than before. In an
instant, a familiar tension gripped her.
Elise involuntarily tightened her thighs that had just gone
slack, and hesitantly replied.
“I-I’ve seen it before…”
“So you peeked.”
Daring to adjust the master’s attire without permission.
It was an absurd stretch in their relationship, which had
entwined almost every night. But Elise had no room to
argue about such things. Instead, she was intimidated by
the low, growling voice.
“I, I’m sorry.”
‘Please forgive me. I peeked at the master’s clothes without
permission.’
Whether it made sense or not didn’t matter. Anything he
didn’t permit was off-limits.
In an effort to appease Cardale’s vexed mood, Elise
unconsciously applied a slight pressure with her hand. It was
the result of finding a gesture he might like.
The hand covering the swollen fabric on the cloth-covered
thigh began to move slowly up and down.
“Ha…”
With his neck craned back, Cardale exhaled a breath laden
with intense desire from his parted lips.
Sensing the man’s arousal, Elise moved her hands faster.
In an instant, the tight cloth threatened to burst open as it
became taut. He muttered a low curse.
“Enough teasing, bring it out.”
The deep tone rang in her ears like an animal’s cry. Elise
crawled between his legs with measured steps.
The sound of a buckle being undone cut through the still air
of the room, and soon, a rigid member sprang out.
It was so excited that it reached up to his navel. The ticky,
excited fluid trickled down the fissure of his blunt glans.
With both hands, Elise wrapped around the base of the thick
organ as it twitched uncontrollably before her eyes. The
heat and firmness of the flesh pulsed through her palms.
It was something that would endlessly pulse within her.
Something that filled every gap precisely. Something that
pressed firmly against a dizzying spot deep inside of her.
As she recalled that sensation, her lower region grew damp.
Elise pressed her thighs together, trying to restrain the urge
to soothe herself, and bowed her head.
Extending her bright pink tongue, she lightly licked the hole
that still dribbled with pre-cum, tasting its bitter tang.
Following this, the small tongue began to delicately caress
the glans with a flickering motion.
With the slow yet tantalising stimulation, Cardale exhaled a
hot breath.

Elise worked her tongue even harder to satisfy her master.
As she licked the heated, throbbing member with urgency, a
palpable desperation seeped through her movements.
Aligning her mouth meticulously with the smooth glans, she
used both her hands to stimulate the erect shaft, tracing the
prominent veins from base to tip.
The man’s elevated temperature transmitted keenly through
her sensitive tongue, and the slick surface coated with precum allowed for a smooth friction against her palm,
producing wet sounds.
“Stimulate the tip. Yes, like that.”
Following his instructions, Elise meticulously flicked the
deeply grooved hole at the head with her tongue tip, aiming
to extract every last drop of remaining pre-cum.
His thighs tensed with muscular definition under her panting
as he pressed against Elise’s body from both sides, as if
trying to squeeze out every last drop of remaining pre-cum.
Cardale’s large hand gripped the back of her head.
“When you’ve licked it all, move down.”
Elise nodded and opened her lips as wide as possible. Her
mouth was too small to accommodate him otherwise.
“Ugh…!”
Suddenly, his member thrust deeply into her open mouth.
Before she could fully prepare herself, the thick glans filled
her mouth completely, and Elise hastily swallowed. She had
to take him in no matter what.
Even though she managed to swallow deeply, it was only
taken halfway.
“Open your throat.”
A low, scraping voice was heard. The sensation of
penetrating her throat was acute. Although tears were
drying up and the area was getting colder, Elise struggled to
open her mouth, moistening her throat with difficulty.
“Open it more.”
The command came again. However, even moving her head
wasn’t easy for Elise.
He had never before inserted himself so deeply. His massive
member would nearly fill her mouth just with the glans.
So, whenever Cardale had urged her until now, she had
licked the shaft and glans with her tongue, or simply sucked
on the head.
But today was different.
Her mouth, stretched to its limit, ached painfully, and
blocked any sounds straining from her throat.
The engorged pen!s only allowed Elise to gasp for breath in
desperation, pushing her beyond her limits.
She looked up at Cardale with wet eyes, pleading silently for
mercy.
But her hope was swiftly shattered.
“Are my words a joke to you?”
“Ugh…!”
Cardale, who had only moments before enjoyed her service
with sleepy eyes, suddenly seized Elise’s hair tightly.
Immediately, he thrust into her mouth, the glans poking the
back of her throat. Elise trembled as pain and discomfort
caused her throat to reflexively tighten, eliciting a satisfied
sigh from him.
“Not bad.”
Cardale looked down at her, suffering from his merciless
insertion.
“Is it tough?”
Elise nodded tearfully, but instead of sympathising, he
twisted his lips upwards.
“Don’t struggle. Just stay still.”
He yanked on her hair, and just as suddenly as he pulled
out, he thrust even deeper.
In an instant, the tip of her nose was close enough to touch
the man’s gro!n, and her lips were touching the base of his
pen!s. Despite being unable to breathe properly, her nasal
cavity was filled with a strong male scent.
She was unable to shake her head as it was gripped by him.
The inserted pen!s, as if to fill up her throat, repeatedly
scraped her inner walls before it escaped.
Thwack, thwack, thwack.
His hand was merciless. Unable to regain her composure
from the relentless act, feeling like he was playing a musical
instrument with her throat.
Nausea rose from within, and dizziness clouded her head.
Tears streamed from her eyes, yet he showed no sign of
mercy.
‘You are punishing me.’
His harsh moans were unlike anything she had experienced
before, and Elise’s eyes turned pale. The stinging in her
eyes and the tickle were not due to physiological weeping.
‘…Can I go back again?’
Her heart clenched painfully at the painful thought that
arose amidst the torment.
Maybe he won’t treat her as kindly as before. Maybe now
she’ll spend every night in torment…
Already addicted to the sweetness he had given her, the
thought that she might never be able to undo her mistake
bought her a surge of sorrow.
‘Stop daydreaming and concentrate.’
“Ugh!”
As he gripped her hair tightly, the pain was excruciating, as
if her scalp was being torn off. With her mouth wide open
against his shaft, her lips felt the sting of pain.
“You have to use your tongue. A servant faithfully serving
her master’s pleasure shouldn’t be lazy.”
His cold voice sneered briefly.
Despite the suffocating sensation, Elise flattened her
tongue. Even moving without a gap was difficult, but she
diligently filled her mouth with the organ for his pleasure.
Feeling the tiny bumps of her tongue, Cardale pulled his lips
contentedly.
After a few more thrusts exploring her mouth, he bent his
upper body.
“You did well. It’s time for your reward, isn’t it?”
The man whispered softly in her ear, right as his rough
fingers pushed through her tender opening.
“Ahh…!”
Elise’s eyes widened at the sudden intrusion. Although not
as large as his pen!s, his four fingers were thick enough to
fill the entire area below.
“You soaked through the bottom without even needing to
loosen up. It seems like servicing men is a good fit for you.”
Cardale taunted, stroking her vagina mercilessly with his
fingers. As the wrinkled inner walls were rubbed in different
directions, the familiar pleasure filled Elise in an instant.
“Ugh… Ahh!”
Elise’s mind turned white as his withdrawing hand, leaving
only his fingertips, swung in again and stabbed the sensitive
spot precisely.
Her vagina, which was otherwise very heated, was once
again drenched in obscene fluids.
“You need to concentrate. No matter how horny you are, if
you move your mouth, it will be bitter.”
The tendons on his arms clenched. His captured head
violently bounced back and forth at a faster pace, poking
past the soft uvula.
Elise flinched from his strength, her body trembling, but she
did not turn her head or try to escape. Her tiny body swayed
back and forth in the man’s hands like a marionette.
After some time, Elise learned how to squeeze her pussy and
throat at the same time.
“…You’re more talented with this hole than you think, Elise.”
Cardale let out a low exclamation at the movement of the
delicate mucous membrane that clung to his genitals and
was tightened and loosened.
“Open wider. I’ll let you go.”
Cardale whispered as if to show her mercy and patted her
spread inner thighs like a dog. Elise trembled and spread
her legs with difficulty.
At the same time, he buried his hand deep inside and began
to shake vigorously.
“Ahhhh!”
As the bent fingers scratched her inner wall and even
twirled, the excitement that had been building up rose up
her spine and all the way to the top of her head in an
instant. A thrill of pleasure invaded her mind.
Elise couldn’t bear it as the pleasure was so intense that it
overtook her entire body, and she writhed at her waist.
But the force of her grip on her head made it impossible for
her to escape. All she could do was buck her hips and howl
in pleasure.
“Suck deeper.”
The sensation of her mouth and lower body throbbing at the
same time made her whole body and even her brain tingle.
A white light flashed before her eyes.
It had been a long time since even the feeling of pain in her
open mouth had disappeared. Now that even her pain had
been forgotten, all that was left was pleasure.
Elise let out a muffled cry between her clogged lips, and her
body trembled. Her sense of orgasm gradually drove her to
climax.
Cardale persistently captured the woman’s reactions, one
by one, in his eyes.
The moment when his hand, which was relentlessly stirring
and pounding her inner walls, gained even more
momentum, Elise’s eyes widened.
“Tsk!”
“Uuuuuu…!”
Thick semen poured into her small mouth, love juice
exploded like a fountain from below him.

Cardale firmly grabbed the back of the woman’s head and
only pulled his member out of her small mouth after he had
drained it of its last drop.
Her body, finally freed, collapsed to the ground. Elise
coughed out the phlegm she had been holding back. The
semen she couldn’t swallow mixed with her saliva and
dribbled down her chin.
Elise, unable to even think about wiping the mess from her
mouth, lay on the ground, gasping for breath. Her blurry
sapphire-coloured eyes blankly stared at the man’s traces
that dirtied the floor from her mouth.
It’s finally over… She felt a faint sense of relief.
“Who told you to spit it out?”
The cold voice snapped her back to reality. She turned her
head with difficulty. Soon, Elise found herself staring into
cold, blood-red eyes.
“Did I give you permission to spit?”
“N-no…”
Elise hurriedly sat up, shaking her head. She had never
swallowed his semen before, so it didn’t occur to her.
Even when she performed oral sex, he always pulled out at
the last moment, so this was the first time he had released
into her mouth.
Elise remembered how he had always gently cleaned her
when it splattered on her face or body, making Cardale’s
current demeanour both unfamiliar and terrifying.
Whether it was due to her lack of learning, as Vanessa often
said, or her weak will, tears welled up in her eyes again.
“I’m sorry.”
She hadn’t meant to spit it out. It was a reflexive action due
to the viscous fluid blocking her throat.
But as he said, she had done so without permission, and not
wanting to anger Cardale further, Elise quickly apologised.
“I’m sorry, Duke. I-I’ll swallow it all next time.”
She knelt, clasping her hands together and fervently
rubbing them.
“Please forgive me…”
Then, she felt tears streaming down her cheeks, startling
her. She quickly wiped them away with the back of her
hand, but it only smeared the wetness around instead of
removing it.
“Next time?”
The cold question pierced her ears, and Elise looked up at
the man with wet eyes.
Your Grace…
If he had been expressionless, she might have convinced
herself that he meant well. But his face wore a sardonic
smile, as if to deny her even that small comfort.
“Who said there would be a next time?”
If his skin were cut, would blue blood flow from the wound?
No, perhaps nothing would come out at all.
“Do it now.”
Elise’s eyes trembled with confusion, not understanding his
command.
‘What does he want me to do?’
She looked at Cardale with trembling eyes. His icy gaze, as
if calling her a pathetic and annoying creature for not
understanding, pierced her all over. Then, his mouth opened
again.
“Lick it.”
As Cardale’s foot tapped the floor, her gaze followed it
down.
There, on the floor, was the trace of him she had spit out.
“You made this mess, so you should clean it up, right?”
Lick it, without leaving a trace.
Elise’s mouth opened in silent disbelief. Like someone facing
an incomprehensible reality, her thin eyelids fluttered
rapidly, and moisture quickly gathered beneath her eyes.
Drip, drip.
Soon, her falling tears made small, round dots on the floor.
‘To the Duke, I am now just…’
The reality she had tried so hard to ignore was now clear
before her eyes.
‘Stupid girl. The Duke was just toying with you.’
‘Did you really think the Duke would keep you forever?’
She didn’t want to believe it.
Fritz would stop at nothing to torment her, always saying
things to wound her on purpose. She tried to convince
herself that his words were just meant to hurt.
But deep down, Elise knew the truth.
‘Come to think of it. I heard you’ve finally decided to
become a whore, haven’t you?’
‘A dirty girl who knows no shame.’
From the beginning until now, nothing had changed. Not her
situation, not her status, not their relationship.
The only thing that had changed was…
‘Without even realising it, I must have grown shamelessly
greedy…’
Elise looked up at Cardale again. His gaze was like that of a
predator watching its prey, intrigued by how she would
react.
When their eyes met, he twisted his lips into a sneer.
“How long are you going to keep me waiting?”
His words, implying he wanted to savour her abject
submission, pierced her heart with a stabbing pain.
‘To be able to laugh while making me do such things… I
must mean nothing to him.’
Her heart ached unbearably. It was as if a fragile corner of
her tender heart was crumbling with a soft crackle.
A cold voice stopped her tears in their tracks.
“You’re ruining my mood.”
Elise flinched. The man who had seemed to enjoy himself
just moments ago now had a face twisted with anger.
“If you’re going to piss me off, get out.”
Cardale cursed under his breath, roughly running a hand
through his hair, and Elise’s heart sank.
“No, I-I was about to do it. Really.”
She had taken too long, oblivious to his impatience. She
hurriedly placed her hands on the floor and spoke.
“I’ll do it now, Your Grace.”
Her pleading softened his fierce gaze slightly.
“Do it.”
Elise remained on her knees and bent her upper body. As
her face neared the floor, she stuck out her tongue and
squeezed her eyes shut.
If she couldn’t endure this, everything would truly be over.
Just as her small tongue was about to touch the acrid fluid,
Cardale grabbed her chin and lifted her head.
“Ugh…!”
“I’m not satisfied.”
He narrowed his eyes and rubbed her lips with his thumb.
Elise whimpered, feeling his touch, tracing every inch of her
delicate skin.
“I’m sorry…”
“From now on, if you spill even a drop, you’ll lick it all up.
Understand?”
Elise nodded, gathering the pieces of her shattered heart.
‘It’s okay… I still haven’t been thrown out.’
It was painful and sorrowful, but she reassured herself. She
could still stay at the Duke’s mansion. She just needed to
avoid making the same mistake again.
‘The Duke still wants me. Even if it’s only for my body…’
It was her only solace. When she was in his arms, she could
forget her fears and anxieties.
Now, the Duke would hold her.
Oral sex never marked the end of their activities. It was
always a prelude, an appetiser to stimulate further arousal.
After one ejaculation, he would always proceed to the main
act.
Her body had cooled down a bit, but she was already warm
from before. Perhaps they would proceed to penetration
immediately.
The initial moments might be challenging, but she would
endure. Even when she was loosened, the first penetration
was always difficult.
But after a few thrusts, she would be engulfed in
overwhelming pleasure.
Elise looked at the man’s still erect member, knowing from
experience that one or two ejaculations were never enough
for him.
Like an obedient slave, she moved towards him, but Cardale
spoke.
“Leave now.”
Elise froze in shock, thinking she must have misheard.
‘I did everything the Duke asked.’
More importantly, Cardale had not yet satisfied his desire.
He needed someone to quench his lust, and that someone
was supposed to be her.
‘I must have misheard.’
Maybe he meant for her to get up, or to get on the bed, or
take a different position.
But a strange sense of unease gripped her. In that bizarre
anxiety, Elise couldn’t decide what to do.
“Didn’t you hear me tell you to leave?”
In an instant, Elise’s heart plummeted. Her fingertips grew
cold. Her mind felt dizzy, and her vision darkened.
She couldn’t deceive herself anymore; she hadn’t misheard.
“B-but…”
She stammered, gripping her numb hands tightly.
“You haven’t been fully satisfied yet… I need to help
release…”
She didn’t even know what she was saying, but the meaning
somehow got across.
The response she received was devastating.
“Do I really have to do this with you?”

The cruel words, implying that it didn’t have to be her and
that he could derive pleasure from any other woman,
pierced Elise like a dagger.
Finally, she couldn’t hold back her tears any longer.
“Ah…”
Even then, what came to her mind was that she had to hide
her crying.
The Duke would dislike it… 
Her small hands covered her face.
But she couldn’t hide her trembling shoulders or the sobs
escaping between her lips.
“All you know how to do is cry.”
At the sound of his irritated and annoyed voice, Elise bit her
lips so hard it almost bled, trying to stifle the sound.
“Do I really have to keep a dull, clueless girl like you who
doesn’t listen?”
“I… I’m sorry. Please forgive me. I won’t… again…”
She tried to plead for forgiveness, but her voice choked up,
and she couldn’t speak properly. Unwanted tears steadily
fell.
I won’t ever disobey you again, Your Grace. I won’t deceive
you. Please, don’t discard me. Please, don’t say you don’t
need me.
Elise looked up at him with eyes blurred by tears.
“I told you.”
But her desperate hope was easily crushed.
“You’re not particularly useful to me.”
It felt like her heart was ripped out and thrown into a deep
abyss.
“I only played with you for a while because you begged me
so desperately, but now you’ve forgotten your place and are
climbing up.”
Her heart plummeted and crashed into a cold, hard rock and
shattered.
“You’re annoying, and now even tiresome.”
Her heart splattered everywhere, like her heart was
shredded into unrecognizable pieces of flesh.
Now, endless tears streamed from Elise’s eyes. Each word
he spoke stabbed her so painfully that she couldn’t even
feel it anymore.
The realization that she had already become useless and
tiresome to him was unbearably painful.
Yet what pained her even more was her heart, which refused
to give up even now.
Despite having prepared for this moment all along. Despite
knowing that such a day would come.
“N-no…”
Ignoring her unmanageable emotions, Elise crawled closer
to Cardale’s feet. She began to lick the erect shaft and
begged for forgiveness.
No, I haven’t forgotten. Please forgive me. I was wrong…
Then, she opened her mouth wide, took in his member, and
began moving her head.
“Ah…”
It wasn’t long before a breath, heavy with desire, escaped
the man’s lips.
Cardale leaned back into the sofa, looking down at Elise as
she diligently moved her head.

He had pushed her to this point, knowing she would
struggle.
It was because this was the only forgiveness he would allow
Elise Schuvan for her deceit.
If she ever deceived him again, Cardale knew exactly what
he would do.
He would utterly destroy her.
He would ensure she could never make a fool of him again.
He would crush and break her thoroughly.
Just as he had always done without exception.
Elise Schuvan was no different.
He had only shown leniency this time because she had been
manipulated by their enemies due to her fragile nature.
Thus, this opportunity had to be used to instill an
unrelenting fear in her. She should never even dream of
deceiving him again.
No matter how cherished she was, she was still just his
captive prey. Elise would not be granted a second chance at
forgiveness.
“Hah…”
As Elise quickened her pace, sucking fervently on his
member, Cardale’s thighs tensed. The saliva-soaked flesh
slid against the delicate lining of her mouth, making a wet,
squelching sound.
Cardale grabbed the back of her head, a sound of
excitement escaping him.
Certainly…
His half-lidded red eyes took in every desperate movement
of his prey.
While his primary intent was to engrave fear into her very
being, it was equally true that this act aroused and excited
him.
Indeed, Elise Schuvan’s tear-streaked face, her trembling
voice, the way she clasped her hands together to plead, and
her flushed thighs rubbing together—all of it aroused him.
Not to mention her lips that wrapped around him, or her
tongue that struggled to keep up.
Surely, she had learned her lesson by now.
Unable to contain himself any longer, Cardale decided to
end her punishment.
He pulled her head back, withdrawing his member from her
small mouth.
“Duke…”
Her face, flushed and bewildered, showed both confusion
and fear. Her rapidly blinking eyelids tried to hold back the
tears that threatened to fall again.
Now that the punishment was over, he chose not to prolong
her suffering and gave a short command.
“Get up.”
Her wide blue eyes widened even more, and she quickly
nodded.
“Yes, yes…!”
But as she tried to stand, her small body collapsed back
onto the floor. She had been kneeling for too long, and her
legs had lost their strength.
Cardale clicked his tongue lightly as he watched her
struggle, her face turning even paler as she cowered further.
Instead of berating her, he reached down and lifted her by
the waist with ease.
“Ah!”
Her small gasp echoed in the room as she was effortlessly
brought up to his level, her body trembling as she clung to
him for support.
Elise found herself swiftly lifted onto Cardale’s lap, but her
position was precarious. She could barely support herself on
her tiptoes, with her waist and hips suspended in mid-air.
“Hmph…”
Between her spread legs, his member brushed teasingly
against her swollen perineum.
Cardale deliberately moved her up and down, causing the
tip of his member to press against her entrance only to pull
away again.
The wet, lewd sounds of their flesh meeting and separating
filled the room.
“Uh!”
Elise couldn’t help but let out a moan in response to the
continuous teasing. Yet she remained still, not daring to
twist her hips or beg.
She had finally realized that her body was solely for her
master’s pleasure.
“How should I take you, Elise?”
Her small, trembling lips moved hesitantly.
“A-As you wish, my lord…”
“I can’t hear you.”
“Ah…!”
With a firm thrust, her body was lowered further, and the
head of his member slipped inside of her. Her loosened
entrance swallowed his thickest part with ease.
“Mmnh!”
Just as quickly, he lifted her hips, pulling out. The brief surge
of pleasure caused her to involuntarily jerk her hips.
“I asked how you want me to take you.”
Although he had already heard her answer, his persistent
questioning was driven by his sadistic desire. He much
preferred seeing her cry from pleasure rather than sorrow.
Once again, he pushed inside her only to pull out, and
Elise’s lips parted in a gasp.
“As you wish, my lord… Ah!”
“As I wish, huh…”
A loyal maid’s answer indeed.
Cardale chuckled, satisfied. Elise felt his grip on her waist
tighten. In the next moment,
“Agh!”
With a resounding squelch, his thick member speared her
entirely.
As his shaft filled her to the hilt, pressing against all her
sensitive spots, Elise’s head fell back, her petite body
trembling violently.
Elise’s neck bent back, and her small body trembled as her
genitals were plunged into at once, all the way to the root,
pressing exactly where she felt.
“Ah, ah…”
A thin, tickling moan escaped from her parted lips, and
Cardale laughed and chewed her white exposed neck.
“What if I leave already? It’s just the beginning.”
“Ahhhh! huh!”
“You’re sensitive.”
He lightly bounced her hips a few times as if gauging her
reaction. Elise’s whole body trembled, and she let out a
moan as she felt the huge prick inside her being pushed
further.
“Close your arms.”
Cardale wrapped the struggling woman’s arms around his
neck. At first glance, he seemed to be considerate, but it
was only for the sake of a pleasure that would last forever.
After seeing that her small hands were clasped behind his
neck, he lifted her as if to grasp the inside of her white
thighs.
“Huh, huh…”
As her genitals tightened and the hole behind her was
exposed, Elise let out a small cry in shame but Cardale
didn’t care.
The man placed his arms behind her knees and held her
narrow waist tightly with both hands, then whispered into
the woman’s ear.
“It’s the time you’ve been looking forward to. Enjoy it.”

Elise shook like crazy. Each time her body rose and fell back
down, his thick shaft pounded inside her.
“Ah, ugh… ahh!”
Maybe it was because she was so anxious, but every time
his pole roughly rubbed against her highly sensitive vaginal
wall and sank into her, she felt explosive pleasure that
made her whole body tingle.
“Ah, huh, uh!”
She couldn’t bite her lip as she screamed. Her saliva trickled
down the corner of her mouth. Her mind, consumed by the
pleasure, became increasingly distant.
Cardale licked her reddened cheek as he watched the
woman’s eyes become dazed with pleasure. She was damp
with tears, and although it should have tasted salty, it was
strangely sweet.
“Elise.”
“Ugh, huh… ha, ha!”
Elise, drunk on her instincts, twisted her waist, yet faithfully
answered her master’s call. He was so amazed by this that
he pushed his fingers into the joined area between them
and twisted her clitoris.
“Haaaa!”
Elise’s eyes flashed white. A shiver of pleasure ran down her
spine, all the way to the top of her head.
“Do you like it?”
“Huh, ah…”
Her back was bent, and her stiff body twitched slightly.
Cardale lightly kissed her lips as she moaned and caressed
her soft female body as she reached climax.
“They said you ran into Fritz in the park.”
“Huh, yes…”
Elise nodded without even having time to think about how
Cardale found out about that.
“What did he say to you?”
“Well, get him some money…”
“And?”
As he gently rotated her waist while still joined with her, her
pleasure began to build up again. Elise gasped for air as she
answered.
“I don’t have any, so I asked Linda, ugh… ah, please…”
“What, please?”
“That… Ah, ah!”
As soon as there was a little hesitation, retribution was
immediately imposed. After a few harsh jerks, her mouth
opened.
“Were you thinking of selling your master’s gifts? You picked
some horrid ideas.”
“I was wrong, haha, yo… … Yes!”
After persistently harassing Elise, Cardale got her to confess
that Fritz had asked her to bring money to the hunting
festival.
“It’s a hunting festival.”
Knowing where to avoid dying and where to return often is,
if anything, a skill.
He sneered coldly in his heart.
“F-Fritz committed treason… Ouch! So, ugh, I was scared…
Ah, haaang!”
“Who said that?”
“Huh, ha, ha, the Little Marquis of Hartmann… … .”
For an instant, Cardale’s face hardened.
Raymond Hartmann. The slightly bitter feeling he sensed as
he heard the name come out of his woman’s mouth quickly
turned sour.
Just as discomfort was encroaching on his mind.
“Duke…”
When he looked down at her small voice, he noticed that
the woman was frightened by his expression, and her body
was shaking. She seemed to instinctively sense that she had
made a mistake.
“I guess you can’t tell when to say something and when not
to, Elise.”
“I’m… sorry.”
He pulled the woman into his arms as she shrugged her
shoulders and shed tears, wondering why he was so sad.
“Hmm!”
As the angle of connection changed as it adhered tightly
from their grafted bottoms to the slender belly and bulging
breasts, Elise let out a moan.
“The Little Marquis tried to persuade you to do something.”
He grabbed her soft buttocks from both sides, pressed
them, and rolled them in a round shape. Because of her
position, their connection deepened, and as her clit rubbed,
Elise flinched. Her body trembling and her cheek rubbing
against his chest.
“Ugh, yes, he said… he will help me…”
“Help you with what?”
“Ugh, run away with my mother… Aaaah!”
Phew! The shaft sank deep into her. Elise’s eyes widened
and her mouth opened as she felt the sensation being
pushed up to her cerv!x.
“Don’t even dream.”
Gritting his teeth, Cardale pushed her forward and crushed
her waist. Elise’s mind was completely blown away by his
merciless pounding into her.
“Ah, ah, yes!”
A rush of maddening pleasure surged through her brain as
his swollen glands mashed the thick flesh beneath the
entrance to her womb.
“If you dared to do something like that…”
The subsequent threat was not conveyed. Elise screamed,
then started to flail around and burst into tears, having
finally lost her mind in the relentless rush of pleasure she
felt.
The last thing she felt in her fading consciousness was
Cardale’s arms around her as he lifted her body and carried
her to the bed.
I wasn’t abandoned…
Elise’s eyes slowly closed in the comfort she had finally
regained.

As Cardale stepped out of the mansion, Michael had been
waiting after completing the preparations, and bowed his
head.
“Let’s depart.”
“Yes, Your Grace.”
The carriage headed straight for 182 Themberd.
The Tea House, which would usually be bustling with guests,
was surprisingly quiet. Only a servant, who seemed to have
been instructed in advance, was waiting at the door.
As Cardale got out of the carriage, the servant approached
and bowed politely.
“I have been waiting to accompany Your Grace.”
“Show me the way.”
The servant led him to a spacious room deep within the
building.
Stopping at the door, the servant turned and bowed.
“There is another door inside the room. Push it open, and
you will find my master.”
Upon entering the room, Cardale let out a faint laugh upon
seeing the enclosed space surrounded by walls.
At the same time, he understood how Raymond Hartmann
had managed to meet Elise without Michael noticing.
Crossing the room in a single stride, he pushed open the
wall to reveal a garden decorated with wood and flowers.
Seeing the back of the man leisurely enjoying the garden,
Cardale stepped over the threshold.
“You’ve been quite clever.”
Raymond turned his body at the softly spoken words.
“That cleverness seemed to work quite well, didn’t it?”
A faint smile lingered on his lips.
“It’s quite something that the Duke, who never even blinked
when I requested to see him before, is now willing to meet
me in person.”
Cardale narrowed his eyes slightly. Raymond noticed the
subtle change, and his smile grew more pronounced.
The reason for his arrogance was a sense that he had
successfully disturbed the Duke’s composure.
“Has Elise not mentioned me?”
At that moment, an overwhelming aura of menace
enveloped and crushed Raymond.
“Who gave you permission to speak my woman’s name?”
Raymond’s legs trembled, struggling to remain standing but
eventually, one knee touched the ground.
“Do you believe in the Lady’s feelings?”
Raymond, lifting his head and gritting his teeth, spat out the
words.
“Do you really think she can genuinely like you?”
Seeing Cardale’s eyebrows twitch, Raymond believed his
words had had an effect. His green eyes gleamed as his
voice rose.
“I’m sure you’re aware of what you’ve done. No one remains
unaffected after experiencing such things. And such deep
wounds don’t heal easily. I could tell for sure when I met her
here.”
Raymond asserted.
“Elise will never open her heart to you.”
As he poured out his words without pausing for breath,
Raymond eagerly watched Cardale’s expression.
He was convinced he had struck a blow. And that it would
become the Duke’s weakness.
“And?”
However, the response he received was far from what he
expected.
“Why should I care about the heart of a woman who is
merely present for physical pleasure?”
“What, what did you just say…”
Raymond was the one who was thrown off balance.
“I really don’t understand why I should care about the heart
of a woman who’s only meant for my pleasure.”
Cardale tilted his head dismissively, sneering, and let out a
short, amused exhalation.
“Come to think of it, you wouldn’t be able to even do that.
You’ve never seen her turn red from pleasure, clinging to
someone or heard her crying and moaning, have you?”

“Don’t insult her!”
Raymond shouted, his face contorted.
“Insult?”
But Cardale replied calmly.
“Contrary to your expectations. Elise was just moments ago
fawning over me, wanting to be held desperately. Now, she
is peacefully asleep in my bedroom.”
He continued, observing the trembling jaw of Raymond.
“Is ‘insult’ even an appropriate term?”
The question was clearly a mockery of the one who it was
posed to.
Raymond’s eyes, glaring at Cardale, blazed with anger. Then
he spat out through gritted teeth.
“It must be so, then.”
In an instant, the smile vanished from Cardale’s face.
“A lady without a place to lean on, possessing nothing, could
only rely on you. She must deceive herself into believing
she likes you just to avoid falling into despair.”
Raymond, consumed by rage, poured out his words with
deliberate force, hoping each one would strike like a sharp
spear.
But the man, who had been momentarily rigid, soon twisted
his reddish lips.
“How laughable. As if she were even your woman.”
Cardale’s face turned chillingly cold. The atmosphere grew
ominous and tense.
“You have no rights over Elise Schuvan, Raymond
Hartmann.”
“She is not an object.”
But Raymond did not easily surrender this time.
“You probably can’t believe what I’m saying… No, you can’t
accept it. Someone as arrogant as you always believes their
choices are right. So you wouldn’t even doubt it.”
Cardale’s eyes narrowed. He wasn’t unsettled by Raymond’s
words, though they were irksome.
A mere, insignificant youth who had never led a family or
experienced a proper war dared to give him advice.
“I can assure you that if given the right opportunity, Elise
will surely leave you.”
“You speak recklessly. I understand that Marquis Hartmann
has no more children.”
It was a blatant threat to keep quiet if he valued his life. Yet,
Raymond pressed on with his words.
“Elise can never be happy by your side, you selfish and
cruel man.”
“You’re crossing the line.”
“What she needs is a caring and warm man.”
“Is that you?”
“Is there any reason it can’t be?”
“Gah…!”
Cardale swiftly grabbed Raymond by the neck and lifted him
off the ground.
Raymond’s forehead was covered in sweat as his feet left
the ground. The tightening grip around his neck made him
feel faint.
“Do not covet what belongs to others. Has the young lord
still not learned such a simple virtue?”
Even while holding the man with one hand, Cardale showed
no sign of effort.
“If Hartmann truly wants to make Vassenberg their enemy. If
it takes a foolish mind experience to understand, I will be
more than happy to assist.”
Cardale released his grip on Raymond’s neck.
Gasp, cough…!
The man collapsed to the floor, unable to straighten himself,
gasping for the scant air he could catch.
Cardale looked down at him as if he were an insect, then
turned away without a trace of regret.
He had issued a warning in the name of his family. If
Raymond wasn’t a complete fool, he would realise that such
trivial heroics should end here.
Even if one indulged in emotional games briefly, nobles
were ultimately motivated by their own interests.
“A caring and warm man?”
Cardale scoffed as he walked through the secret door.
“Is that the sort of man who broke off an engagement
because his fiancée was an illegitimate child?”
The cold derision fell over the prostrate man’s head.
Raymond did not lift his head until the Duke’s figure had
completely vanished.

The Princess’s expression turned ugly at the report from the
escort knight.
“Say that again, Dietrich. What exactly did His Highness the
Crown Prince do?”
The bowing knight lowered his head and repeated.
“His Majesty requested that the Princess’s wedding be
moved forward…”
“I specifically asked that he not interfere with my work and
stay out of it, but instead, he breaks our promise and stabs
me in the back?”
Crash!
The teacup on the table was thrown onto the marble floor
and shattered.
“Well, if he stayed quiet, he wouldn’t be my brother.”
Theresia sneered with scorn.
Dietrich tried to calm the agitated Princess.
“Didn’t you anticipate this might happen?”
“Just because I expected it doesn’t mean it doesn’t make
me feel awful, Dietrich.”
Theresia’s eyes glinted with a chilling light as she calmed
her ragged breath.
Her brother, Marius von Oldenhilt, had always been like this.
He had never once kept his promises to his sister.
As a child, he broke the rules to win at games. As he grew
older, he broke promises for personal gain, and in the end,
he clung to the position of Crown Prince even though he
knew it was not rightfully his.
Dietrich cautiously offered his opinion.
“I think the Duke of Vassenberg, after checking the list of
traitors submitted to His Majesty, felt reassured by the
absence of certain names and moved accordingly.”
“That would be right. So he must have believed that if he
sent me away to a foreign land, his secret would remain
buried forever.”
One side of her crimson-painted lips curled in disdain.
“Foolish bastard.”
Theresia brushed her glossy, well-groomed hair over her
shoulder.
Indeed, thanks to Marius’ arrogance, she had found a
weakness and obtained information on Elise Schuvan
through that opening. Then used that information to
manipulate Raymond Hartmann.
“So, how about the young lord?”
Theresia asked as she reclined on the sofa.
“It seems there are no significant issues with the overall
situation.”
Dietrich knelt in front of the sofa and began massaging the
Princess’s legs, as if he had been waiting for this moment.
“What will you do, Your Highness?”
“What will I do?”
The appropriate pressure of the massage made her face
relax in satisfaction.
“A foolish liar has even used the Empire’s safety for his own
greed. I cannot allow things to proceed as he wishes.”
Theresia was fierce and greedy. And she knew her own
temperament well.
But along with her lofty pride and lineage, Theresia also had
a strong sense of responsibility as a member of the
Oldenhilt royal family.
For her, a royal who betrayed their duty deserved to face
consequences, even if that person was a blood relative.
No, a half-blooded relative couldn’t be considered truly
family.
Contempt and hatred etched themselves onto Theresia’s
face.
“Indeed, dirty blood cannot be hidden. It cannot be
extracted or diluted.”
Her father had been wrong. One without innate nobility and
dignity should never have been given the position of heir
from the start.
“So it must be corrected now.”
Theresia’s eyes lowered languidly.
“Will Marius also participate in this hunting festival?”
It wasn’t a simple question about hunting beasts.
“Yes, I’ve heard that while the Crown Prince’s soldiers are
secretly arresting people in the hunting grounds, they will
also be guarding the female nobles.”
“Hmm.”
Theresia snorted and tilted her head back. Dietrich moved
to her shoulders and began massaging them.
“Prepare everything well, Dietrich.”
The Princess, with her eyes closed, wore a wry smile.
“It will be quite a spectacle.”

A single carriage came to a halt on a secluded road.
The carriage had a somewhat unique appearance, lacking
any special decorations or family crests.
Its surface was coated in glossy brown paint, and the doors
were adorned with golden fittings. The graceful curves and
sturdy large wheels suggested that the carriage’s owner
was not ordinary.
Similarly, the man standing guard outside, who did not
appear to be an ordinary employee, hinted at the carriage’s
unusual owner.
A few minutes later, someone approached the carriage. A
man with silver hair that shone like moonlight.
After exchanging a few words, seemingly to confirm the
visitor’s identity, the man allowed him to enter the carriage.
The door closed, and the deserted road quickly fell silent.
Inside the carriage, Damian greeted its owner with a
composed voice.
“Gerhard Schuvan sent for me.”
“I like your direct approach with getting to the point.”
Cardale let out a brief smile before his face hardened.
“However, it is not in keeping with etiquette.”
“I aimed to save Your Excellency’s time. I hope you will
forgive the rudeness.”
Damian bowed neatly and apologised.
It was the demeanour of someone who knew how to balance
deference and assertiveness. Cardale, looking at the top of
the head of the oddly arrogant commoner youth, spoke up.
“Sit.”
“Thank you.”
As Damian raised his head again, his piercing blue eyes
were revealed. The colour was strikingly similar. It was more
than just annoying; it was unsettling.
Damian, now seated opposite Cardale, began to speak.

“Gerhard Schuvan said that he is my father.”
However, there was no trace of joy at finding a blood
relative on Damian’s face. The raw emotions hidden behind
his indifferent expression were known only to him.
“As you anticipated, the Duke has promised to make me the
heir to the Schuvan family.”
“So.”
“I accepted.”
“That’s good to hear.”
“Should I be happy about it?”
Damian looked directly at him, with a gaze that seemed
almost rebellious.
It was clear that Damian was not pleased.
Cardale thought of Elise’s own gentle and refined deer-like
eyes, in contrast to Damian’s arrogant ones. Which were
only similar in colour and shape.
“Isn’t this what you wanted? Not everyone is fortunate
enough to have such luck.”
“I don’t understand.”
Damian continued with an expression of complete
disagreement.
“Are you grateful, Duke, for being born fortunately into a
noble family?”
Cardale’s eyes narrowed at the audacious question.
“I am simply claiming the rights I am entitled to. No, I’ve
only just been given the opportunity.”
Damian’s steady gaze showed no sign of wavering.
Cardale observed the illegitimate son asserting his rights. It
revealed the qualities of a fierce beast, but he was still just
a naive rookie.
“Continue.”
At the soft command, Damian hesitated, realising he had
crossed a line. Fortunately, the topic of conversation shifted
back to the original subject.
“Were there any other notable details?”
Damian paused for a moment before responding calmly.
“A person named Vanessa Lockseed approached me
separately.”
“A confidant of the Count then.”
Cardale was familiar with the name. She was someone who
had taught many things to his innocent woman.
Though she appeared loyal to Gerhard Schuvan, it seemed
she had other intentions. Given her overflowing ambition,
she was unlikely to be unsatisfied with just a position as an
aide.
“What did she propose?”
“At first, she offered to help me obtain the title of Count, but
when she came to deliver the call from Count Schuvan, she
acted as if it was all due to her efforts.”
A fleeting look of disdain crossed Damian’s otherwise
emotionless face.
“She wasn’t of much value to me. Moreover, I do not trust
traitors.”
Pleased with the answer, Cardale slightly curled his lips. He
had no intention of leaving someone who knew his
mistress’s weaknesses and might exploit them if necessary
unchecked.
“New wine should be served in new glasses. Get rid of her
too.”
“I plan to.”
“How long will it take to gain control of the Count’s family?”
“About three months, I estimate.”
“That’s too long.”
Beneath the half-lowered eyelids, the partially hidden
crimson eyes flickered sharply.
“When hunting an enemy, it’s essential to finish decisively
and swiftly. Speed it up.”
Despite making an almost impossible demand, the man’s
face remained calm. His dry threats were more than familiar
to him.
“That way, you can attend to your mother a day earlier.”
For the first time, Damian showed a hint of agitation. Seeing
the wavering blue eyes, Cardale had a brief thought.
This is similar to Elise.
“…What do you mean?”
Cardale leaned back in his chair and replied.
“My mistress, being deeply concerned about her blood
relatives, has pleaded with me to take care of her mother.”
Damian’s jaw tightened. Seeing the unmasked emotion on
Damian’s face, Cardale gave a wry smile.
“If you truly care for your sister, you should know how to
hide your emotions.”
The pointed advice was also a warning directed at the
audacious youth. Damian sensed it as well.
“…I apologise.”
Having successfully asserted dominance and made Damian
bow his head, Cardale raised his hand. As he tapped the
carriage wall with his long fingers, the door opened.
Damian, having risen, bowed as he got out of the carriage.
However, it was unclear whether the Duke had actually seen
him, as the door of the carriage quickly closed and it began
to drive away.

The youth gazed after the retreating carriage, his eyes filled
with an indescribable complexity of emotions.

With the storm that marked the end of summer, autumn
arrived at the Duke’s residence.
Since the incident a few days ago, the atmosphere in the
mansion had changed noticeably.
Elise, already timid by nature, had become even more
subdued. The servants, seeing her revert to the way she
was when she first arrived, felt sympathy for her. Norman, in
particular was affected.
“Where is the young lady?”
Norman had come to visit Elise’s room after a long time and
asked Linda. She quietly turned her head to indicate the
room and the connected balcony.
Norman’s gaze shifted to Elise, who sat in a chair, gazing
absentmindedly at the garden.
“Didn’t you inform her that the master had granted her a
brief walk?”
“I did mention it… but it seems she is frightened.”
Linda sighed softly and added.
“She seems to blame herself for having gone to the
Rottenbaum Park for a walk from the start. It’s as if she feels
that if she hadn’t, this wouldn’t have happened.”
Norman looked at Elise with concern.
In the past few days, the master had not taken any time to
visit her. He only called upon her late at night for his
personal needs.
“If only he would give her a little more comfort. How much
harsher does he intend to be?”
It was not difficult to imagine how much emotional suffering
Elise was enduring from the emotionally cold Duke.
“But this…?”
Linda looked at the tray Norman had brought and asked.
Only then did Norman remember the purpose of his visit
despite his busy schedule.
“I thought this might help lift the young lady’s spirits.”
As Norman lifted the food cover slightly to reveal its
contents, Linda’s face brightened with a pleased smile.
“It’s a dessert the young lady likes.”
After exchanging a glance with Linda, Norman knocked on
the transparent door leading to the balcony.
“Miss, it’s Norman.”

Not hearing a response, he knocked again and called out.
“Miss.”
“Oh, yes…!”
Elise, finally snapping out of her daze and turned around.
Seeing the familiar face after several days, she brightened
up.
“Sir Norman?”
Norman approached her with a kind and gentle smile.
“The autumn scenery at the Duke’s residence is quite
lovely, isn’t it? I sometimes lose myself watching it as well.”
“I heard you were busy, so how…”
“What’s there for an old servant to be busy with?”
Though Norman was actually busier than any other servant
in the mansion, he told a white lie for Elise’s sake.
“I was feeling lonely eating alone and had lost my appetite,
so I was looking for someone to spend some time with.”
Following behind, Linda quickly spread a cheerful floralpatterned cloth over the round table. In the centre was a
cake adorned with white cream and fruit.
“Now, please have a seat, Miss.”
“Wait a moment…”
Thanks to their insistence, Elise found herself seated before
she could refuse.
Meanwhile, Norman poured hot water into a teapot filled
with tea leaves. As the tea brewed and its aroma filled the
air, he made a lighthearted comment.
“I’m worried that perhaps my skills have declined, and the
tea might not be to your liking, whether it’s because my
eyes are failing or my hands are trembling.”
“No, not at all. I know Sir Norman’s skills well.”
“Even so, not as much as the young lady’s.”
As Norman poured the orange-hued tea into the teacups, he
continued.
“The master said my tea was not great, but he mentioned
that the young lady’s tea was quite good.”
“Really…?”
Elise’s eyes widened in disbelief.
“The Duke praised my tea…?”
While she was somewhat pleased, she also wondered if
Norman was perhaps lying to make her feel better.
“It’s true. Sometimes, the tea I make can be unpleasant due
to its bitter taste, but you’ve always enjoyed it without
discomfort.”
Birth Control Tea.
Finally realising what the tea was, Elise understood why its
scent had been familiar.
Mother must have had it when she went to meet Father.
To avoid giving birth to another child like herself.
At the same time, a chill ran through her heart.
‘It seems the Duke really didn’t know. That I can’t bear
children.’
That must be why he had endured the unpleasant task of
drinking the bitter birth control tea.
“He really didn’t need to drink it…”
Elise cautiously began to speak.
“Norman, I…”
“Yes, please go ahead, Miss.”
But the thought that followed left her unable to speak, as if
her throat was blocked.
“If he knew I couldn’t have children…”
An unhealthy body was a flaw. Moreover, in the current
situation, she had no courage to speak.
“I’ll definitely tell him when his anger has subsided…”
“No, never mind.”
Elise quickly shook her head. Fortunately, Norman did not
press further and instead cut a piece of cake to offer her.
“It’s said that eating something sweet can lift your spirits.”
“Thank you. Please, both you and Linda, have some, too.”
As the three of them sat together around the table in a
friendly manner, a maid burst in from outside and bowed
her head.
“Head maid.”
Raising her eyebrows, Linda asked.
“What’s the matter?”
“The Duke is going hunting now…”
“Hunting?”
The maid paused for a moment, then looked at Elise with a
worried glance before continuing.
“His Grace has requested that Miss Elise be brought to him.”

Hunting?
Norman thought it had been a very long time since he had
heard that word.
Reflecting on the past few months, he realised as if he had
been struck on the head, that his master had not gone
hunting for quite some time.
The Duke usually enjoyed hunting not only as a public duty
but also as a personal hobby. Yet, until now, Norman had not
only failed to question why his master had neglected his
hobby but had completely forgotten about it.
But Norman soon understood the reason.
‘The Duke has not gone hunting since Miss Elise came to the
mansion…’
This was another change that had occurred since Miss Elise
started living in the Duke’s residence.
So why did the Duke suddenly want to go hunting after not
doing so for several months?
Of course, in three days, the hunting festival marking the
start of the Empire’s autumn social season was scheduled to
take place.
However, the Duke’s purpose for participating in the event
this time was not to hunt animals.
Perhaps it was human hunting.
Norman’s eyes met those of the head maid. Linda seemed
to be thinking the same thing, judging by her bewildered
expression.
But Elise was quicker to prepare herself mentally than the
two of them were.
“I’ll be out soon.”
Hearing her faint voice, Norman stopped thinking and spoke
to the maid.
“I will escort Miss Elise, so you may leave.”
“Yes, Butler.”
After sending the maid away, Norman turned to Elise.
Seeing his worried look, she forced a smile and replied.
“I’m fine.”
When she stood up, the tips of her fingers that rested on the
table trembled slightly.
“The Duke must be waiting. Would you guide me?”
“Just a moment, Miss Elise.”
Linda quickly took a towel and some water from the tray
and handed them to Elise.
“The master is going hunting, so you might need this.”
“Thank you, Linda.”
Feeling Linda’s thoughtfulness, Elise gave a faint smile.
“I’ll carry it for you to the destination.”
Norman took the tray and left the bedroom. Elise followed
him.
“Miss.”
Linda approached and took Elise’s hand in hers.
Startled by the soft touch, Elise looked down. Only then did
she notice her fingertips trembling.
She had tried to be bold, but she was actually scared.
“The master is not looking to cast anyone out.”
At the unexpected voice, Elise looked up to see Linda
smiling gently.
“So don’t worry too much. Perhaps he called for you in
preparation for the hunt in three days.”
“…Alright.”
The fear was still there, but Elise smiled for Linda, who was
concerned about her.

The forest used for hunting was connected to the rear gate
of the Duke’s mansion.
Norman intentionally chose a path through the garden for
the young lady, who had already been confined to her
bedroom for days.
However, Elise couldn’t take in the scenery of her favourite
path.
When they reached her favourite spot, she naturally
stopped and turned her head towards the familiar direction.
It was where the morning glory vines had once thrived,
wrapping themselves around the colonnade.
“Oh…”
A soft sigh escaped her lips.
“The flowers have all withered.”
The morning glory vines that once adorned the columns and
arches of the colonnade were now shrivelled and
discoloured, clinging in an unsightly manner.
Elise, feeling a bit forlorn, stared blankly at the scene.
Norman, who had been walking ahead, turned back and
noticed she had stopped.
Following her gaze, the butler looked at the morning glories
and said,
“They will need to be cleared soon.”
Elise felt an inexplicable sadness.
The flowers had bloomed beautifully day after day, only to
end up shrivelled and lifeless.
Unable to bear the sight of the flowers at the end of their
life, she turned her head away.
“Let’s go, Sir Norman.”
From then on, she deliberately kept her eyes lowered,
focusing only on the ground as she walked.
How long had they been walking like that?
“There he is.”
Beyond the wide-open rear gate of the mansion, a man on a
large black horse appeared against the backdrop of a forest
just beginning to show hues of red and yellow below a clear
blue sky.
The midday sunlight shattered like tiny stars upon his dark
hair, and the cool autumn breeze stirred his clothes. It was a
scene straight out of a painting.
‘Could someone like me dare to intrude upon such a
beautiful, almost unreal, landscape?’
Elise hesitated, unable to take a step forward. 
Sensing her presence, Cardale turned to look at her.

Confronted with his cold yet elegant face, she froze as if
rooted to the ground. She felt his piercing gaze.
“Miss, here.”
Her fingers turned white as she took the tray from Norman.
It wasn’t heavy; she was just extremely nervous.
‘Why did he call me? Is he planning to take me to the
hunting grounds? Is he going to punish me? Perhaps he
intends to…’
Elise shook her head to dispel these frightening thoughts.
Summoning her courage, she walked towards him.
As the distance between them shortened, his gaze felt even
more intense, but she endured it.
Finally approaching him past the rear gate of the mansion,
she greeted him with a forced bright voice.
“Duke, you called for me?”
However, she couldn’t hide the trembling in her voice due to
her nervousness.
“I-I heard you were going hunting…”
She stammered, and as he looked down at the tray with an
expressionless face, her voice shrank like a timid mimosa
plant.
Fortunately, he spoke.
“That towel doesn’t seem like it would tie well.”
“Excuse me?”
“It needs to be thinner and smaller to tie around the wrist.”
Elise blinked, taking a moment to understand what Cardale
was saying.
“You mean…?”
‘Are you taking me to the hunt?’ Elise couldn’t bring herself
to ask and just gripped the tray tightly.
“Where else should a mistress be but by her master’s side?”
Tears welled up in Elise’s eyes.
This was practically a declaration that he intended to spend
this social season with her.
But then her heart sank. The memory of the devilish face
that had threatened her for money flashed before her eyes.
“But Fritz…”
“You won’t encounter him.”
“Really?”
“Don’t you trust me?”
“No, I do. I trust you.”
Elise quickly nodded. If the Duke said she wouldn’t meet
Fritz, then she wouldn’t.
Finally, she felt relieved. As she let out a small sigh of relief,
she thought she saw a hint of a smile on his face, but she
couldn’t be sure.
“Then practice.”
“Practice…?”
Instead of answering, Cardale gestured towards the tray.
However, the towel prepared was indeed too bulky, causing
Elise to hesitate.
But Cardale’s gaze was persistent, and she eventually had
no choice but to set down the tray and pick up the towel.
‘Should I fold it like this…?’
Reading the room, Elise folded the towel, and as if on cue,
Cardale extended his arm, the one not holding the reins. His
strong wrist, partially revealed under the shirt sleeve,
caught her eye.
She carefully wrapped the towel around his pronounced
wrist bone. It took three turns due to the towel’s length, but
she managed to tie it securely.
“It must be uncomfortable…”
“After tying a handkerchief, one waits for the hunter’s safe
return from their hunt.”
Cardale didn’t seem to hear her and gestured with his chin
towards a spot. Following his gaze, Elise’s eyes widened.
Under a pristine white canopy stood a lovely set of table and
chairs. The table was adorned with various snacks and
drinks. The grass was neatly trimmed to ensure comfortable
walking.
It was set up exactly like the places where ladies stayed
during hunting festivals.
“Usually, they gather here for light conversation. If you want
to rest, you can stay in the tent assigned to each family.”
‘He’s instructing me so I don’t make a fool of myself at the
hunting festival. I mustn’t tarnish the Duke’s honour.’
Feeling a bit burdened but determined, she looked up at
Cardale and nodded.
“I’ll remember everything you tell me.”
He furrowed his brows. Elise couldn’t decipher the meaning
behind his silent gaze and fidgeted with her fingers.
Then, in an indifferent tone, he casually asked,
“Do you have a preferred game to hunt?”
“Game…?”
She was taken aback.
She knew the festival involved hunting animals. However,
she hadn’t expected such a question. Whatever name she
mentioned would result in the poor creature’s death.
Finding the idea horrifying, Elise quickly shook her head.
“No, nothing.”
She reiterated sincerely.
“Truly, I don’t want anything.”

However, it wasn’t the right answer. His expression didn’t
change, but Elise could tell.
“P-Please take care and come back safely. That’s all I
need…”
He looked down at her for a long moment before finally
speaking.
“Just a little distance away from here, and the prey gets
hunted.”
Her gaze naturally followed his direction to the dense forest.
It was a deep, foreboding place. The kind from which one
might never return if one ventured too far.
“Elise.”
At his call, she flinched and looked back at Cardale. For
some reason, his eyes seemed darker than they were just a
moment ago, like the shadowy forest itself.
“Stay where I tell you to. Nothing will happen if you do.”
He was telling her to wait here, but it felt like there was
another meaning behind his words. Regardless, Elise had no
intention of leaving this place without his permission, so she
obediently agreed.
Just then, Michael informed them that the hunting
preparations were complete, and Cardale gave an order.
“Stay with Elise.”
“Yes, my lord.”
Cardale looked her up and down, as if assessing her from
head to toe, before gripping the reins and turning his horse
toward the forest. Soon, the horses began to gallop.

Cardale was well aware that it had been a long time since
his last hunt.
‘There’s no need for hunting in the summer.’
He unconsciously found a good excuse. It was true that the
period from now until winter was the best time for hunting,
but in reality, it was just an excuse.
Just last spring, he had planned a summer hunt to control
the increased animal population due to his absence the
previous year.
As he entered the hunting grounds with his men, the forest
was shaded despite the midday sun. The autumn-tinted
trees made the forest appear more dangerous, but Cardale
didn’t bat an eye.
After confirming the familiar terrain, the direction of the
trees, and the position of the sun, he gave a short
command.
“Move to the centre.”

There was a brief stir among the soldiers. The look in their
eyes clearly showed their shock.
A seasoned huntsman, speaking on behalf of them all,
mustered up the courage to speak.
“D-Do you mean today, my lord?”
But his voice trembled involuntarily.
Cardale asked calmly, “If not today, then when?”
The huntsman clenched and unclenched his fists, feeling his
mouth go dry.
You must be aware of the situation, so why are you doing
this? 
His unease about the Duke’s sudden decision to hunt wasn’t
just a feeling.
He cautiously offered his opinion.
“B-But, my lord, the centre is too dangerous. It’s common
practice to start from the edge and move inward…”
But the Duke cut him off, showing no interest in his excuses.
“We’re hunting wolves and bears.”
There were gasps all around, but the master of the forest
remained unfazed.
“We’ll move the shortest distance. I’ll lead the way.”
“Y-Yes, Your Grace…”
The soldiers’ faces paled as if they were walking to their
graves.
Ignoring them, Cardale casually turned his head and gazed
into the depths of the forest as if he saw through it.
In the deep centre of the forest, there was a colony of silver
foxes. To harvest the finest furs in winter, it would be easier
to reduce their predators now.
Suddenly, he remembered the thin clothes Elise had been
wearing and frowned.
‘Silly woman, always feeling cold yet still doesn’t know how
to dress properly.’
She had been summoned hastily, but since he always
viewed the world through his own perspective, he judged
her based on his own preferences this time as well.
In any case, if she was to take walks in winter with that frail,
delicate body of hers. She would need warm, high-quality
clothes.
He briefly recalled the report that she never left her room
except when summoned, but quickly brushed it off.
It was likely just a temporary fear caused by how harshly he
had treated her lately. If he gradually eased up and showed
her affection, she would soon return to normal.
Arrogantly predicting the woman’s heart and future, he
prepared the rifle he had brought. Daylight in the forest was
short, so it was wise to hurry if he wanted to bag more
game.
Bang!
Not long after, a gunshot echoed through the forest.

By now, the late afternoon sun cast long shadows.
The air had changed noticeably since midday, and Michael
brought over a blanket and offered it to Elise.
“The day has grown quite chilly.”
“Thank you.”
She took the blanket and wrapped it around her shoulders,
feeling warmer.
“I’ll replace your tea.”
The tea, barely touched, had already gone cold.
Embarrassed, Elise’s ears turned red.
She had intended to drink it, out of respect for the person
who repeatedly brewed it for her, but she had once again let
time slip by absentmindedly.
“I’m sorry, Sir Walter.”
“It’s no trouble at all. It’s my duty.”
Michael responded calmly, placing a steaming cup of tea
before her. Elise wrapped her hands around the warm cup,
biting her lip.
‘I should apologise to Sir Walter too…’
She found it difficult to bring up the topic, not just because
it reminded her of the distressing events from a few days
ago, but also because she feared he might not accept her
apology.
“I heard you went through some trouble because of me…”
After hesitating for a long time, she finally mustered the
courage to speak.
“I know it’s late to say this, but… I’m really sorry.”
At her apology, Michael shook his head.
“It was my mistake as well, so please don’t worry about it.
But if you’re concerned for me…”
He subtly smiled and gestured toward the table.
“Could you at least try a little of this?”
The luxurious desserts had barely been touched.
“I rushed to get them from a well-known shop, but if you
don’t eat them, I fear I’ll be scolded by His Grace again.”
Michael, not usually one to joke, made a playful remark.
Elise’s eyes widened in surprise, then she covered her
mouth and let out a small laugh. It was the first time she
had laughed in days.
She finally cut into a tender pudding and took a small bite.
“It’s delicious.”
Elise smiled, and Michael straightened his posture as he
looked toward something in the distance. Before she could
turn to see what it was, a deep voice reached her ears.
“Finish the rest inside.”
He had returned from the hunt without her noticing. Elise
quickly stood up.
“Your Grace.”
“You’ve been waiting patiently.”
“Yes…”
Her eyes naturally fell on his wrist. Seeing the cloth still tied
around it, she felt oddly relieved and happy. She
unconsciously took a step toward him.
“Stay there.”
Elise looked at Cardale in surprise. Her small, pale hand
clutched the fabric near her chest tightly. He frowned
slightly and spoke.
“I just finished hunting, so I must smell of blood.”
It almost sounded like he was concerned for her, and Elise
pressed her hand against her chest.
There was no way, it must be a misunderstanding. 
‘The Duke is still angry with me…’
But for some reason, her heart was racing.
“I-I’m fine.”
Trying to ignore her pounding heart, Elise spoke.
“I’ll untie the handkerchief for you.”
This time, Cardale didn’t stop her from approaching. He
simply lifted his arm.
Elise carefully untied the knot. The handkerchief was
surprisingly clean, with no trace of blood.
“The superstition about tying a handkerchief around the
wrist.”
She paused and looked up at him.
“I thought it was just an old tradition, but it seems to be
effective.”
It might have been just a coincidence, but she was happy.
She always wanted to be useful.
“I-I’ll do it again during the hunting festival.”
Her voice unconsciously rose a bit. Elise quickly added in a
quieter tone.
“If you need it, Your Grace…”
She worried that she might have overstepped, but
fortunately, his response was positive.
“Make sure it’s something that doesn’t get in the way.”
Only then did she feel relieved.
“Yes, I will.”
Once the knot was completely undone, Cardale extended
his hand to her. Elise hesitated, then took his hand.
The two of them walked together toward the mansion.
Normally, it would have been difficult for her to keep up with
his long strides, but Elise found it easy to match his pace
now.
As they walked, Cardale spoke, looking straight ahead.
“Prepare well. If I’m satisfied, you’ll receive the reward
you’ve been waiting for.”
The mention of a reward startled her, and she looked up at
him.
She remembered the last time he had said something
similar.
Back then, she had wished for only one thing. That wish had
not changed.
“Duke…”
Would you let me see my mother?
She wanted to ask, but the fear of being ridiculed kept her
silent. Her lips moved soundlessly.
“Yes.”
His low voice answered, as if he had read her mind.
Elise lowered her head, trying to hide the tears welling up in
her eyes.
“Th-Thank you…”
Even if His Grace’s anger hadn’t completely subsided, even
if she had to pay a higher price to earn his forgiveness, it
didn’t matter.
She truly didn’t mind. He was the only one who could
reunite her with her mother. He was her only salvation.
Elise wholeheartedly believed this.
And three days later, the day of the hunting festival finally
arrived.


Before leaving, Elise carefully put on the necklace that was
delicately placed on the dressing table.
The pendant necklace that held portraits of her mother in
her youth and herself as a child, was something she never
took off, except when spending the night with Cardale.
Elise clasped the pendant tightly with both hands and
murmured.
“I’ll be able to see you soon.”
There were many stories she wanted to share with her
mother and many questions about how she had been. Even
if they talked all night, it wouldn’t be enough time when
they met in a few days.
Elise tucked the necklace carefully inside her collar, making
sure it wasn’t visible.
Then she turned her gaze to a neatly folded handkerchief. It
was meant to be tied around her partner’s wrist, wishing
him victory at the hunting festival.
“It seems a bit rough. The embroidery is too small…”
Normally, the family crest or symbol would be embroidered,
but there were only three days left. So, Elise embroidered
Cardale’s initials—just two letters, and even those were very
small.
“What if he’s disappointed by how plain it looks…”
Perhaps a handkerchief with nothing on it would have been
better. As Elise was lost in indecision, Linda called out to
her.
“My lady, are you ready?”
“I-I’m coming out now…”
Elise hurriedly grabbed the handkerchief with the initials.
When she stepped outside, her eyes instinctively searched
for someone. Linda spoke cautiously as she stood beside
her.
“Today, Sir Walter and I will be accompanying you. So His
Grace will be riding in a different carriage with Sir Walter.”
“Oh…”
Elise felt a bit disappointed without realizing it, and then a
wave of self-contempt washed over her.
‘It’s not as if the Duke has to ride with me. Why do I keep
having such presumptuous thoughts?’
As she scolded herself, Cardale opened the door and
stepped inside.
‘The Duke…?’
Elise was startled but inwardly pleased, trying hard not to
show it.
On the way to the hunting grounds, Cardale sat with his
eyes closed as if deep in thought.
Thanks to that, she could steal glances at him as much as
she wanted. He was always dazzling, but he looked even
more handsome dressed in his hunting attire.
Then, she began to feel ashamed of her own appearance.
When the surge of shame and self-loathing made her grip
her skirt tightly, Cardale opened his eyes and their gazes
met.
Elise flinched as if caught doing something wrong. However,
instead of saying anything harsh, he asked a simple
question.
“Are you cold?”
“N-No, I’m fine.”
Despite her words, Elise couldn’t help but shrink back
slightly. Perhaps because he mentioned it, the air suddenly
felt a bit chilly.
“The temperature difference at the hunting grounds can be
large. Don’t take off your cloak.”
“I won’t.”
“And use a blanket if you need to.”
“Yes…”
She obediently replied, sneaking a glance at Cardale.
Thankfully, he didn’t seem to be in a bad mood.
“D-Do take care of yourself…”
His eyes narrowed slightly as if wondering what she was
trying to say. Elise was a bit nervous but still spoke up.
“Please don’t overdo it while hunting…”
She had heard about the hunt three days ago. No one had
been injured, but it had been a very dangerous hunt where
many wild beasts were caught.
‘Such luck doesn’t always follow…’
Elise hoped Cardale wouldn’t get hurt. No matter how much
he had hurt her, she still cared.
“I-I’ll pray to God that you don’t get hurt.”
Her hands were already clasped together as if in prayer.
There was no reply.
But Elise was content just not to hear any cold reprimands
or harsh words.

The royal hunting grounds were already bustling with
activity from the nobles who had arrived.
Elise hadn’t expected it, but Cardale helped her out of the
carriage.
Even though he was wearing gloves, Elise felt a little happy
to hold his hand. It felt like they had gone back to the old
days.
‘If this hunting festival ends well… maybe things will really
go back to the way they were.’
Hunting innocent animals was a sad thing, but she hoped
everything would go smoothly, so she could meet her
mother and mend her relationship with Cardale.
As Elise thought of the handkerchief she had brought along,
a small hope flickered within her.
“Your Grace.”
A man dressed as a royal attendant approached Cardale,
bowing his head. Despite being an attendant, his
movements were oddly disciplined.
“I have a report.”
The attendant handed him a letter. The envelope was clean
with nothing written on it or any markings on the seal.
Cardale opened the wax seal and checked the contents with
an impassive face, then murmured coldly.
“It seems the rats have already caught the scent of bread.”
“I’ll make the preparations.”
Michael immediately left the scene. The attendant who had
handed over the letter struck a match and burned the letter
on the spot, causing Elise to flinch.
Cardale noticed her reaction instantly. Seeing her slightly
pale cheeks, a brief look of frustration flashed across his
face.
She was frightened by the killing intent that ordinary people
wouldn’t even notice. And it wasn’t even directed at her.
He kept his gaze on his timid lover as he gave Linda an
order.
“Do not stray from the tent and tea party area. The Crown
Prince’s soldiers are guarding this zone, so there should be
no issues.”
It was an instruction to ensure Elise’s safety.
Linda bowed her head and responded respectfully.
“Yes, Duke.”
Cardale lightly placed his hand on Elise’s trembling
shoulder.
“Elise.”
“I’ll wait quietly.”
Even in this situation, she tried to say the right thing, which
was admirable.
“Good.”
He gently stroked her pale cheek. Seeing the color slowly
return to her face, he withdrew his hand, satisfied.
As soon as the hunt was over, he would arrange for her to
meet her mother. He would also give her the gift he had
bought during his last outing.
He would hold her in his arms and whisper to her that she
was forgiven.
Ah, she would be so delighted if he told her about her older
brother.
Cardale imagined the peaceful days that would come in the
days after the hunting festival, and lightly brushed her lips.
He saw her blue eyes widen in surprise.
She must be shocked. Even though they had shared their
nights since he returned, he hadn’t kissed her once.
“I’ll be back soon.”
Yet somehow, he found it hard to leave. For some reason, he
felt uneasy about leaving Elise behind.
Was it because of the danger?
Cardale had already secured a leverage point over the
Crown Prince. Therefore, this place, guarded by the Crown
Prince’s knights, was as safe as the Duke’s estate.
Elise’s survival and well-being were directly tied to the
Crown Prince’s political life.
Then why?
Why did he feel so unsettled? Why did it feel like he was
walking down a path of no return?
Cardale stared at her innocent, pure face once again.
Her round, gentle eyes, her slightly flushed cheeks, her
small, pretty lips.
“D-Duke, I… I was going to tie a handkerchief around your
wrist…”
“Later.”
Right now, it wasn’t the actual hunt, just a warm-up before
the main event, so the handkerchief should be tied then.
But Cardale knew, deep down.
This was just an excuse, and that his nerves were on edge,
leading him to reject her request because of the unsettling
feeling.
“Be safe.”
He turned away abruptly. He could feel her gaze following
him as he walked away, but he forced himself not to notice.
There was something he needed to focus on and finish first.
When he reached the designated spot, Michael was waiting
for him. The other men had probably already begun their
hunt.
Cardale mounted his horse, gripping the reins as he asked.
“Where is the target?”
“It’s not in an ideal location yet, but the wolfhounds are
driving it there, so it should be over soon.”
“Move in that direction.”
“Yes, my lord.”
The ravenous hounds would find it to be quite a good meal.
A cold smile formed on Cardale’s lips.

“Huff, huff! Huff…!”
Fritz was tearing through the forest path, running like a
madman.
His clothes were ripped, and his skin was scratched by
rough branches and leaves, but he didn’t have time to care.
The howls of fierce wolves echoed, sometimes near and
sometimes far.
“damn it, damn it…”
Curses spilled from his mouth, tasting of blood.
He had already lost his sense of direction. He had no idea
where he was.
All he could do was run desperately to escape the sounds
chasing him.
‘damn it, where the hell are the soldiers?’
He had wandered the hunting grounds for what felt like
ages, but couldn’t find a single imperial soldier. And now, he
was being pursued by what must be a pack of wolves.
‘damn it, if those things catch me, I’ll be torn apart and
eaten alive!’
Fritz ran and ran until his breath caught in his throat.
Not realizing that he was being driven like prey into a
corner.
Then, a sheer cliff suddenly appeared before him,

Fritz felt a shocking wave of despair, as if his heart had
stopped.
“N-No way…”
He turned around hastily. But the wolfhounds were already
emerging one by one from the thick underbrush.
The hungry beasts bared their fangs, drool dripping from
their jaws.
A chill ran up his spine, and a cold sweat broke out on his
forehead. His heart pounded so hard that it felt like it would
leap out of his throat.
“damn it, damn it. I can’t die like this.” Fritz frantically
brought out the gun he had slung over his back.
But he wasn’t much of a hunter, and today, he hadn’t even
come to hunt. There was no way he had come prepared.
‘I was just planning to meet that foolish woman, get the
money, and leave…!’
There was no time to retrace where things had gone wrong.
His mind was on the verge of collapsing. His head was filled
with nothing but the terror of his impending death and the
instinct to survive.
‘Quick, quick…’
His trembling arms struggled to load the bullets. But, of
course, the beasts wouldn’t wait.
Before he could even finish loading his weapon, a large
wolfhound lunged at him, knocking his gun out of his hands
with the weight of its entire body.
“Argh!”
The gun slipped from Fritz’s grasp and fell off the cliff.
A few seconds later, the sound of the gun shattering against
the rocks below echoed dully up the cliff, making Fritz’s hair
stand on end.
“Just… it’s just some mangy dogs…!”
He shouted defiantly, but his voice had already shrunk to a
pitiful whimper. He drew the sword from his belt and gripped
it with both hands, but the blade still wavered uncontrollably
from side to side.
“Help! Somebody, please…!”
He screamed with all his might. He couldn’t die a
meaningless death here. It would be better to be caught for
treason and face a proper trial.
“Is there no one? Is there no one at all?!”
Not even that damn Vassenberg bastard is going to show
up…
“I see everything from here.”

A voice pierced his ears, and Fritz’s eyes flew open. His
frantic gaze darted around, filled with confusion and fear.
The man who walked out with steady steps was a familiar
face.
The perfect timing of his appearance sent chills down Fritz’s
spine. It was as if he had heard the voice in Fritz’s head and
appeared.
“C-Cardale Vassenberg…”
His voice trembled miserably, revealing the state of his
shattered mind. The man noticed and curled his lips slightly.
“Oh dear, it seems the hunt hasn’t been enjoyable for you?”
Enjoyable?
For a moment, Fritz thought the Duke had gone mad.
Couldn’t he see how messed up he was? Didn’t he realise he
had been driven to the edge of this cliff by a pack of beasts?
Or was he mocking and laughing at his current state?
Anger surged so suddenly that he almost forgot that this
was the man who ruthlessly hunted down and executed
traitors.
“damn it, if you have eyes, use them! These wolfhounds…!”
Just then, a bolt of realisation struck Fritz’s mind.
The shock hit him like a giant hammer to the back of his
head, and his body froze like stone. His face turned pale as
if all the blood had drained from it.
Grrrr…
The wolfhounds bared their sharp teeth and growled
menacingly at Fritz, like well-trained dogs.
No way. damn it, this can’t be real.
But as he stared at the beasts, he already knew the answer.
His pointing arm trembled like a leaf.
His teeth chattered, and his whole body shook as if he were
cold. Fritz reluctantly tore his gaze away from the beasts
and looked at Cardale. The man’s lips were curved in a cruel
smile.
It was the smile of a merciless butcher.
“It seems you’re the one who didn’t use his eyes, Fritz
Schuvan.”
Fritz recognized that smile. It was the one he used to give
Elise. And he had always believed he would remain in that
position.
Being chased and rolling in the dirt, begging and pleading
for his life, was something that only happened in the lives of
lowly dogs. It was unthinkable for someone of noble birth
like him.
But there was only one reason he was going through this.
“Elise… That arrogant bitch set me up and trapped me…”
Blinded by rage, Fritz finally lost his mind. His clouded
thoughts forgot who was in front of him. Vile curses spilled
from his mouth.
“I should have killed her with a stone. I raised her to be a
proper lady in the Duke’s bed, and this is how she repays
me?”

“damn it, I should have thrown her in a brothel to earn some
money instead of… Argh!”
Fritz let out a scream as blood poured from his bitten arm.
Gripping his wounded arm, he glared at the Duke with
bloodshot eyes and shouted.
“You coward-”
“Falling to your death is too easy a death for you, isn’t it?”
“Wha… what?”
“I almost showed you too much mercy.”
The man, having said all he needed to, raised his hand.
Reflected in Fritz’s wide-open eyes were the wolfhounds,
baring their sharp teeth as they closed in from all sides.
Soon, the cliff echoed with the tortured, agonised screams
of a man being devoured alive, and the sound of beasts
feasting on fresh meat filled the air for some time.
When the wolfhounds had finished, leaving not a trace of
what had once been a man, the surroundings grew quiet
again, as if nothing had happened.
The subordinates reported to him that the wolfhounds had
been taken care of.
“Your Grace.”
“Let’s go.”
The man who had seen everything turned away without
hesitation.
He had taken out the trash himself. Though it was a task too
trivial and vile for him, it had been worth it.
Now he could bring a true brother to his woman.
‘That arrogant bastard.’
Nothing had ever annoyed him as much as the words of that
dog, now food for wolves. The bastard was nothing
compared to Elise, except for his status.
Yet the woman had lived a miserable life because of the
label of being a bastard. Her engagement to Raymond
Hartmann had been broken off because of her status.
Even though he had used that weakness to seize Elise,
Cardale found that he wasn’t satisfied with it.

She wasn’t taking the contraceptives anymore. At least for
now, he didn’t intend to abandon Elise Schuvan.
So wouldn’t she need a proper status?
That’s why he was secretly supporting Damian’s succession
to the earldom.

Elise stared blankly at Cardale’s retreating figure.
‘He didn’t take the handkerchief…’
He said, “Later,” but that was probably just his way of
declining.
‘The maids like Linda must have told him how clumsy and
ugly my embroidery is.’
Even as she thought that, Elise couldn’t stop looking at
Cardale.
She desperately hoped he would stop and look back, and
tell her to tie the handkerchief around his wrist.
But he never looked back, nor did he call her to tie her
blessing.
When Cardale’s figure finally shrank to a dot and
disappeared from view, Elise lowered her gaze to the
ground.
‘I shouldn’t feel disappointed. It’s only natural he wouldn’t
want to wear something like this in front of so many
nobles…’
No one would want to receive a handkerchief with such
clumsy embroidery at a grand event like this, especially if it
was in the Duke’s estate.
Yet, tears welled up in Elise’s eyes, and she bit her lower lip.
It hurt, but the real pain was elsewhere.
Her heart felt like it was being pricked by the same needle
she used for the embroidery.
If she embroidered whenever she got hurt, wouldn’t her
heart be an ugly mess of black thread?
Meanwhile, Linda looked at Elise with pity as she couldn’t
pull herself together.
The Duke was an unpredictable man. Cold, self-centred, and
sometimes even capricious. So the fragile lady was always
shaken and ended up hurt.
Linda asked cautiously,
“My lady, are you alright?”
Elise seemed to snap out of her deep thoughts and flinched
before looking up at her.
“Yes, yes…! I-I’m fine.”
Even trying to smile as if nothing was wrong was pitiful.
“Um, could you show me to the tea party venue that His
Grace mentioned earlier?”
The tea party venue was probably quite crowded by now. It
wasn’t the kind of place the timid Elise preferred.
But Linda didn’t want to ignore the lady’s effort to be brave.
“Of course. Please, follow me.”
As she led the way, Linda gave Elise some advice. After all,
she was from a noble family herself, even if she was only a
low-ranking member.
“If someone asks you something unpleasant or difficult,
don’t feel the need to answer…”
Elise listened carefully and then asked,
“What if I make a mistake?”
“Don’t worry too much. I’ll be right by your side to help
you.”
“Thank you, that reassures me a little.”
Seeing the lady sigh in relief, Linda smiled warmly.
They were almost at the party venue when Linda’s sharp
eyes spotted someone, and she furrowed her brow.
‘Is that…?’
The distance was too great to be sure.
But when Princess Theresia appeared and began conversing
with someone, Linda’s unease turned to certainty. A chill ran
down her spine.
‘This is bad. We need to leave right now.’
Linda naturally took Elise’s arm and turned her around,
making sure she couldn’t see the two people.
“My lady.”
“Yes?”
“I just remembered, we need to stop by the Vassenberg
family tent first.”
Fortunately, Elise nodded without any protest.
As they left the party venue, Linda’s face suddenly
hardened.
The person she just discovered is Victoria Vassenberg.
None other than the Duchess herself.

Linda’s steps were faster than usual. She knew she was
rushing too much, but she couldn’t seem to control herself.
‘Why is the Duchess here…?’
The moment Linda spotted Victoria Vassenberg, she felt as if
a lurking danger had suddenly reared its head. Her alertness
was razor-sharp.
‘I must make sure Miss Elise doesn’t encounter her.’
Immediately after Victoria Vassenberg’s visit to the Duke’s
mansion, where she left empty-handed, Cardale had issued
very detailed instructions to his servants regarding Elise
Schuvan.
Among those instructions was the explicit order to block all
attempts by the Duchess to approach her.
‘How did she manage to attend the hunt? If it was due to
Princess Theresia, her influence should be waning.’
With the planned marriage to a foreign royal, Princess
Theresia’s power had significantly diminished.
Avoiding detection by the Duke and bringing the Duchess to
the hunt would be difficult even for the princess.
‘Then who could it be…?’
Frowning, Linda glanced at the young lady beside her, who
was diligently following her pace.
Despite the fast pace, Elise showed no overt signs of
discomfort. Perhaps because she was told to hurry, or
perhaps because she was naturally good at hiding her
exhaustion.
Seeing Elise’s flushed cheeks and slightly parted lips, Linda
slowed her pace. Fortunately, they were almost at their
destination.
“I apologize, Miss Elise. I’ve been walking too quickly.”
“No, it’s alright.”
Elise shook her head immediately, but couldn’t hide her
slight panting. Embarrassed, she blushed and offered an
awkward smile typical of her age. Linda spoke gently, like an
older sister.
“Now that we’re nearly there, we can go a bit slower. Ah,
there it is.”
The tents were arranged according to the status of the
families, with the Vassenberg Duke’s tent being centrally
located in a sunny area. It was the most accessible and was
the safest spot.
Linda checked the tall fence surrounding the area and the
soldiers stationed at regular intervals before feeling a bit of
relief.
“This is it, Lady Elise. You may enter and rest inside.”
She lifted the tent’s flap as she spoke.
“You must be tired from the early preparations. Feel free to
take a short nap if you’d like.”
“Yes? B-but…”
Elise, with her blue eyes wide open, began to fidget with the
tips of her fingers—a habit she had when nervous or
anxious.
“I was supposed to wait for the Duke…”
Linda understood Elise’s concern about possibly incurring
the Duke’s displeasure for acting without permission.
However, as long as Elise was within the designated area,
she was allowed to do as she pleased.
‘Lady Elise still doesn’t know the Duke well.’
Thus, Linda gently persuaded Elise.
“The Duke will take some time to finish his work. I’ll inform
you before he returns, so there’s no need to worry.”
“Then… please do. Thank you, Linda.”
Finally reassured, Elise entered the tent.
Once Elise was fully inside, Linda stood at the flap, carefully
surveying the surroundings.
She planned to wait here until the Duke returned. No risks
could be taken with Lady Elise, especially with the Duke’s
mood so volatile at the moment.
However, soon after, Linda muttered with a sigh.
“…No help from anyone.”
Victoria Vassenberg was walking directly toward them.

Inside the tent, Elise was pleasantly surprised by how cozy
and spacious it was compared to her expectations.
It was much warmer inside, likely due to the central brazier.
At the far end of the tent was a bed, and the arrangement of
the room included a rectangular dining table with chairs, a
couch, a low drawer, and a desk. The floor was covered with
a rug.
“It’s hard to believe this is just a small room…”
Elise idly traced the ornate patterns on the candleholder,
marveling at the warm light it cast.
After taking a turn around the tent, she decided against
sitting on the neatly made bed. Instead, she carefully sat on
one side of the long couch. The cushions were remarkably
soft, which surprised her once more.
‘It’s as if they brought everything from the Duke’s mansion.’
Alone now, Elise instinctively took out the locket from inside
her dress and opened it.
Inside was a portrait of her mother with a sad smile. She
avoided looking at the face of the joyful child beside her, as
it was painful to see.
Elise felt overwhelmed with guilt, believing she had caused
her mother’s suffering and subsequent death. She couldn’t
bear the thought of her mother’s life being ruined because
of her.
Elise continued to gaze at her mother’s face, clasping the
locket tightly as if praying.
Tears had already started to gather beneath her eyes.
“…I’ll set you free, Mother.”
The tears fell onto her hands as they could no longer bear
their weight.
Elise had known for a long time that her mother could only
find happiness if she left her behind. She was the obstacle,
the trap, and the stumbling block in her mother’s life.
Yet she couldn’t imagine life without her mother. To a child,
a mother is everything. Even knowing that she was causing
her mother’s slow decline, Elise clung desperately to her.
The deep-seated self-loathing and self-hatred Elise felt were
due to this.
“You wanted to see the sea… you said it was as blue as our
eyes and sparkled…”
Elise murmured, remembering her mother’s dream of seeing
the sea, just as Marissa dreamed of the night sky in the
slums.
She kept it close to her heart as her own dream.
“I’ll speak to the Duke… and I’ll make sure to grant that
wish…”
She was glad to be in the Vassenberg mansion, able to meet
Cardale, and even get the opportunity to attend the hunt
despite her mistakes.
She was grateful to be able to make amends for taking her
mother’s life.
‘When the Duke returns… maybe if I beg for him to accept
the handkerchief, he might…’
She thought she might be able to persuade him to accept a
more carefully embroidered handkerchief next time.
And when Cardale was out hunting, she planned to attend
the tea party. She could endure any insults; after all, she
was used to bearing hardships.
As Elise’s thoughts flowed, her eyes slowly closed.
Her upright body began to lean back against the couch, her
head dropping.
She tried to resist sleep, but the silence and the comfort of
the seat made her fatigue overwhelming.
She fell asleep in an instant.
Thus, Elise didn’t realise that someone had entered the tent
without permission, or that this person was helping her to
fall into a deeper slumber.
She didn’t notice the sensations of her body being carried or
the vibrations of a carriage travelling on uneven roads.
She was unaware of anything.

The child was sound asleep in a separate annex, exhausted
from the unusually tiring day.
Fritz, having treated the illegitimate child of the family as
his personal toy, had tormented her with even more cruelty
than usual. Her swollen cheeks and bloodied lips hinted at
what she had endured.
Yet for at least tonight, Fritz would not invade her dreams.
Elise slipped into a peaceful slumber, nestled in her
mother’s arms.
She did not see her mother silently rise from the bed,
retrieve a pre-packed bundle, nor did she feel the cool night
air seeping through the open window.
“Elise, wake up.”
Her mother whispered gently, shaking her.
“Elise.”
“Mm…”
The girl stirred, struggling to open her eyes.
“Oh… Mother?”
“Yes, hurry darling. We need to move quickly.”
It was hard for one so young to grasp the situation
immediately, but something about her mother’s shadowy
face in the dark frightened her, jolting her fully awake. It
was still the middle of the night.
Her heart suddenly sank. A nameless fear clawed at her
young mind.
“Listen carefully, my dear.”
Her mother Marissa held her trembling daughter by the
shoulders, meeting her gaze.
But truly, Elise wasn’t looking into her mother’s eyes— she
was watching a moonless, pitch black night, and all was
shrouded in deep shadow.
“We are leaving here.”

Elise didn’t respond, only widened her eyes in shock. She
didn’t fully understand the meaning of her mother’s words,
but she sensed the danger.
‘Did the Count approve of this?’ she wanted to ask but
dared not voice it.
Suddenly, there was a loud rattle as someone yanked at
their locked door.
“Ah…!” Elise almost screamed, but Marissa’s hand covered
her mouth. Gripping her hand tightly, Marissa pulled Elise
toward the window.
Run!
From there, the memories blurred. All she remembered was
running wildly under the dark sky, clinging desperately to
her mother’s hand.
Somewhere along the way, she lost one of her shoes but
had no time to retrieve it.
Suddenly, a glow lit up behind them. Like a moth drawn to a
flame, Elise glanced back instinctively.
Bright, towering flames devoured their former dwelling,
blazing red against the dark sky. She thought she heard
hunting dogs barking in the distance and the angry shouts
of men.
“This way, dear!”
Her mother’s urgent voice echoed like a plea as she pulled
Elise forward. Her glance swung back ahead, her mind
fleeing from the flames to focus on their escape.
“We’re almost there…”
But then, Elise noticed it—a dark, ominous shadow following
close behind them, creeping towards their footsteps.
She couldn’t bring herself to tell her mother as they ran so
desperately for a new life.
Instead, she gripped her mother’s hand tightly, a silent
prayer echoing in her heart.
Let mother’s choice be the right one. 
Let this shadow, this trap, be nothing but a worry. 
Please, please…
Birdsong drifted through a cracked window, filling the quiet
room.
Elise’s senses returned slowly, more sluggish than usual.
She heard the chirping of birds, then felt crisp sheets around
her body.
It struck her, even in her groggy state, that neither of these
sensations were familiar.
Her room at Cardale’s mansion was always so quiet it felt
empty, and the bedding was soft and light, almost
weightless.
‘That’s right, I went to the hunting festival.’
Drowsy logic filled in the blanks, but she soon noticed
something odd.
‘But I was sitting on a couch…’
Did the Duke carry her to bed? No, Linda was supposed to
wake her. And what about the birdsong?
‘Birdsong?’
With a jolt, she snapped awake. Her eyes flew open as she
forced herself to look around, her mind sharply clearing.

At that moment, Elise thought she must still be dreaming.
But no matter how hard she tried to blink away the
confusion, nothing changed. Her senses only grew sharper.
Now, a strange feeling crept over her. Hesitantly, Elise sat
up, her wary gaze scanning the room.
It wasn’t a large room.
But it was fully furnished with all the necessities—a bed,
nightstand, table, chair, sofa, small desk, dresser, and a
partitioned-off wardrobe area. Every softly colored piece
seemed arranged to make the space feel cozy and
welcoming.
Yet, there was one peculiar detail.
It made Elise find this room stifling and uneasy.
‘Only one window…’
And it was small and positioned unusually high, almost as if
meant to trap someone inside.
“Ah…”
The thought made Elise cover her mouth with both hands.
Her skin prickled with goosebumps.
Then, she heard it—the soft click of the door handle turning.
She held her breath, her hands trembling as they pressed
against her mouth.
Please, let my fears be wrong. Let this be nothing but a
foolish fantasy.
Let it be the Duke stepping through that door.
But her desperate wish shattered.
“Elise, you’re awake.”
The man’s green eyes grew a little larger upon seeing her,
then softened with a gentle smile.
“How are you feeling?” 
Raymond asked, his smile deepening. In that moment, Elise
felt her heart sink into an abyss.

Linda hurried to block Victoria’s path.
“It’s been a while, Madam.”
Her greeting was impeccably courteous, yet Victoria
sneered.
“You don’t look pleased to see me.”
“My lord is concerned for her safety in many ways. I ask for
your understanding.”
“Safety? Whose safety?”
Linda didn’t answer. Seeing she wouldn’t get the response
she wanted, Victoria’s face twisted in irritation.
But the seasoned head maid had no intention of broaching
the subject of her master’s mistress, even though they both
knew of Elise Schuvan’s existence.
After a tense silence, Victoria eventually changed the topic,
though she clearly hadn’t given up.
“I intend to rest briefly in the tent. Would you guide me?”
Linda was well prepared for this request.
“The tent reserved for you is in the eastern sector, as I was
informed.”
“This is the tent of my family by birth. Have you forgotten
that my title is Vassenberg?”
“I am well aware of my lord’s generosity,” Linda replied with
unflinching composure, her eyes lowered respectfully.
“Had he not been, my lord would indeed be the sole
Vassenberg by now.”
Victoria’s face contorted with rage at the pointed remark.
“Are you implying that I should be grateful simply because
he hasn’t stripped me of the family name?”
“Not at all. I merely suggest there may be a place better
suited for you.”
“Ridiculous.”
Victoria’s lips curled in derision. Sensing her gaze drifting
toward the tent behind her, Linda subtly moved to block the
view.
“Why? Is that wench inside?”
Victoria no longer bothered with pretenses.
Now that her true intentions were revealed, she could
become unpredictable. Understanding this, Linda issued a
polite but firm warning.
“The Duke will be returning shortly.”
“Oh, so you think to frighten me by tattling to my son?”
Scoffing, Victoria clicked her tongue and, without a second
glance, turned and walked away.
Such an abrupt retreat seemed out of character, making
Linda narrow her eyes. Did mentioning the Duke actually
work?
But if she were so easily deterred, the Duke’s staff would
not be so wary of her.

A chill ran through Linda. She spun around and looked at the
tent.
It was still there, just as before.
“No…”
The next moment, she was sprinting toward the tent.
Something was different. She could feel it

As soon as Linda pulled aside the partition and looked inside
the tent, her heart sank.
“Elise!”
The space was empty. She looked outside, but with most
nobles attending social gatherings, the area was eerily
quiet, devoid of any people.
She quickly called for the patrolling guards.
“What seems to be the matter?”
“The one I serve has gone missing. She is the lady of the
Schuvan family.”
“The Count Schuvan’s family…”
Realizing who Linda was referring to, the guards’ faces
changed. The mistress of the Duke was considered a special
security priority.
“Please wait here! We will report this immediately and begin
a search.”
One guard hurried away, while the other attempted to
reassure Linda.
“It’s common for guests unfamiliar with the layout to lose
their way among the tents. I’m sure it’s nothing serious.”
However, the guard’s anxious expression did little to ease
her worry.
Within moments, dozens of guards arrived as reinforcement.
“Other than the Lady Vassenberg, no lady has exited this
area in the past twenty minutes.”
That information was a relief, however small. If Elise was
still somewhere nearby, she could be found. If she was still
here…
“If she returns, please wait at the Duke’s tent. We will escort
her to you as soon as we locate her.”
“Thank you. Please hurry.”
The guards spread out, organized into search groups that
fanned out in all directions.
Returning inside the tent, Linda opened an ink bottle on the
desk.
Whether Elise had merely wandered outside and lost her
way, or if something else was at play, Linda still hoped for
nothing more than a minor incident.
But she couldn’t ignore the ominous feeling gnawing at her.
“If, by chance, she has left the premises…”
Linda tore a piece of paper and scribbled a short message.
She tied it to a messenger hawk’s leg and released it.
She didn’t care if she’d be reprimanded for troubling her
master. If it came to that point, at least the worst could be
averted.
“Find Sir Walter immediately, do you understand?”
The hawk took off, heading in the direction of the forest.
Lowering her gaze with a sigh, Linda’s thoughts returned to
the sudden visit of Lady Vassenberg. She had an uneasy
feeling from that moment on.
“Other than Lady Vassenberg, no lady has exited the area in
the past twenty minutes.”
Could it be…
When Lady Vassenberg had arrived, Linda had been
standing with her back to the tent, stepping further from the
entrance to block her path.
‘What if her arrival was a ruse to hide Elise’s abduction?’
A chill ran down her spine.
When had the trap been set?
From the moment Lady Vassenberg arrived?
Linda found her answer and bit her lip hard.
‘From the moment I saw the Princess and Lady Vassenberg
at the party.’
The entire situation had been orchestrated to bring Elise
and her to this point.
At that moment, a guard approached to update her on the
search progress.
“We have received permission from other families to search
inside their tents…”
“Are you certain no one has left this area?” she interrupted,
asking once again.
The guard hesitated.
“There… is only one exit.”
Hearing this, Linda’s suspicion solidified.
Elise was no longer here.

The report reached the Duke as he was returning on
horseback after erasing Fritz Schuvan’s existence
completely.
He fell into a frightening silence.
Michael, who read the message first, held his breath under
the Duke’s deadly atmosphere.
Why now, of all times?
The timing could not have been worse. Regardless of
whether Elise’s disappearance was by choice or coercion,
the aftermath would be devastating.
Finally, after a tense silence, the Duke spoke.
“It seems we’ll need the wolfhounds.”
His crimson eyes glinted chillingly.

While Michael and the Duke’s soldiers tracked Elise’s trail,
Cardale received the situation report from Linda.
“So, my mother has made her appearance.”
Last summer, Lady Victoria Vassenberg had announced that
she’d be staying at a friend’s estate. Since it was outside
the capital, he allowed minimal surveillance, choosing to
leave her be.
Her sudden month-long silence had raised suspicion. But
now she’d evaded his watchful eyes and joined forces with
the Princess, to appear so boldly before him.
‘How tiresome.’
The Princess and Lady Vassenberg were mirrors of each
other in their relentless schemes.
Cardale acknowledged that his approach toward them had
been overly restrained. If conventional methods wouldn’t
suffice, then he would have to deal with them on their
terms.
Crushing others was something he excelled at.
“Your Grace.”
An aide delivered new information.
“The Little Marquis of Hartmann is on the guest list for the
hunting festival. However, he is currently nowhere to be
found.”
It was unsurprising if Raymond Hartmann had indeed taken
Elise.
“Lady Vassenberg, the Princess, and the Little Marquis… no,
perhaps…”
A smirk twisted one corner of Cardale’s lips.
“Not three, but four.”
There were two traitors whose names hadn’t been handed
to the Emperor. With Fritz Schuvan eliminated, that left one
more.
“How fitting of an opportunist to propose an alliance and
then betray it.”
He’d considered keeping a puppet in place to avoid the
hassle of finding their replacement. But now, Cardale
decided to discard that idea altogether.
For him, deception against him was unforgivable—there had
only ever been one exception.
“Your Grace, footprints have been found!”
The wolfhounds had all pointed in the same direction, and
as they stepped past the grassy area around the tents,
footprints appeared on the damp ground.

Cardale’s eyes narrowed as he examined the set of large
footprints alongside a smaller set.
The aides who followed also swallowed nervously upon
seeing the tracks.
A kidnapping would have left only one set of footprints.
Furthermore, there were no signs of struggle.
The parallel prints looked as though two people had walked
hand-in-hand.
‘Could she have escaped willingly…?’
Even Michael, at a loss for words, swallowed back his
question.
Whether or not Elise was capable of such an action, it was
true that the Duke had recently been harsh with her.
Fear, desperation, and perhaps a moment of seduction
could have swayed her judgment.
“Your Grace.”
Michael cautiously addressed him. The Duke kneeled to
inspect the ground, then spoke.
“These are not Elise’s footsteps.”
“…Excuse me?”
“The stride is different. This is a staged scene.”
Cardale rose, continuing his assessment.
“The man’s footprints are particularly deep. He must have
carried Elise in his arms.”
Could he really deduce this about owner of these prints so
precisely? Yet none dared question Cardale, who radiated
such certainty.
Cardale followed the footprints until he stopped by a treelined path, where the large trunks formed a shaded archway
overhead.
“A carriage awaited them here.”
He gazed coldly at the path the carriage had taken, his stare
sharp enough to chill the air.
Yet after a brief moment, he turned away without hesitation.
“Are we not pursuing them?”
“It’s pointless. They’ve erased their trail by now.”
Walking back to the hunting festival grounds, Cardale issued
his next command.
“Proceed as planned.”
“And Lady Elise…?”
“After everything is dealt with.”
The unexpected directive left Michael internally startled.
Of course, the Duke was meticulous about his priorities. He
always acted according to importance, and this seemed no
different.
‘But he has always made exceptions for her.’
He could no longer read his master’s mind.
Despite the chilling tension upon hearing of Elise’s
disappearance, the Duke now appeared surprisingly
composed.
Yet Cardale rarely showed his emotions openly, so it was
impossible to discern his true thoughts.
“The Emperor will soon declare the start of the hunt.
Prepare yourself.”
“Yes, Your Grace.”
After Michael and the aides left to finalize his plans, Cardale
entered the tent alone.
He noticed the slightly indented couch and the blanket that
had fallen beneath it.
The place where Elise had likely last rested.

His expression remained impassive, but his eyes blazed with
intensity.
It had been a while since he had felt such a surge of wrath.
Unable to completely control his urge for revenge, he
inhaled deeply before slowly exhaling.
The only thing that kept him from breaking was the
knowledge that Elise was likely safe.
But the thought of her under another’s care was
unbearable.
Ah, it seemed blood would indeed need to be shed.
Cardale loaded his pistol.

The Emperor Johann stood atop the podium and declared
the start of the hunting festival.
Participants mounted their horses with shouts of excitement
and set off into the forest, eager to capture fierce and
powerful beasts to claim victory.
Meanwhile, Cardale watched the nobles with a cold gaze. In
truth, he was calculating the movements and paths of his
prey rather than simply observing.
The Emperor approached on a white horse adorned with a
golden saddle.
“Aren’t you going to join the hunt, Duke?”
His pretense of innocence was almost laughable.
“Feel free to proceed ahead of me.”
“I’m not keen on turning my back to others.”
It was a blatant indication of distrust, but Cardale barely
blinked.
“Amusing, isn’t it?” he replied, his words laced with
meaning.
“No matter how alert one tries to be, they often fail to
notice what’s beneath their feet.”
“What do you mean by that…?”
“Is everything I requested in place?”
Instead of answering, Cardale changed the subject. The
Emperor, unable to mask his unease, nodded.
“I stationed the soldiers as you asked. Are you sure it will be
enough? If you need additional support…”
“Unnecessary personnel would only be a hindrance.”
Cardale dismissed the offer, lightly kicking his stirrups. The
hunting rifle slung over his shoulder felt weightless.
“Oh, by the way…”
He halted his horse after a few paces and glanced back at
the Emperor.
“Must they be captured alive?”
Though his tone was calm to the point of indifference, the
implication was lethal. Emperor Johann swallowed nervously.
“Summary execution isn’t permissible. Imperial law
demands a trial.”
“A shame.”
Cardale’s response held a hint of genuine regret. His
unsettling words clashed with his refined appearance,
striking a jarring contrast.
Anxious that things might spiral out of control, Johann
quickly added, “Remember Duke, this isn’t a battlefield.”
“I am aware.”
‘That’s why I’m holding back,’ Cardale muttered to himself,
running a finger along the cold barrel of his gun.
“I’ll ensure their lives are spared as you requested.”
“Duke Vassenberg!”
Before the Emperor could say anything further, Cardale
spurred his horse forward, his men following in swift pursuit.
“Your Grace.”
“We’ll sweep from the right in a counterclockwise direction.”
“Yes, sir.”
Shortly after, the previously quiet forest erupted with the
sounds of the hunt.
Bang!
With every shot from Cardale’s rifle, his aim was flawless,
each shot hitting its mark with deadly accuracy. Horrific
screams echoed through the trees.
Yet the forest was so vast and dense that it quickly absorbed
the cries of the fallen.
Whether the source of those agonizing sounds was a rabbit,
deer, fox, boar, wolf, bear—or perhaps a human—no one but
the hunters knew.

By late afternoon, it was time for the hunters to return.
However, as over ten participants failed to reappear after
the event’s end, whispers of concern rippled through the
crowd.
“Could there have been an accident?”
“This many people missing?”
Those who had worried would later think an accident might
have been preferable.
For they would never forget the sight that met their eyes.
The latecomers were dragged back, all in a pitiful state—
hair disheveled, shoes missing, clothes in tatters. Blood
gushed from gunshot wounds on their limbs that they
clutched in pain, groaning and trembling.
In contrast, the noble-looking man who brought them was
pristine, not a single speck of dirt on him. He approached
the Emperor with a faint, unsettling smile.
“By your order, Your Majesty, I have apprehended all traitors
to the Empire.”
That evening, several esteemed nobles of Nordrat were
arrested.
Their charge was conspiracy with enemy nations—a crime
tantamount to treason.

As the hunting festival began in excitement and ended in a
shocking scandal. Inside a carriage, Raymond held a
sleeping Elise close, burying his face in her delicate neck,
exuding a faint fragrance.
“Elise…”
Eyes brimming with adoration, he looked at his ‘fiancée,’
feeling he could finally breathe again. He had endured
everything for this moment.
As he continued to gaze down at her with overwhelming
emotion, he heard the coachman’s voice.
“My lord.”
The carriage’s speed slowed until it came to a full stop.
Through the partially open window, the coachman’s face
looked troubled.
“What’s going on?”
“The road ahead is blocked. Another checkpoint, it seems.”
Raymond’s brow furrowed.
At each checkpoint, soldiers were verifying the identities of
travelers. This was their last route to take as all exits from
the capital were closed off.
‘The Princess was right. The Duke moved far quicker than I
anticipated.’
Initially, when Princess Theresia had predicted all this,
Raymond had been skeptical.
There was always a delay in communication. By the time
the Duke realized Elise was missing, they would be safely
inside the carriage, with too little time to intervene.
But now, he felt relieved he had prepared a backup plan.
“We’ll head to the safe house.”
“Yes, my lord.”
The best option had been to leave the capital immediately
with Elise, but the alternative was acceptable.
In fact, this might even be a better setting for her to adjust
to.
The carriage sped through the outskirts of the capital and
arrived at a secluded estate.
The two-story house was hidden from view, even to
passersby, and had been meticulously prepared by
Raymond as a safe retreat.
It was stocked with all the necessary supplies they would
need, making it suitable for an extended stay until a new
escape route could be found.
Cradling Elise gently, Raymond carried her out of the
carriage and into the house, heading up to the bedroom he
had prepared just for her.
“I tried to make it as comfortable as possible, in case it was
ever needed. I hope it suits your tastes.”
As he ascended the stairs, he spoke to her as though she
could hear him, even though she remained unconscious
from the sedative.
“The small, high window may be an inconvenience, but
that’s simply how safe houses must be. I hope you’ll
understand.”
Raymond laid her on the soft bed and covered her with a
blanket up to her neck, whispering as he stroked her hair.
“I’m sorry, Elise. It seems the sedative I used was a bit
strong—I didn’t want to frighten you.”
Staring at her sleeping face, he murmured, “I can’t wait for
you to wake up so I can see those beautiful blue eyes.”
He resisted the urge to lift her eyelids himself.
It would only be a few hours. He’d already waited months,
so this was nothing.
After tucking her in, he leaned down and kissed her pale
forehead.
“Sweet dreams, Elise.”
With the expectation of seeing her awake by morning,
Raymond retired to the adjacent room for some rest.
His anticipation woke him at dawn, and he prepared
breakfast in the kitchen. Since he had not hired servants for
security reasons, he had to take care of the daily chores on
his own.
He didn’t know her food preferences, but he didn’t worry;
considering her background, she likely wasn’t very picky.
With breakfast ready, Raymond carried the tray upstairs. By
the time he reached her door, the sun had fully risen.
Noble families usually awoke later in the day, but he
thought she might already be up given her background.
As he expected, Elise was already sitting up in bed. He took
a moment to savor the sight of her blue eyes landing on
him, her expression a mix of surprise and apprehension.
“Ah, Elise. You’re awake.”
Her beautiful blue eyes widened as she looked at him.
Of course, she must be surprised. Smiling kindly, Raymond
asked, “How are you feeling?”
There was no response. Instead, her face turned pale with
fear.
“Elise, you don’t look well. Did you have a bad dream?”
Pretending not to notice her distress, he moved toward her.
Elise instinctively shrank back.
It wouldn’t help, though.
Sure enough, her back hit the headboard, and she flinched.
“What… what are you doing?” she asked, her voice still as
clear and refined as ever. But her first words weren’t what
he’d hoped to hear.
He would have preferred a thank you for rescuing her, a
pleased greeting, or even just her calling his name.
His fiancée was unexpectedly distant.
But any resentment faded quickly.
“Where… where are we?”
Her voice trembled, filled with terror. Raymond sighed as if
realizing something he had forgotten.
“I suppose I owe you an explanation.”
Setting the breakfast tray on the small table, he approached
her.
Ignoring her slight shudders as he neared, he continued.
“I rescued you from the Duke.”

“Rescued… you say?” 
Elise looked up at Raymond, dazed and disbelieving.
“I know how you were all but dragged to the Duke’s
residence. I know you were practically confined there.”
He explained gently, as if to soothe his bewildered fiancée.
“I couldn’t sleep, thinking about the suffering you must have
endured in that hellish place.”
Raymond paused, taking a deep breath as if to gather his
emotions.
“You can’t imagine how hard I worked to free you. There
were times when it was almost unbearably difficult.”
A faint smile appeared on his face, his expression filled with
satisfaction as he indulged himself.
“But in the end, I am truly happy to have rescued you like
this. I’m proud I didn’t give up.”
Elise felt her mind spinning, each word hitting her like a
heavy blow, leaving her dizzy and unsteady.
“I understand, Elise. Suddenly finding yourself free must feel
confusing and overwhelming. You must be anxious about
what comes next.”
Seeing her lips part like a fish out of water, Raymond’s face
softened with pity.
“But there’s no need for that. From now on, I’ll protect you.”
He seemed entirely secure in his decision, oblivious to her
thoughts—or more accurately, unwilling to know them.
Where had things gone so terribly wrong?
“Why don’t we start with breakfast?” He tried to coax her. “I
prepared a simple menu since I wasn’t sure of your
preferences, but if you have a favorite…”
“No, this isn’t right.”
Elise finally managed to speak, her voice trembling
uncontrollably.
“This… isn’t what I want.”
She repeated, shaking her head as she gripped the blanket
covering her lap. The fabric crumpled in her fists.
“Please, Little Marquis Hartman. Take me back… let me go
back.”
For the first time, Raymond’s serene expression cracked.
But he quickly composed himself, saying, “Don’t worry. In
time, you’ll feel better.”
He smiled, now standing right by the head of the bed.
Elise’s grip on the blanket tightened, her knuckles turning
white.
“Relax.”
He reached out to gently take her hand, but she slapped it
away with a sharp sound.
“Ah…”
Elise recoiled, shocked by her own reaction. She hadn’t
intended to be so forceful, but her body had reacted on its
own, repelling him.
As Raymond stared at his rejected hand, guilt crept into her
heart.
“I’m… I’m sorry. I didn’t mean to…”
“It’s all right.”
Thankfully, he accepted her apology calmly, as if it hadn’t
affected him.
Just as she began to breathe a sigh of relief, his next words
froze her in place.
“Trauma can do that. I can only imagine how terribly the
Duke must have treated you.”
“What? No, he never…”
It was true that she had suffered under the Duke, but not in
the way Raymond was insinuating. There was something off
in his tone, something she couldn’t quite explain.
“I know that the Duke abused you.”
Now sitting on the edge of the bed, Raymond looked at her,
urging her to share her secrets.
“Did he hit you? Strike your face or threaten you? Did he
threaten your family if you didn’t obey?”
“No!” Elise shook her head desperately, but he continued as
if he hadn’t heard.
“He kept you isolated, didn’t he? You had no one to talk to,
no one to share your pain with.”
“He never did anything like that… the Duke just…”
Tears began to well in her eyes.
It was strange. Raymond was trying to empathize,
acknowledging the pain the Duke had caused her. And yet,
her heart ached painfully, as if pricked by needles.
There was something else strange as well.
“Don’t cry, Elise.”
He reached out slowly, wiping a tear from the corner of her
eye.
But as his thumb brushed under her eye, an intense urge to
push him away surged within her.
“How long did you have to endure this suffering alone?”
Turning her head away, Elise evaded his touch.
This time, it wasn’t a panicked reaction. She didn’t want him
touching her. It made her skin crawl and sent shivers down
her spine.
“I’m fine.”
She lifted her hand to wipe the tears from her cheek herself.
“Maybe it wasn’t what I wanted at first… but I’ve chosen to
stay with the Duke now.”
Speaking as clearly as she could, Elise articulated her
feelings firmly, hoping Raymond wouldn’t ignore them.
“I can’t just leave without saying a word to him.”
“You don’t need his permission.”
“It’s not about permission… it’s what I want.”
“No, Elise. You only believe that because it’s the only way
you could survive that torment.”
It felt like talking to a wall, leaving Elise feeling helpless.
“Viscount, I…”
“Oh, your hand is red.”
Raymond interrupted, noticing the redness on her hand
where she had slapped his away earlier.
“You must be in pain; why didn’t you say anything?”
He continued talking as if he hadn’t heard her, deepening
her sense of despair.
“It might help to cool it in some water…”
“No.”
She quickly moved back before he could touch her again
and stood up from the bed. Every instinct told her she
needed to get out of there.
“Elise.”
“Let’s forget this ever happened. I won’t tell anyone.”
She hurried across the room as if she were fleeing
something chasing her.
Raymond didn’t move from the bed. He simply watched her
intently as she approached the door.
“I won’t report this to the authorities…”
As she grabbed the doorknob and pulled, she realized with a
sinking feeling that the door was locked. Her face went pale.
“Little Marquis Hartman?”
She turned, hoping for an explanation, but he replied with a
calm expression.
“this is for your safety.”
“This… this can’t be…”
Her blue eyes widened in terror, her voice trembling
uncontrollably.
“Please… unlock the door.”
“There’s no point in going back. It’s too late.”
“What… what does that mean?”
He rose from the bed, walking toward her slowly.
“The Duke believes you betrayed him and ran away. I made
sure of that.”
“No, that’s a lie… that can’t be…”
Elise realized Raymond’s gaze had changed, filled with a
dark intensity she hadn’t seen before.
With her back pressed against the door, she watched him
approach, a chilling smile tugging at his lips.
“You are my fiancée. Isn’t it only right that you stay with
me?”
“We… we broke off the engagement! You were the one
who–”
“I know. It was my fault.” He nodded, then continued with a
somber smile, as if making a solemn declaration.
“I vowed that if we ever met again… I would propose to
you.”
The dark desire hidden in the depths of his green eyes
surfaced, and Elise froze like a deer caught by its predator.
Raymond leaned closer and held her shoulders, lowering his
face toward hers, close enough that their noses nearly
touched.
“No… please don’t.”
Mustering her courage, Elise turned her head away.
“Please, stop.”
His expression grew as cold as ice, staring at her pale, tearstreaked face with gritted teeth.
“Fine. I suppose you’ll need time to adjust.”
With that, he lifted her effortlessly and laid her back on the
bed. Terrified, Elise didn’t resist.
“Luckily, I’m patient.”
“….”
“The food’s gone cold. I’ll bring you a fresh meal. Rest.”
With a soft click, Raymond unlocked the door and stepped
out.
Hearing the lock turn again behind him, Elise curled up and
buried her face in her knees.
“The Duke believes you betrayed him and ran away.”
She shouldn’t have come to the hunting festival.
‘Was I too greedy…?’
Perhaps she was being punished—for hoping to mend things
with the Duke, for wishing to see her mother once more.
In the locked room, all that could be heard was her quiet,
stifled sobbing.

“Why is this carriage not moving?” 
Victoria Vassenberg snapped irritably from inside the halted
carriage.
The coachman, familiar with her temperament, responded
promptly. 
“My apologies, Madam. There’s been a sudden checkpoint
causing delays.”
“Checkpoint?” Victoria frowned, then nodded knowingly.
“With what happened at the hunting festival, it makes sense
they’d tighten security around the capital,” she said,
surprisingly lenient in her response. She had been in a good
mood, pleased with her rare visit to the capital, her
presence at the hunting festival, and the grand hospitality
she had enjoyed at the Imperial Palace.
But most of all, what had delighted her was the success of
removing her son’s mistress from his life.
‘I’ll make sure that little thorn never bothers the Vassenberg
name again.’
Victoria’s disdain had only grown after her humiliating visit
to her son’s residence, where her stipend had been
significantly reduced. She blamed Elise Schwan for that. 
‘Things were different before that girl appeared,’ she
thought bitterly.
When Princess Theresia proposed her scheme, Victoria was
immediately intrigued. Although she wasn’t entirely sure
why Theresia wanted vengeance on Elise, that mattered
little. All that was important to her was that Elise would be
removed from her son’s life.
And she had even witnessed Elise being carried away,
unconscious. A small smile tugged at her lips as she recalled
it.
‘An illegitimate girl daring to taint the Vassenberg name.’
The memory of Linda, the unyielding head maid, also
crossed her mind. She was certain that Linda would inform
Cardale of her appearance at the festival, but Victoria hardly
cared.
‘As if anything could come of it. Besides, I’m already leaving
the capital.’
With Cardale occupied by the recent scandal of nobles
conspiring with enemy states, he would be too preoccupied
to bother about her. And with her privileged status as his
mother, she was confident no harm would come her way.
‘He’ll forget her within a few days, anyways.’
She believed that Elise would quickly fade from Cardale’s
mind. Just as her husband had gone through countless
mistresses, and as noblemen routinely engaged in such
affairs despite their wives.
“Apologies for the delay,” a soldier’s polite voice
accompanied the resumption of the carriage’s journey.
Victoria settled back comfortably, thinking about spending
the upcoming months at her estate. With autumn’s chill
settling in and the hunting festival now over, she had little
interest in the capital’s social scene until spring.
‘Estate life isn’t so bad in the fall,’ she mused, thinking
fondly of her younger, vigorous lovers, and the expensive
gifts Theresia had provided in return for her help.
Just as she closed her eyes to pass the time, she was jolted
forward as the carriage came to a sudden stop.
“Hey! Can’t you drive properly?” she yelled, narrowly
avoiding hitting her head.
But there was no answer.
“What’s the meaning of this—” she began, but her words
died as the carriage door swung open violently.
Men in masks burst in.
“Who—” Her scream was muffled as they pressed a cloth
soaked in something over her mouth. Darkness claimed her
within moments.

When Victoria regained consciousness, she was lying in a
stark, desolate room.
‘Where…where am I?’ she wondered, sitting up in confusion.
It was a small room with nothing but a bed. The walls were
unadorned, save for a small, barred window high above.
‘Have I… been kidnapped?’
A chill ran down her spine. Some lowlifes occasionally dared
to kidnap nobles for ransom. The satisfaction she had felt
imagining someone else’s abduction now gave way to a
creeping sense of dread.
“Who would dare…?”
“How do you find your new room?”
The voice startled her, and she barely suppressed a scream
as she turned to see her son, Cardale, standing at the door.
“Y-you…how did you—?”
“As a dutiful son, I’ve come to see you.” Cardale’s lips curled
into a smile.
“But since you don’t seem pleased, I’ll make sure to limit
these visits.”
‘Visits.’
The word sent a shock through her, and she glanced around
the room again, the bleakness suddenly hitting her anew.
Her eyes trembled with disbelief as she looked back at him.
“You… you put me in… here?”
Cardale didn’t deny it. “It seems your instincts are sharp,
but I suppose they didn’t warn you not to ignore my
warnings.”
Victoria’s face twisted with rage. “Are you locking me in an
asylum because I didn’t listen to you?”
“I’m only helping you with what appears to be a decline in
judgment.”
“You depraved monster!” 
She leapt from the bed, clutching his cravat in a fierce grip.
“I’ve known since you were a child that there was
something rotten about you! It’s in your blood!”
Hearing the commotion, the staff quickly entered, prying her
hands from Cardale and restraining her.
“Let go! I’m perfectly sane!” She thrashed against their grip,
looking genuinely unhinged.
“You should have been shot dead! I should have killed you
myself!”
Cardale’s expression remained unperturbed as he watched
her, his face impassive as if merely observing a final
outburst.
After a fierce struggle, the staff finally managed to subdue
her, binding her hands and feet.
“Shall we gag her?”
“No.”
“But, sir, some patients do attempt to bite their tongues…”
“Leave us.”
If she had been the type to take her own life, she might
have done it by now. But her stubbornness meant she would
likely live for a long time yet. A smirk flickered on Cardale’s
face as he calmly adjusted his cravat, securing the red pin
with meticulous care.
Victoria’s gaze, filled with hatred, focused on him, her body
trembling.
“That pathetic trinket… did she give you that?”
“You’re quite observant,” he replied smoothly.
“Do you think you’ll get away with this?”
“Rest assured, the Emperor is deeply concerned for your
health as well.”
With the Emperor’s tacit approval, any escape from this
place would be futile.
Desperation crept into her voice as she yelled, “Everyone
will call you a depraved son! They’ll condemn you!”
Cardale finished adjusting his attire, unruffled.
“Even if they did, why would it matter? No one dares speak
against me.”
“Cardale Vassenberg!”
With his purpose fulfilled, Cardale turned to leave. Her voice
reached him one last time before he left the room.
“You’re just like your father!”
Victoria’s voice turned to a shriek. “You destroy everything
you touch. You ruin everything! Is there anything left
unbroken around you?”
He paused. For a moment, she thought her words had finally
struck a nerve.
“Anything I have claimed has been ruined, yes.”
He replied without looking back, his tone dry.
“And what of the things with no use to me?”
The heavy iron door closed behind him.
Victoria stared, realization dawning as she let out a shrill,
furious scream.

“Your Grace, it appears that Raymond Hartmann did not
return to his residence last night.”
As Cardale left the asylum, Michael reported to him.
“The Hartmann couple claims to have no idea of his
whereabouts, though they are secretly searching for him.”
“Pretending ignorance may serve them well.”
Rumors had spread that Raymond hadn’t been the same
since his broken engagement, and the Hartmans were
surely aware of his obsession.
“The city guards have been informed of Lady Schuvan’s
disappearance, and an investigation unit is being formed
today.”
Cardale had little faith in them. They lacked both the
personnel and skill to conduct a thorough search of the
capital.
The true search would be conducted in the shadows under
Vassenberg’s command.
The purpose of involving the city guard was to pressure
those who had taken Elise—to tighten the noose around
their necks, giving them a taste of the reckoning that
awaited.

Surveillance had already been arranged on Marquis
Hartmann, his wife, and their close associates.
“What’s the situation?”
Raymond Hartmann hadn’t managed to escape the capital.
If that were the case, he must have hidden Elise in a safe
house.
“Based on geographic characteristics, movement patterns in
hunting areas, and foot traffic, we have classified zones 1, 2,
6, and 9 as low priority within the capital. Additionally…”
The entire map of the capital was drawn out in his mind.
Where could Raymond Hartmann have chosen to establish a
safe house?
He was a cautious man, so he’d have selected a place
carefully.
“Start with zone 4, near the mountains.”
“Yes, sir. And…”
Michael spoke up after a nod of approval.
“We’ve received word that Lady Elise’s mother safely
arrived at the villa in the capital yesterday, along with her
personal physician.”
After receiving the report that Marissa’s health had
improved, he’d deliberately brought her into the capital,
timed to coincide with the hunting festival.
He intended to let her reunite with Elise once it was over.
“By now, Damien Schuvan has likely visited the villa.”
Hearing about the mother and son’s reunion didn’t stir any
particular emotion in Cardale. Instead, he felt a peculiar
sense of displeasure.
“The one who actually worked to save her mother was
someone else, but another reaps the benefits.”
“Lady Elise should be able to meet her mother soon as well,
don’t you think?”
He simply issued a brief order in response.
“From today on, cut off all outside news.”
Word of Elise’s disappearance would inevitably begin to
spread; it was only a matter of time.
Within a few days, Damien was likely to hear of it.
“Tell Damien Schuvan that if he wants to spend time with
his mother, he should hurry.”
“Yes, sir.”
Seated in the carriage, Cardale stared at the seat across
from him. Just two days ago, Elise had been sitting there.

There was, in fact, no reason to bring a woman to the
hunting festival.
He had never attended with a partner before, and his
purpose for attending this time wasn’t the hunt.
To keep her thoroughly within his control, it would have
been better to keep her at the estate.
So why had he done something so unnecessary? Why had
he invited more trouble upon himself?
‘Don’t push yourself too hard while hunting…’
‘I… I’ll pray so you won’t get hurt…’
Was it simply to let her get some fresh air? Because he
couldn’t bear the sight of her cooped up, shut away in her
room? Or was it perhaps…
Ah, it was a test.
Cardale finally arrived at a satisfying answer.
He’d tested her because he couldn’t trust a woman who had
deceived him.
To see if she’d try to escape if given the chance. If she’d
obediently stay put even when he was away. If she’d remain
steadfast even when meeting others in a public place.
‘Mark my words, if Elise is given the right opportunity, she’ll
definitely leave you.’
But Elise didn’t flee. Contrary to Raymond Hartmann’s loud
declarations, the foolish young man had hastily staged her
kidnapping, under the guise of an escape. A pitiful act.
“A safe house, hmm.”
Were they planning to play house there? Even in the broad
daylight, shadows darkened beneath his lowered eyes.
It would only be a few days. No more than two weeks, at
most, to wrap everything up.
Afterward, his enemies would never again lay hands on
what was his. Not even dare to covet it.
Then, his doe would live within a perfect sanctuary.
Technically, it would be surrounded by a cleverly hidden
fence to give the illusion of an endless forest—a place just
for her.
But he still didn’t like seeing the empty seat where she
should be.
The master of the forest closed his eyes.

Several days had passed since Elise found herself trapped in
this unknown house.
‘My stomach… keeps churning.’
Elise sat up in bed with difficulty.
Her chest felt tight, and her stomach had been unsettlingly
nauseous for the past few days.
It must have been the anxiety of being confined in an
unknown place and the fear of what Raymond might do to
her.
She thought of Raymond’s intense gaze, filled with desire,
fixed upon her.
His hands that gripped her shoulders, the tongue that
moistened his lips, the brazen gleam in his eyes.
Her current situation felt like walking on ice that could crack
at any moment.
If Raymond ever unlocked the door he’d used to imprison
her, she’d be powerless to stop him.
Elise’s gaze drifted once more to the locked door—a sight
she had glanced at dozens of times daily, even though it
never changed.
Through careful observation over the past few days, she had
noticed something about Raymond.
His wrist, partly hidden by frills, bore a bracelet-like
accessory. It seemed to have a key attached.
“Is there no way…?”
She had tried to find an opening, but Raymond was always
meticulous about locking the door, and he slept in another
room. The barred window didn’t allow her head the slightest
view outside.
When escape seemed impossible and despair started
creeping in, she found herself thinking of someone.
That helped calm her rebelling stomach a bit.
She needed something to focus on.
Bending down, she retrieved an embroidery basket from
under the bed. A few books lay nearby as well.
Raymond had brought them for her, urging her to keep
herself occupied. Of course, she’d never shown him any
interest in embroidery.
After confirming the door was closed once more, Elise pulled
a handkerchief from her pocket. She had embroidered it to
tie around Cardale’s wrist but had never been able to give it
to him.
Threading her needle, she carefully stitched, one deliberate
stitch at a time.
The emblem of the Vassenberg family was nearly complete.
When she met him again, she wanted to show him the
handkerchief and say,
“I never ran away.”
“I didn’t betray you, my lord.”
“Even in captivity, I didn’t… forget you.”
This time, she wanted to say it with confidence.
“…It’s done!”
As she tied off the final stitch, Elise spread out the finished
handkerchief. She felt proud as she admired the embroidery.
She was so engrossed that she didn’t even notice someone
entering the room.
“Elise.”
Startled, she froze like a fish tossed onto land.
“Were you embroidering? I thought you had no interest in
such things… Wait.”
She hurriedly tried to hide the handkerchief, but Raymond
was quicker.
Upon seeing the embroidered emblem of the family crest,
his expression grew cold.
“You were stitching this behind my back?”
A bitter smile twisted Raymond’s lips.
“Why, afraid I’d take it away if I saw? So you hid it?”
“I… I just…”
Elise clutched the handkerchief tightly, as if afraid he’d truly
take it from her. Seeing this, Raymond’s gaze grew even
icier.
“I hadn’t intended to tell you this news, but it seems I
must.”
With a flick, a newspaper fell onto Elise’s lap.
“Today’s paper.”
After days of hearing no outside news, she had been dying
to know. But his tone, his expression, and the atmosphere
made her dread what she would see.
“Shall I unfold it for you?”
He sneered as he held up the front page of the newspaper.
A headline emblazoned across the top hit her like a punch.
The Fall of Families Who Allied with Helmut and the
Execution of Traitors
“You know Fritz Schuvan was involved in this, don’t you?”
Her heart sank. The word “execution” glared back at her.
“Unfortunately, the Schuvan family was also exposed.”
Elise looked up at Raymond. Her blue eyes trembled.
“Do you know who orchestrated their capture, arrest, and
execution?”
The blood drained from Elise’s face, her lips quivering in
silence.
“Yes. The Duke of Vassenberg.”
Raymond continued, gazing at her pale face.
“According to Imperial law, when a family is sentenced for
treason, all adult male heirs are executed, while women and
children are sold into slavery.”
Raymond’s words flowed smoothly, almost as if he were
enjoying the moment.
“The Duke knew this but didn’t save the Schuvan family.
Pulling Fritz out of the mess would have been trivial for him.
He knew what a pitiful situation this would put you in, but he
didn’t care.”
Every word struck her like a blow, bruising her with fresh
pain.
Tears started to gather under her eyes.
“He misunderstood… thinking I ran away…”
Even in her shock, Elise tried to think of an excuse, a
defense for Cardale.
She wanted to believe in him, to protect the few kind
memories she had of him.
“Are you sure of that? This plan has been in the works for
quite some time.”
But Raymond shattered her hopes without hesitation.
“On top of that, the Duke even took you to the hunting
festival, where these traitors would be captured. He didn’t
care whether you witnessed their wretched demise.”
Her vision blurred.
She blinked rapidly, but it was no use as tears began to fall.
Raymond sealed the wound with his final, brutal words.
“Perhaps the Duke decided that having a nobleman’s
bastard daughter for a mistress was worse than having a
slave.”

“Pl-please, stop,” Elise said, her voice trembling.
Finally, the tears welling up in her eyes couldn’t be held
back any longer and fell heavily down her cheeks.
“Do you still believe the Duke will come looking for you?
Perhaps he will. But even if he takes you back to his estate,
it would only be to keep you as a toy, as a slave.”
Elise shook her head fiercely, as if refusing to hear anything
more.
Raymond had made similar remarks before, warning her
against trusting the Duke and saying terrible things.
“No… no, it’s all lies…” 
He’s just trying to turn me against the Duke, Elise thought
desperately, clutching the bed sheet tightly. 
She had to believe in the Duke. He was the only hope she
had to hold on to.
“He… he promised… that he would bring my mother… that
I’d get to see her…” 
“And did he keep that promise?” 
Raymond interrupted her desperate stammering.
“Did the Duke truly help you meet your mother?”
“After… after the hunting festival…”
Raymond clicked his tongue in pity.
“Yet, at that very festival, the Schuvans were branded as
traitors?”
Elise’s heart plummeted into despair.
Her head dropped, her blue eyes losing focus, trembling
with the painful realization. Her grip on the white sheet
tightened and twisted.
‘No, it can’t be. The Duke wouldn’t be so cruel to me…
would he?’
But no words would escape her, as if something blocked her
throat. Only sorrowful tears spilled down her face.
Deep down, some part of her had already recognized the
truth.
‘The Duke never cared for you. If he felt even a bit of pity,
would he have allowed you to be hurt this way?’
Elise clutched her chest. Her heart was painfully
constricting, making it hard to breathe.
‘To him, you’re nothing more than a toy. Unworthy of any
sympathy, useful only when obedient, a pet bound to fall
into slavery—a mere bedroom maid he can use as he
pleases.’
‘And what about Mother? Will she be…’
‘No master makes real promises to a slave.’
“Who would be crazy enough to fulfill the bothersome
request of a woman he’ll just discard after a little
entertainment, especially someone as privileged as the
Duke?”
Fritz had been right. The last thread of hope she clung to
snapped. It was a harsh, bitter truth.
“Hic… hhic…”
It felt as if her heart had been shredded to pieces, leaving
only tattered fragments.
Elise held her chest, curling up, choking on sobs that forced
their way through her tightly pressed lips.
The endless tears soaked the newspaper and bedspread on
her lap.
Raymond took the newspaper back and then picked up the
handkerchief Elise had just finished embroidering.
“I’ll be taking this. It will only hurt you more to look at it.”
She let the handkerchief slip from her hands, unable to
muster the strength to protest. Somehow, it didn’t seem
worth it anymore.
Raymond tucked the handkerchief and newspaper into his
coat, as if ensuring she couldn’t read the details again.
“Don’t forget, Elise.”
Through her blurred vision, she looked up.
Her vision was so clouded by tears that Raymond’s face
appeared distorted, his features blurring together.
He leaned in close, whispering in her ear.
“I’m the only one who can help you.”

Cardale sensed the Princess’s approach from a distance.
He felt no particular irritation at her presence, knowing she
was an obstacle soon to be removed.
“You look busy, Duke Vassenberg.”
He didn’t respond.
He didn’t slow his pace toward the Emperor’s audience
chamber, his strides so large that Princess Theresia
practically had to run to keep up.
“I heard news… about the Duke’s mistress going missing,
isn’t that right?”
Her question was predictably on point. Cardale came to a
sudden stop.
“Where is Raymond Hartmann’s safe house?”
Theresia flinched visibly, unprepared for such a direct
question.
“W-what are you talking about?”
“Is that so?”
He resumed walking, his indifference leaving the Princess
taken aback.
“Wait, can we at least talk…”
“As I said, I am busy. And shouldn’t Your Highness also be
occupied? Your wedding is soon, after all.”
Theresia’s face twisted with annoyance, but Cardale
remained calm as he added,
“I hope you enjoyed the hunting festival, as it was Your
Highness’s last event in the Empire.”

A purging storm swept through the capital of Ingel following
the hunting festival.
All those involved in treasonous acts were executed, and
several noble families fell.
The punishments were severe to the point of excess, but the
noble class kept their complaints to themselves, knowing
that Duke Vassenberg supported the Emperor’s authority.
No, in truth, he was the one who led the purging.
All of this was completed in the span of just ten days.
Of course, this swift outcome was possible because of
several months of work behind the scenes.
The central nobles, who only learned of this later, were
chilled to the bone.
They had assumed that the Duke was distracted with his
mistress when he was truly preparing to tighten his grip on
their throats.
As a result, the Nordrat noble society quickly turned frigid.
The year’s social season had come to an abrupt end.

After hearing Raymond’s shocking words, Elise spent most
of her days sitting alone in a daze.
“Elise.”
The door opened, and Raymond entered, carrying a tray of
food.
“You should eat something. You barely touched your food
yesterday.”
As he placed the tray on the bedside table, the smell of the
food wafted up.
Elise held her breath, feeling nauseated.
“I… I’ll eat it later…”
Barely able to suppress the urge to vomit, she managed to
respond.
“You said that this morning, but you didn’t eat a single
spoonful.”
“More importantly… you promised to check…”
The most important thing to Elise now was her mother’s
safety and health.
“Don’t worry; we’re still searching for your mother.”
Was it her imagination, or did his answer lack sincerity?
Yet, despite her doubts, all she could do was wait.
Powerless, dependent on his words. It made her feel
pathetic and humiliated.
“Let’s leave that for later and eat first, shall we?” Raymond
said, lifting a spoonful of soup and bringing it close to her
face.
A sudden wave of nausea surged up from her stomach.
“Ugh…!”
Unable to hold back, Elise clamped her hand over her mouth
and ran to the bathroom attached to the room.
“Elise! Are you alright?”
Raymond hurried after her, gently patting her back as he
asked, concerned.
Elise couldn’t answer. Despite not having eaten, her
stomach kept churning, bile rising up.
“Ugh… ugh…”
It was agonizingly disgusting. Her body wasn’t listening to
her mind, and even Raymond’s scent was unbearable.
“I-I’m fine, really…”
“How can you say that when you’re retching like this–”
Raymond suddenly stopped mid-sentence. Through her
dizzy vision, Elise glanced up and saw his face, his
expression chillingly calm.
She couldn’t explain it, but a sense of dread washed over
her. Even her nausea seemed to dissipate, leaving her body
rigid.
“Good. It seems you’re feeling better now,” he said,
standing up and offering her his hand.
“I’ll help you back to bed.”
She wanted to refuse, but an instinct told her that she
shouldn’t.
Elise nodded.

After the prolonged retching, Elise, exhausted, managed to
eat a few pieces of fruit and felt a languid drowsiness
overcome her.
Her eyes grew heavy, and before she realized it, she had
fallen asleep.
When she awoke with a familiar nausea, it was the dead of
night.
Her chest felt tight… her stomach uneasy.
Wanting a breath of fresh air, she got out of bed.
The window was positioned just high enough that she had to
stand on tiptoe and stretch her arms to reach the handle.
The moment she opened the window, a cool autumn breeze
rushed into the room.
“This… this feels better…”
Leaning against the window, Elise took a slow, deep breath,
letting the queasiness gradually subside.
Feeling slightly better, she turned back toward the bed,
ready to return to sleep.
“I’ve arranged everything for a week from now.”
A voice from outside the window caught her attention. Elise
instinctively turned her head. Raymond was talking with
someone.
She heard him say,
“First, we need to get some medicine.”
“Are you feeling unwell, sir?”
“No, it’s not for me.”
Raymond paused briefly, then continued.

“A medicine to kill the child in her womb.”
Elise stifled a scream with both hands.
But she couldn’t stop the wave of shock from shaking her
entire body.
The servant’s voice came next, clearly startled as well.
“Are you saying… the lady might be…?”
“She doesn’t seem aware of the pregnancy yet, so we’ll
need to take care of it before she finds out.” 
Raymond replied, showing no intention of hiding his plan.
“Wouldn’t it be best to call a doctor?”
“How could I trust anyone to come in here? Keeping things
quiet is troublesome enough… Just bring the medicine. I’ll
handle the rest.”
Elise’s shaking legs gave out, and she sank to the floor.
‘What… did I just hear?’
It was true her monthly cycle was overdue.
But she hadn’t suspected anything because she’d missed it
often due to frequent exhaustion from her studies with
Vanessa and her restricted diet.
Moreover, Norman had once mentioned that the Duke took
precautions to avoid pregnancy.
And above all, Elise had always been told her womb wasn’t
healthy.
A doctor who had treated her after she was poisoned as a
child had told her it would be nearly impossible for her to
conceive.
‘But… I’ve never felt so sick at the smell of food before…’
Her stomach had churned endlessly, with waves of nausea
and vomiting like she’d never experienced.
“Could it be… that I really am…?”
Her trembling gaze dropped to her flat stomach, her shaking
hand resting there, though she felt nothing yet.
If… if she truly was carrying a child…
A tear fell onto her hand.
“Why did you come to me?”
Why didn’t you go to a mother and father who would
welcome you with joy and give you all their love?
‘Why did you come to someone as unworthy as me…?’
Elise’s throat tightened.
She had once dreamed, foolishly, that her womb might
miraculously heal, that she might carry a small life within
her.
She had dreamed of bearing his child.
He had asked her once if she wanted children, giving her a
glimmer of hope that he might allow her to have a child
someday. It was foolish of her to dare to wish for that.
But now that she understood it had all been her illusion, her
selfish desire, she felt no joy.
Only a terrible, boundless sadness overtook her.
‘Perhaps the Duke thinks even a nobleman’s illegitimate
daughter would be better as a slave than a mistress.’
She pitied the life that might be born only to be branded as
a slave.
‘My child…’
‘Why did you come to me? You don’t know how harsh the
world awaiting you is.’
Elise began to pray.
‘It’s alright, even if this was a mistake. I’ll be fine, truly. I
won’t cry, I’ll never be presumptuous again. So, please,
return this child to the place they were meant to go.
Somewhere better… somewhere kinder…’
But her prayer halted, barely more than a whisper. She
couldn’t bring herself to continue.
She should have prayed for a mother who could bring her
child happiness, but the words wouldn’t come.
Just then—
A loud creaking interrupted the midnight silence. Someone
was climbing the stairs.

Elise quickly climbed into bed, lying down and pulling the
blanket over herself. Just as she settled, the door opened.
“Elise.”
Raymond Hartmann. 
At the sound of his voice, a shiver ran through her body. She
held her breath, feigning sleep. His footsteps drew closer.
Finally, he stopped beside the bed. She felt his hand
smoothing over the blanket covering her. It was a feeling as
if insects were crawling over her, but Elise bit her lip to
endure it.
“I’m sorry, you know,” he said, as if confessing something to
her through the blanket.
“But that is not a place where ‘his’ child should be.”
The implication in his words sent a chill down her spine.
“I trust you’ll understand,” he added, his tone implying he’d
already made the decision.
He moved away, and then a loud click sounded.
Elise realized too late that she’d forgotten to close the
window.
She trembled, terrified would throw off the blanket and
question her about what she had heard.
Fortunately, he did no such thing.
After a brief silence in the room, Raymond opened the door
and left.
Under the blanket, Elise curled up tightly, her arms wrapped
protectively around her stomach.
One hand clenched the pendant hanging from her neck, and
the other arm guarded her stomach as she lay awake
through the night.

Cardale arrived at the Imperial palace.
“I was about to summon you,” said Emperor Johann, pulling
out their oath scroll.
“Strangely, the ancient magic of your signature hasn’t faded
yet.”
Indeed, Cardale von Vassenberg’s name still glowed with a
faint blue light.
“Is it possible you missed some traitors?” asked Johann, his
suspicion clear, but Cardale remained unperturbed.
“The contract was to uncover every last traitor involved in
the treasonous acts and eliminate the threat of war from
Helmut.”
A smile played at Cardale’s lips.
His beauty, combined with his calm smile, made him appear
like a figure from a painting. Yet Emperor Johann felt a
strange chill.
“In fact, there is one more traitor I haven’t reported to you,”
Cardale said.
“Who… who is it?”
Cardale’s smile deepened.
“Marius von Oldenhilt.”

“The Crown Prince of Nordrat Empire.”
The Emperor’s face went pale. His lips moved soundlessly
before he finally found his voice.
“Is… is there proof?”
As he asked, the blue light on the oath scroll suddenly
faded, and the edges of the parchment began to crumble
away.
In the blink of an eye, it disintegrated into dust, leaving
Johann wide-eyed.
The oath’s power had vanished. The contract was now
complete.
“So it seems Your Majesty wishes to protect his son,”
Cardale said with an expression of anticipated satisfaction.
“What… what is going on…?”
“It was suspicious from the beginning. How could the one
responsible for overseeing the secret weapons have been
entirely unaware of smuggling operations?”
“But why…?”
Johann asked, his voice trembling.
“Why would the Crown Prince do such a thing?”
“It’s best if you hear the answer directly from him.”
Just as Cardale finished speaking, a servant entered.
“Your Majesty, the Crown Prince requests an audience—”
“Father!”
Marius burst through the doors before the Emperor could
respond.
Taking in the atmosphere and the expressions of both
Johann and Cardale, he instantly grasped the situation.
“P-please, forgive me, Father!”
“Marius?”
The Crown Prince dropped to his knees on the marble floor—
a gesture that was as good as a confession. Johann’s face
contorted with fury.
“Are you out of your mind?”
He leaped to his feet, shouting,
“What could possibly be lacking that you would betray your
father and put the empire at risk of war? How could you do
such a thing?”
“I had no choice!” 
Marius shouted defensively.
“Theresia was blackmailing me! I was forced to do it!”
“Theresia?” Johann paused, taken aback by the unexpected
mention of the Princess’ name. Marius quickly launched into
his explanation.
It was, essentially, that the Princess had discovered his
secret regarding his lineage and used it against him.
“The rumors about me were already spreading among the
nobles.”
“But I instructed Theresia to stay silent…”
“She only pretended to obey. Some of the more traditionalist
nobles had already sided with her.”
He had needed a large sum of money to win them over and,
thus, had smuggled weapons in secret to create such funds.
“Somehow, I didn’t realize some of them would end up in
Helmut’s hands.”
Johann’s outrage boiled over as he listened to his son’s
excuse.
“If this was happening, you should have come to me!”
“You couldn’t, could you?”
Cardale’s voice interrupted, his tone laced with mockery.
“Because this treasonous act had likely begun even before
the Princess discovered your illegitimacy.”
“D-Duke!”
Marius’s panicked gaze turned to Cardale, but Cardale
continued nonchalantly.
“The Crown Prince was powerless in the face of the
Princess’s blackmail, fearing his successor title would be
stripped if the treason was exposed. And besides…”
Cardale’s crimson eyes fixed on the Crown Prince.
“Not all the stolen weapons were sent to foreign lands, were
they?”
Marius’s face turned ghostly pale. He opened his mouth like
a fish gasping for air but said nothing.
Emperor Johann was equally speechless, reeling from the
revelation that his own son might have been plotting to
seize the throne.
Cardale, having set off an explosive truth in the audience
chamber, began to walk away with a satisfied smile.
“Oh, I almost forgot,” he said, turning just before leaving the
room.
His final words were spoken with deliberate, cruel
generosity.

“I’ve heard Raymond Hartmann has been close to the
Princess—he may very well know about all this.”
The door to the audience chamber had barely closed before
the Emperor’s angry shouts erupted.
Meanwhile, the man who had orchestrated the entire
situation walked down the hallway as if nothing had
happened.
Finally, his tiresome dealings with the Oldenhilt family had
come to an end.
They would tear each other apart on their own now; there
was no need for him to intervene further.
“Your Grace,”
Outside, Michael approached, bowing his head.
“We’ve tracked movements from the Hartmann household.
It seems they’re attempting to secure an escape route. We
should be able to locate the safe house soon.”
“Excellent.”
Cardale glanced down, his gaze languid.
“As soon as you confirm the location, move in immediately.”
By tomorrow, he would bring his woman back home. He’d
been away from his estate for over ten days.
Perhaps she was even crying by now.
Maybe she’d complain, wondering why he took so long to
come for her.
This time, he intended to indulge her grievances, knowing
how patiently she must have waited for him.
He would shower her with gifts and finally grant her dearest
wish.
Everything was going according to plan.

Elise watched Raymond set the table with nervous eyes.
Since she had struggled to eat recently, they had begun to
dine together.
“I’ve brought only food you should be able to eat tonight.”
Raymond laid out a plate of fruit, pea soup, crispy salmon,
and soft white bread. The green soup, mirroring the color of
his eyes, stood out.
Elise’s gaze flicked to Raymond’s pocket, where something
bulged, like a small bottle.
Exactly the size of a vial of medicine.
Her hands clasped tightly under the table.
Once Raymond had set down his own plate, he sat across
from her.
“Eat well.”
He spoke warmly, as if nothing were amiss. Elise forced a
small smile and nodded.
When he glanced at his plate, she “accidentally” let her
knife slip from her fingers.
“Oh…!”
The knife clattered to the floor, grazing her finger.
Seeing the blood beginning to well up, Raymond stood.
“Wait a moment. I’ll get some ointment from downstairs.”
Even as he left, he didn’t forget to lock the door. But this
worked to Elise’s advantage.
As soon as she heard the door close, she quickly switched
her soup with his.
“It’s normally used as a sleeping aid, but it can induce a
miscarriage if taken by a pregnant woman. It’s colorless,
odorless, and takes a while to act, so there’s no risk of
detection.”
“No adverse effects on her body?”
“No. With ample rest and good food afterward, she should
recover fully.”
Recalling the conversation she had overheard, Elise
returned to her seat. Soon enough, Raymond came back
with the ointment.
He took her hand and carefully applied the ointment to her
finger.
The contact made her skin crawl. The fact that he could plot
her child’s death while acting so calmly horrified her.
But she hid her emotions with all her strength.
This was her only chance.
Thinking back to the time Cardale had tended to her burn
wound, she managed to endure it.
“Does it hurt?”
“…No. Thank you.”
She tolerated him patting her hand, touching her fingers,
even pressing her soft palm, despite how unsettling it felt.
“All done. Shall we eat now?”
Raymond picked up his spoon.
Thump, thump, thump. Her heart pounded, and her hands
were slick with sweat. She held her breath as he lifted a
spoonful of soup to his lips.
“Not bad, if I do say so myself.”
Elise watched him eat with growing anxiety. Countless fears
flitted through her mind.
What if this didn’t work? How could she switch the dishes
again next time?
Lost in her worries, she didn’t realize the meal had ended
until Raymond was helping her back to bed.
“Take it easy since you’re not feeling well.”
‘I can’t let him leave yet.’
Elise grabbed her embroidery hoop, speaking to keep him in
the room.
“Could you teach me the Hartmann family crest?”
He looked delighted.
“Of course.”
Sitting beside her, Raymond sketched the Hartmann crest.
“Would you mind if I watched while you embroidered?”
She nodded, focusing on her embroidery and trying to
ignore his presence.
“You’re skilled at this.”
“No, not really.”
Some time passed, and eventually, she saw that he had
fallen asleep by her bedside. The drug had taken effect.
‘…So he really did put the drug in the soup.’
Any remnants of warmth or guilt she felt for him vanished.
She gently pulled up his sleeve, retrieving the bracelet of
keys. Luckily, the second key she tried unlocked the door.
Taking a cautious step outside, she ventured beyond the
room for the first time in over ten days.
‘I have to lock this door.’
To ensure he couldn’t follow, she locked him in, then silently
descended the stairs.
There was a creak, but she took her time to minimize the
noise.
The front door opened with a different key. With a quiet
click, the door unlocked, and the cool night air brushed her
face.
Elise took a deep breath.
She had no idea where she was or which direction to go.
Through the window earlier, she’d seen nothing but trees
surrounding the house, giving her no sense of direction.
There could be dangers she wasn’t aware of.
The only light was from the moon and stars. The night felt
just like those dark nights when she had fled desperately
with her mother as a child.
And now, she didn’t even have her mother by her side.
To say she wasn’t afraid would be a lie.
She was terrified. Her heart pounded, and though she’d
barely taken a step, she was already breathless.
But Elise had one reason to overcome her fear and anxiety.
‘My child.’
Her hand instinctively went to her stomach. In just a few
days, the gesture had become a habit.
She still couldn’t fully comprehend the tiny life within her,
but it had already become precious.
‘I will protect you.’
To do that, she had to leave this place. Raymond would
surely harm the child.
Elise gazed into the night once more. The fear remained,
but she was not alone.
For the child inside her, Elise summoned her courage.
A small figure slipped into the darkness.

Raymond opened his eyes, feeling sunlight seeping through
his closed eyes.
His face was buried in the bedsheets. Sitting up suddenly,
he realized he had been sleeping face down in Elise’s bed.
But she was nowhere in sight.
“Elise?”
He stood, the room filled with an eerie silence, the warmth
gone. Before he could gather his thoughts, he noticed the
absence on his wrist.

The bracelet of keys was missing.
Raymond froze, motionless for a long moment before he
staggered to the door and grasped the handle.
It rattled, but wouldn’t budge. It had been locked from the
outside.
Slowly, his gaze drifted to the dining table, where the bowl
of pea soup sat.
It took only a second for him to realize what had happened.
“Heh… haha…”
Looking out the window at the midday sun, Raymond let out
a hollow laugh.
A sleeping drug indeed—it had worked exceptionally well. It
had put him to sleep so deeply that he hadn’t stirred all
night.
Ordinarily, he was a light sleeper. He would have heard
Elise’s footsteps as she left.
He’d deliberately left the creaky stairs unfixed to alert him
to any movement.
“So you did overhear our conversation,” he muttered to
himself, his voice low and sinister.
His gaze fell on an embroidery hoop lying on the floor, the
fabric missing.
As if sensing something, his eyes shifted to the fireplace,
where only a charred corner of fabric remained.
Elise had been embroidering the Hartmann family crest.
“So, you’d rather…”
Even in broad daylight, his green eyes were dark with
malice as he murmured,
“…become the Duke’s slave than my wife?”
Raymond’s face twisted with rage, and fury surged through
him.
“Arghhhh!”
He flipped the table. Plates and silverware crashed and
shattered. He roared and destroyed everything in reach.
Not until he’d thrown every last thing in the room was there
silence.
“Hah… hah…”
But even now, he couldn’t contain his seething anger. His
eyes roamed the room, searching for something to unleash
his fury upon. He lifted a chair and smashed it into the floor.
Bang!
With a resounding crash, the door splintered open.


Dozens of armed guards burst into the room, surrounding
him in an instant.
“Raymond Hartmann, you are under arrest for the
kidnapping and imprisonment of a noble lady.”
The guards secured him with ropes, forcing him to stand
upright.
With deliberate steps, a man entered, his boots crunching
over broken glass and scattered pieces of shattered dishes.
“Cardale von Vassenberg.”
Raymond glared at the Duke with bloodshot eyes, almost
spitting out his name.
But the Duke, unmoved by his fury, calmly surveyed the
room before finally turning his gaze to him.
“Where is Elise?”
At the composed question, Raymond felt his insides twist
with rage.
The man who had bought Elise like property, tamed her,
hurt her with cruel words, and made her innocent eyes fill
with tears. He had taken her without hesitation to satisfy his
own desires.
And yet, it was this man who had won her heart. It was he
who had left a life growing inside her.
Raymond couldn’t comprehend any of it—Elise’s choices,
the Duke’s confidence. And he was unbearably angry.
‘If I can’t have her… then neither will you.’
Lifting his head high, Raymond answered defiantly, “Elise is
gone.”
“Gone…?”
Cardale glanced around the wrecked room, a faint laugh
escaping him.
“More like she escaped from you.”
With a dull metallic clink, something fell at Raymond’s feet
—a bracelet loaded with keys.
“I found this on the way in.”
Raymond looked down at the bundle of keys in silence
before lifting his gaze again.
“So, you really think Elise will return to you?”
Cardale’s eyebrow twitched slightly.
“I warned you not to speak her name.”
“If you’re so certain, then go back to the residence and wait
for her to come find you,” Raymond sneered, pouring all his
hostility into his words.
“But it won’t happen. Didn’t I tell you? Given the chance,
Elise will flee from you the first chance she gets.”
The Duke’s gaze turned icy, freezing the air in the room.
The soldiers tensed, but Raymond, now half-mad, only
laughed.
“In the end, she ran from both of us. Not only from me but
from you as well.”
Cardale watched the hysterically laughing man, then gave a
quiet command.
“He’s a criminal charged with kidnapping and confining a
noble lady. Take him away.”
“Yes, sir!”
Soldiers grabbed Raymond by both arms, but he struggled,
shouting in defiance.
“A lady? When did you ever treat Elise like a lady?”
Even as he was dragged away, he shouted with all his
might, veins standing out on his neck.
“Elise will never come back to you! She despises you! She
said spending nights with you was repulsive, that she finally
felt free, finally felt human without you!”
Cardale didn’t respond or even glance in his direction. The
accusations were not worth a response.
Yet an intense, dangerous aura radiated from the man
standing still in the center of the room, preventing anyone
from approaching. After a moment, he spoke.
“She couldn’t have gone far. Search every corner.”
“Yes, sir.”
After all, they were still within the capital. There was only so
far someone with such a small, frail body could go. This
feeling of unbearable irritation must have stemmed from
the disruption of his plan to return home with her.
Yet, he couldn’t shake an inexplicable sense of unease and
tightness in his throat.
It felt as if his patience was being tested.
Cardale roughly yanked off his cravat, the veins on his hand
standing out as he clenched the cravat pin tightly.
‘Elise Schuvan.’
‘Think carefully about where you’re supposed to go. Don’t
be foolish. Don’t make another mistake and end up crying.’
‘You won’t get a second chance.’

After leaving the safe house, Elise found herself on a
mountain path. Fortunately, the incline was gentle.
She made her way down cautiously, trying not to trip over
roots or stones.
When the dark forest grew intimidating, she instinctively
cradled her belly, then continued walking once her fear
subsided.
By the time she reached a main road where people were
starting to appear, dawn had broken.
‘I have to get out of this area first.’
Her legs throbbed, and her feet ached from walking for so
long, but she couldn’t stop. She had no idea when Raymond
would awaken. Locking the door would only delay him for a
short while.
“Excuse me, do you know where the nearest carriage stop
is?”
“Try over there.”
After asking around, she found a bustling carriage station.
Surrounded by people and carriages, Elise suddenly realized
she had no money on her.
‘There’s no time.’
She untied the silk ribbon from her half-tied hair and held it
out to the driver of the nearest carriage.
“Would this cover the fare?”
If he refused, she would try another. But the driver, seeing
the expensive silk, gave a quick nod.
“Get in.”
Elise climbed in quickly, and soon, other passengers filled
the empty seats, their lively chatter filling the space.
“This month’s business was a complete loss! With how hard
it’s been to get in and out of the capital, ugh!”
A man loading a large crate clicked his tongue, grumbling.
Another man next to him asked,
“Is security that strict?”
“You have no idea. It takes two or three days just to get
through checkpoints. Are they even trying to let people in?”
“Well, after the Helmut treason incident, it’s no wonder the
whole capital is on edge.”
Elise sucked in a breath.
She remembered Raymond’s ominous threats and the
newspaper article he had shown her.
“So, there are still traitors on the run?”
“Most of the leaders have been captured and executed, but
there must be relatives who managed to escape and are in
hiding.”
They speculated that the strict inspections were in place to
catch these fugitives.
“By imperial law, when a family is executed for treason, all
adult male heirs are put to death, while women and children
are sold into slavery.”
Elise shrank further into the corner, terrified someone might
recognize her.
‘I can’t leave the capital…’
If she tried to escape and got caught, it would all be over.
She couldn’t go to either the Schuvan or Vassenberg
estates. Both were dangerous places for her child. Her
fingers, clenched in a fist, trembled.
Then… where should I go?
“They’ll ease up eventually. They can’t keep the city locked
down forever.”
Inside the rattling carriage, Elise listened carefully, forming
a plan based on the passengers’ conversation.
‘I’ll have to hide and wait until the inspections end… then
find a way out of the capital.’
As far as possible, somewhere no one would know her. But
even as she steeled herself, a small pang of longing gnawed
at her heart.
‘Mother…’
She had no idea about her mother’s health or even if she
was still alive. Raymond had promised to find her but hadn’t
said a word, not even while slipping the drug into her soup.
‘Please forgive me. Someday, I promise…’
‘Will I ever find you? Will we ever meet again?’
The questions surfaced, but she pressed them down.
She feared being swept away by a wave of despair too great
to bear.

After stopping at several places, the carriage reached the
7th district, Melvic.
A bustling part of the capital known for both its vibrancy and
its high crime rate—a place Elise knew well.
After a brief moment of thought, she got off the carriage
when it stopped.
Her first destination was the crowded shopping street. She
needed to exchange her clothes.
“Those are some fine clothes.”
The shopkeeper’s eyes swept over her outfit with interest.
Elise steadied her voice, speaking clearly.
“I’d like to sell these clothes in exchange for something else.
I’ll take the difference in coins.”
“Gladly.”
After changing into a rough, plain outfit, she donned a
hooded cloak. The shopkeeper handed her a small pouch.
“You got a good deal.”
Taking the weighty pouch, Elise headed for the exit but
paused.
Armed soldiers were patrolling the street.
The shopkeeper sighed irritably as he noticed Elise’s
hesitation.
“When will they stop messing with business under the guise
of security?”
Elise asked cautiously,
“Are there a lot of soldiers around?”
“They’re everywhere. The constant patrols have scared off
so many customers.”
When the soldiers finally passed, Elise waited until they
were out of sight before slipping out of the shop.
‘I need to find a place to stay.’
She needed to secure a safe room, at least for a few days.
By the time she found a suitable room, it was already late
into the afternoon. As soon as she paid the rent, a wave of
hunger hit her.
Only then did she realize she hadn’t eaten all day.
Though she was used to going without food, she decided to
eat something for the sake of the child she carried.
Fortunately, the scent of food in the nearby inn didn’t make
her nauseous.
It felt as if the child was helping her manage.
After eating, she got up to return to her room.
At the end of the street, a group of soldiers suddenly
appeared.

Elise froze in place. Around her, the people murmured, 
“What’s going on?”
“Looks like they’re looking for someone.”
The soldiers moved with purpose, as if they already knew
their destination, not bothering to search the surrounding
area.
 
And the building they entered en masse was the inn she’d
just secured a room in.
Panicked, Elise dashed out of the restaurant. All she could
think about was finding somewhere out of sight
immediately.
By the time she came to her senses, she found herself on a
path leading out of the main area. Recognizing the street,
she took a shaky breath.
“There….”
Her gaze wandered toward the dim end of the path, a place
as dark as the mouth of a cave—the slums on the outskirts
of Melvic.
‘But right now, that might be the safest place for me…’
She needed a place where the soldiers wouldn’t think to
look. If she was lucky, maybe she could find her way back to
the place where she’d once stayed.
She began to walk.
Memories of the first time she’d taken this path resurfaced.
The day she risked everything to find Count Schuvan to
save her mother. Lying on the ground, defeated, when a
figure approached.
‘That was the first time we met…’
The man’s face had been striking, his red eyes intense like
the sun, his voice reverberating in her mind.
She could still recall that moment vividly, even the
afternoon sunlight that filtered down above her.
She had felt pure joy as she returned, clutching the pouch of
coins he’d given her. Elated and hopeful, believing she could
save her mother.
That wasn’t the only reason, though Elise hadn’t yet realized
what her emotions truly were.
She held the pouch hidden in her cloak close. Its weight was
similar to that old one, the path she walked was the same,
but her heart was vastly different.
But whenever fear and sadness threatened to take over,
Elise forced herself to push them away.
‘I can’t break down.’
She wasn’t alone anymore.
‘If I don’t protect this child, no one else will…’
As she pressed on, her surroundings grew worse.
The streets narrowed and darkened, the puddles on the
ground reeked unpleasantly.
Gone were the sounds of laughter and music, replaced by
shouts and drunken brawls.
Finally, she reached the slums and paused. Her feet burned
as if they were on fire. When she stopped and slipped off
her shoes, she saw her feet had blistered from the journey.
‘It’s alright. I can keep walking.’
In the past, she’d traveled distances like this regularly. She
reminded herself not to give in and slipped her shoes back
on.
Then she lifted her head and took in her surroundings.
Though a year had passed, it was exactly as she
remembered.
Trash was strewn everywhere, rats scurried around
undisturbed by the sight of people. The place was still
rough, filthy, and dangerous.
‘I need to find shelter before it gets dark.’
She limped slightly as she walked along the bumpy road,
her shadow stretching long and thin under the setting sun.
‘Once I pass this part…’
Just as she was about to turn a corner, she froze in her
tracks.
Under the fiery glow of the sunset, her blue eyes fixed on a
spot—the alley outside the cramped room where she had
once stayed with Marissa. There, familiar faces were
gathered, including the landlady and several soldiers.
“Yes, yes, don’t worry! If she shows up, I’ll make sure to hold
onto her!”
“We’ll be waiting for your message.”
‘They’ve come all the way here to catch me…!’
Elise’s face turned pale. She spun around and hurried away,
stumbling as her legs threatened to give out beneath her.
Only after she’d put a safe distance between herself and the
scene could she catch her breath.
‘What do I do now…’
She leaned against a wall in a narrow alley, looking up at
the darkening sky. The sun was setting.
‘I don’t know where else to go…’
There was nowhere for her to turn. Not the inn, nor her old
home in the slums, nor Count Schuvan’s mansion. And…
The image of the mansion where she had stayed for half a
year came to mind—the warm sunlight on the garden, the
trumpet vine climbing the corridors, the kind servants.
And the man, terrifying and cold yet sometimes gentle.
‘I can’t go back…’
There truly was nowhere. Under this vast sky, she had no
small space where she could rest her body, no room to
shelter herself and her unborn child.
A wave of despair washed over her.
Sliding down to the cold ground, Elise leaned her back
against the wall.
Endless worries filled her mind.
‘What should I do? Is my mother safe? How can I protect my
child…?’
She had escaped Raymond’s grasp, but the world around
her was a jungle filled with predators. And now, the hunters
were closing in on her from all sides.
Her confidence to evade the tightening net dwindled.
‘Could I raise my child in secret, without the Duke ever
knowing?’
At last, she faced the reality she had tried so hard to avoid.
‘He must think I betrayed him…’
She had lied to him and even run away; there was no way
he would forgive her now.
‘He said there would be no second chances.’
Would things have turned out differently if she hadn’t fallen
asleep in the tent?
The question was useless, yet she couldn’t help but wonder.
Raymond’s ruthless words also echoed in her mind.
“Did the Duke truly let you see your mother?”
“After the hunt is over…”
“So, the Schuvan family was accused of treason during the
hunt?”
Even if she hadn’t left the hunting grounds, things would
have ended the same…
The conclusion made her heart ache as if it were being
squeezed. Elise’s head drooped.
‘If only he had cared for me, even a little…’
Then the Schuvan family wouldn’t have fallen as traitors,
she wouldn’t be cursed with the blood of a traitor, and her
innocent child wouldn’t be condemned to slavery.
Her vision blurred with tears. She tried to remain strong, but
it was useless. The tears finally spilled over, wetting her
cheeks.
Elise buried her face in her knees, crying quietly. Her fingers
clutched the pendant on her necklace.
What happened to her didn’t matter. If she were alone, she
would have gone to the Duke, begging for forgiveness. Even
if he didn’t forgive her, she would have accepted it.
But it was different with her child. This innocent life, still
unseeing of the world, bore no guilt.
‘I’m sorry, Mother…’
Her mother had wished only for her daughter to live a life
unlike her own, to meet a good person and build a simple,
happy family. She had prayed for Elise to have the miracle
of a child, to be happy.
Yet Elise had failed to fulfill any of those wishes.
Knowing her mother might be in danger, she loathed herself
for doing nothing to help.
‘But I… I want to protect this child. I don’t want to lose
them.’
Tears dripped from her clenched hands.
‘Please, give me the strength. Don’t let me give up…’
In the dim, darkened corner of an alley in the slums, Elise
huddled against the bitter night air, praying for her child.

The Duke had not slept a wink through the night. He’d been
waiting, yet no news had come by dawn.
‘Where could the young lady possibly be?’
Michael sighed silently, casting cautious glances at his
master.
Despite the sleepless night, the Duke showed no signs of
fatigue.
He leafed through documents and moved his quill
gracefully, without a single unnecessary motion.
However, there was an unsettling look on his otherwise
expressionless face.
The atmosphere in the room was indescribably tense, a cold
presence growing more intense with each passing moment.
The cause of this wasn’t difficult to guess.
‘The young lady needs to return to the Duke’s mansion
soon.’
Just then, there was a knock at the door, and Norman
entered. Michael looked up, hope flaring in his eyes, but
Norman gave a slight shake of his head.
“Your Grace, an aide from Count Schuvan is here to see
you.”
Without looking up from his documents, Cardale replied,
“I thought I made it clear that no one was to be admitted.”
“My apologies. However, the visitor claims they have
information regarding Lady Elise.”
Cardale raised his head, setting his quill aside.
“Let them in.”
Shortly afterward, Vanessa followed Norman into the room.
“I’m Vanessa Lockseed. Thank you for seeing me on such
short notice.”
After her introduction, she got straight to the point.
“I understand Lady Elise is missing.”
Cardale’s sharp gaze assessed her. She had a keen, intense
look, befitting her character.
He was aware of how Vanessa had “trained” Elise;
occasional remarks and prior investigations had given him
an idea.
“News certainly travels fast.”
He had been confident he could bring his precious deer back
to his side before any rumors spread, but the arrival of
Count Schuvan’s right-hand was unwelcome.
“Did Damien Schuvan tell you this?”
“More important than that, shouldn’t finding her be the
priority?”
“So, you think you can find her?”
Cardale sneered, but Vanessa remained composed.
“I know where she is.”
The man tilted his head slightly, his mouth curving into a
chilling smile.
“And how exactly?”
Vanessa felt the tension tighten at his unexpectedly cold
response, and her voice stiffened as she replied.
“I can track Lady Elise through the pendant necklace I gave
her.”
Cardale’s eyes narrowed.
He had the pendant inspected, confirming it posed no
particular threat. Had they missed something?
“So, it wasn’t a gesture of goodwill.”
His displeasure was evident.
“Revealing your deceit—do you think I’d overlook that
arrogance? Or is this mere foolishness?”
“Neither,” Vanessa replied quickly, shaking her head.
“The pendant was indeed Marissa’s; I received it from her
directly. You can verify it if you’d like.”
“And yet you added a tracking element?”
“I did no such thing. I know such things wouldn’t work.”
She quickly revealed the truth.
“I trained one of Count Schwann’s messenger birds.”
Cardale recalled the bird with midnight feathers and violet
eyes that Gerhard Schwann had once used—a bird he had
once intercepted and sent back to the Count.
So, there had been more than one of them.
“As you may have guessed, that bird is not ordinary,” she
explained.
Indeed, he knew that. The eerie violet eyes marked it as
something that could only come from rare, ancient magic.
“I can’t pinpoint her exact location, but I can narrow it down
to a certain radius. I would gladly share that information
with you, Your Grace.”
Trying to gain favor with both Gerhard and Damien Schuvan
—and now, Vassenberg too.
Cardale let out a faint laugh.
“What’s your condition?”
Vanessa looked briefly taken aback by his straightforward
question, but sensing an advantage, she voiced her
ambition.
“I want a chance to earn a position that befits me.”
“A title, then.”
Cardale didn’t mince words, and Vanessa didn’t deny it.
“Yes, that’s correct.”
She was cunning enough not to hide her motives, and he
found her self-assurance unsettling, reminiscent of the
Grand Duchess and Princess Theresia.
“Who else knows about this tracking capability on the
pendant?”
“Only I do. I handled the training alone.”
At least that answer was acceptable. Leaning back, Cardale
held her gaze, then spoke with cool precision.
“Melvic, District 7.”

“Unless it’s the exact building, giving me a rough area holds
little value.”
“That… can’t be…”
A flicker of dismay crossed Vanessa’s face. Cardale
observed her reaction before speaking again, his words
sharp.
“So, Damien Schuvan has taken over Count Schuvan’s
estate. I’d like to hear more about that.”
Vanessa immediately understood the implication—this was a
chance to strike a deal.
‘I have to take it.’
After Fritz’s sudden disappearance, Damien had essentially
seized the position of young count and ignored her
presence.
He treated her with the courtesy expected for his father’s
aide, but Vanessa, perceptive as ever, sensed he was
deliberately keeping his distance. And the Count himself
was tense, wary of the fallout after other families had been
exposed and brought down. She shared his unease.
That was why she had come to the Duke.
Only, she hadn’t expected her bargaining chip to be
dismissed. She couldn’t afford to let this chance slip away.
“I will tell you everything. What would you like to know?”
He asked a few pointed questions about Damien and
Gerhard, and Vanessa answered truthfully. She could have
lied, but one look at Cardale’s sharp gaze dispelled that
thought.
She couldn’t shake the feeling that he was seeing right
through her, that her inner thoughts were laid bare.
“That was quite useful.”
At last, he was done with his questions, and Vanessa felt a
wave of relief, mixed with anticipation. She hoped for at
least a hint of his approval.
But then, the topic shifted unexpectedly.
“I hear you trained Elise.”
She flinched, uncertain of his intentions.
“Yes… that’s correct,” she replied cautiously, unsure of what
Elise might have said about her.
“I hear you taught her a variety of things with much effort.”
Apparently, Elise hadn’t mentioned anything incriminating.
Her grueling training had succeeded in keeping Elise silent.
“Yes. I taught her many things she didn’t know.”
“I see.”
Cardale’s lips curved faintly.
“Your efforts deserve recognition.”
Vanessa’s face brightened in an instant as she heard the
long-awaited promise of reward.
“Thank you, Your Grace!”
Cardale lowered his gaze back to the papers in front of him,
signaling the end of their conversation. Michael opened the
office door for her.
Vanessa followed Norman out of the room, her steps quick
and light with excitement.
Once the door closed, the office fell silent, the air thick with
a quiet intensity as if their exchange had never occurred.
Standing upright, Michael spoke.
“I’ll increase the search efforts in Melvic.”
Vassenberg’s shadows were already combing Melvic under
Cardale’s orders.
Though they had yet to find Elise Schuvan, it was only a
matter of time.
Cardale rose slowly. As he did, Michael instinctively turned
to face the large window, which offered a view of the
garden.
But the garden, where someone should have been waiting,
was empty.
The Duke’s voice cut through the silence.
“Set a trap.”
The words were cryptic, and Michael, feeling his mouth dry,
ventured a question.
“A… trap, Your Grace?”
“A convincing lure. One that will make the prey unable to
resist coming to it.”
Cardale’s mouth twisted. He crossed the office and picked
up a hunting rifle propped against the wall.
‘Does he mean to go hunting to clear his mind?’ Michael
wondered.
“Summon the gunsmith.”
Michael swallowed involuntarily.
The Duke’s collection of hunting rifles was already
extensive, so this was nothing unusual. And yet, Michael
couldn’t shake an ominous feeling.
‘The hunt is over, and we’re in the middle of searching for
Lady Elise—so why summon a gunsmith now?’
‘Surely, it can’t be…’
But Michael stifled his unease and answered calmly,
masking the anxiety brewing within.
“Yes, Your Grace. I will do so.”
The office fell back into an eerie stillness.
It was calm like the eye of a storm.

News of Raymond’s arrest threw the Hartmann household
into disarray.
The Marquis and his wife, who had discreetly supported
their son, quickly grasped the gravity of the situation.
They rushed to seek an audience with the Emperor to
secure Raymond’s release.
However, the Emperor, appearing extremely fatigued,
responded,
“I have entrusted this matter to Duke Vassenberg. You
would do better to try persuading him.”
Subsequent requests to meet with the Duke were all denied.
They were also barred from seeing Raymond. 
That wasn’t the end of it.
Problems began to arise within the businesses operated by
the Hartmann family.
It was as if someone had been meticulously preparing to
strike, with several crises erupting overnight. The situation
was not just serious—it was critical.
Only then did they realize the truth: the reason they had
been unscathed until now wasn’t due to the Hartmann
family’s influence, but simply because Cardale Vassenberg
had allowed it.
Marcus Hartmann penned a letter.
It was a humiliating admission, pledging to meet any
conditions the Duke required. Only then was he granted an
audience.
The Duke’s steward guided Marcus to the office door.
Inside, a voice filled with excitement was heard.
“Look at the smoothness of the barrel! It has a much longer
range and greater accuracy than typical hunting rifles. I
assure you, Your Grace, you will be more than satisfied with
its use!”
It appeared the Duke was purchasing rifles from the
gunsmith. The rumors about the Duke’s fondness for
hunting were evidently true.
After announcing Marcus’s arrival, the steward led him into
the office.
The Duke seemed to have just chosen his rifle of interest.
“I’ll take the one you recommended,” Cardale said.
The gunsmith, bowing repeatedly, quickly left the office.
Marcus gave the man a sidelong glance before turning his
gaze back to the Duke.
The young man didn’t bother to rise, exuding an air of pure
arrogance. Likewise, Marcus skipped formalities and spoke
directly.
“Tell me what you want, Duke.”

The Marquis felt tormented under a gaze that seemed to
weigh his sincerity.
Even now, as he faced the Duke, he had no idea what trials
Raymond was suffering in the noble prison.
“Did I not promise to do whatever was required? I have no
intention of backing out, so tell me.”
Cardale looked at the Marquis’s green eyes with the same
distasteful hue as his. With a brief nod, he acknowledged it.
Michael handed the documents to Marquis Hartmann.
“Once you sign, the deal is settled.”
The blood drained from Marcus’s face as he read the
document, his hand trembling slightly as he gripped it.
Yet, clenching his teeth, he replied, “I accept.”
Signing the papers with a swift scrawl, the Marquis looked at
his opponent with burning eyes.
Cardale willingly met his gaze.
“You’ll be able to see your son now.”
Marcus’s resolute expression crumbled in an instant, and he
hurriedly left the Duke’s residence as if fleeing.
After the Marquis departed, Cardale’s gaze drifted leisurely
over the signed document.
“Report back when Raymond Hartmann leaves the capital.”
“Yes, Your Excellency.”
Once Michael exited, Cardale closed his eyes slowly, alone.
With this, Raymond Hartmann was dealt with. Elise would
never encounter him again.
The mother whom Elise longed to meet was also safe under
his protection.
‘So come back soon, Elise.’
Cardale recalled the mother deer he had once shot and the
young fawn unable to leave her injured side. 
The hesitation, frozen with faint hope, and the innocent,
terrified eyes looking at him as he aimed his gun.
Soon, that would be the look Elise would give him. The very
thought filled him with exhilaration.
Cardale thought of the animal heads he once displayed like
trophies on his wall.
‘Before my patience runs out.’
Even in ruin, she would be beautiful, just like the countless
hunted creatures that had satisfied him before.
But for now, he could wait a little longer.
He wasn’t accustomed to holding back, nor did he have the
temperament for it, but he could overlook a lost little dove
stumbling its way back.
“Elise will never return to you! She despised you. She said
nights with you were chilling, that only now could she
breathe, that she felt like she was finally living as a person!”
Nonsense. Cardale dismissed Raymond’s words as the
delusional ranting of someone who’d lost his mind.
“In the end, she ran away from both of us, not just me.”
Raymond might have wished so fervently, but Elise had
never run from him.
Even when he was harsh, even when he handled her
roughly in bed, even when she wept bitterly, her choice was
always the same.
“I want to stay by your side, Your Grace…”
“Please, don’t abandon me…”
Yes. Cardale acknowledged the sweetness of that tearful
confession.
Even if her choice had been closer to the instinct of a
trapped doe than a sincere feeling, it didn’t matter.
After all, what he sought from Elise Schuvan wasn’t her
heart.
The trap was set, and she would surely be caught. All he
had to do was watch the helpless struggle and cries of the
doe, bind her, and bring her into his arms.
Yet, why did an irritating and strange anxiety gnaw at him
every now and then?
Cardale fiddled with his cravat pin, the touch of the rounded
ornament restoring his calm.
Instinctively, he sensed urgency. If he delayed any longer,
truly…
Just as yesterday and the day before, Cardale picked up his
hunting rifle.

Her morning sickness had worsened.
“Ugh!”
Elise clamped a hand over her mouth, her stomach churning
as soon as she rose.
After several retches, she finally managed to lift herself.
On a small table in the corner lay a piece of stale bread and
an apple from the previous night. Though hard and dry, it
wasn’t the time to complain to the landlord. It was one of
the few edible things she had, so she forced it down.
Three days. She’d stayed in this tiny attic for that long.
During this time, she had been sick for two days straight.
Her body, exhausted from wandering the streets at night,
couldn’t handle it any longer.
But she had no one to turn to.
She’d already paid more than half of her money, and she
feared she’d be thrown out if deemed too troublesome.
After filling her stomach slightly, she felt a bit more strength
return.
Elise dampened a cloth to clean her face and hands,
fastening her cloak in front of a cracked mirror. When she
searched for the money she’d hidden in the room, her heart
sank.
‘…It’s gone.’
The pouch, which should’ve been there, was missing.
Someone had clearly taken it while she was unwell and
unaware.
Elise bit her lip tightly and left the attic.
“Excuse me…”
The woman who’d rented her the attic at an exorbitant rate
glanced at her. Elise hesitated as she approached her
landlord.
“I, um… I was hoping…”
She intended to say the money was essential to her and to
ask for it back.
“Make sure next week’s rent isn’t late.”
But before she could finish, the woman cut her off.
“Next… week?”
The original rental period was for a month. Elise looked at
the woman in shock, but her landlord only smirked with
greater audacity.
‘She knows…’
That’s when Elise realized the woman had figured out she
was on the run. And now, she was taking advantage of
Elise’s vulnerability. Her heart raced.
She couldn’t argue with the woman who held the threat of
reporting her to the authorities.
In the end, Elise could only reply meekly.
“…I’ll look for work.”
“Good.”
The woman, smirking, sent Elise off.
“Good luck finding a job. You’ll need it to pay next week’s
rent.”
As the door shut, Elise stood dazed for a moment. Snippets
of the conversation from inside reached her ears.
“Wouldn’t it be better to report her to the authorities and
get the reward?”
“She said she’ll make money. We can keep squeezing her for
a while before we report her.”
Elise took a deep breath, fighting against despair. She would
never return to this place.
‘Is there any way to leave the capital?’
Desperate, she went to the carriage station, only to learn
that inspections were still thorough.
‘What should I do? I don’t even have money for my next
meal.’
Finding a job was her only option. She headed toward the
village notice board. In the past, she’d found work there
occasionally.
If she was lucky, she might find a job that provided room
and board.
She needed to save up for when she could finally leave the
capital.
‘Once my belly starts showing, I won’t be able to find work
at all.’
If she found a stable place to settle, she planned to work as
much as possible until she could no longer bear it.
Elise’s eyes scanned the notice board quickly. She was
fortunate to be able to read.
Some announcements were pictorial, but those jobs tended
to have poor conditions.
However, there were few suitable options. Most required
physical strength or were seeking men.
It was by chance that Elise’s gaze drifted to the far right of
the board, where local announcements were posted.
Reading through marriage and death notices, she froze at
one in particular.
[A funeral mass to honor the repose of Marissa…]
Elise’s heart sank, her hands flying to cover her mouth. Her
wide, shocked eyes trembled violently.
‘No, no… This can’t be…’
She had heard from her father, Count Schuvan, that her
mother was in hiding somewhere outside the capital.
Because of this, she had forced herself to believe her
mother was safe.
But there, in the notice, unmistakable features described
her mother.
Brown hair and blue eyes. And a past residence in the
slums.
‘It might not be true. Maybe someone with a similar name
and appearance also lived in the slums… The Melvic slums
are the largest in the capital…’
She tried to deny it, but unease gnawed at her heart.
Her fingers, pale as if dipped in winter ice, trembled as she
read the lower part of the notice.
According to the announcement, the funeral mass would
take place at a nearby village cemetery.
And it was today.


Elise’s legs faltered as she stumbled forward, nearly
collapsing under the weight of her anguish.
Despite repeatedly telling herself it couldn’t be true, deep
down, she knew the words on the village notice board
weren’t lies. The steady flow of tears confirmed what her
heart feared most.
Her vision continuously blurred, and she wiped away the
tears with the back of her hand as she finally reached the
cemetery.
Moving quietly to avoid being seen, she slipped further
inside. Before long, she spotted a small gathering of people
dressed in black.
‘Please, let it not be her. Let it be someone else, not my
mother.’
Yet, the familiar faces of those in attendance—a few people
who had once provided sewing work to her mother—dashed
any remaining hope.
The priest spoke with merciless clarity as he recited the
deceased’s name.
“May Marissa find rest in the arms of the divine…”
Elise’s legs gave out, and she collapsed to the ground, tears
pouring from her eyes.
“It’s my fault that Mother…”
Her mother, who had once been her entire world. Her
mother, who had sacrificed everything for her, who had met
such a tragic end because of her.
How was she supposed to go on now? Left alone in this
world, fear swept over her in relentless waves. The thought
of her newfound solitude was enough to drown her in terror
and sorrow.
‘No.’
Elise placed a hand on her abdomen.
‘I have my baby…’
She remembered the life growing inside her. She couldn’t
feel anything yet, aside from her morning sickness, but this
tiny presence was precious to her.
‘My child.’
The baby felt like a thread connecting her to the world,
urging her not to give up and to keep surviving, no matter
what.
Steadying her heart, Elise whispered a final farewell to her
mother, who was departing on a journey from which there
was no return.
‘I may never come back here, but I’ll remember you forever,
Mother. I’ll tell your story to the child who’s soon to come
into this world. So, please, rest in peace…’
As Elise opened her eyes, an odd shiver crawled across her
skin.
A strange, unsettling sensation arose, like someone was
watching her. Growing wary, Elise scanned her
surroundings, yet everything seemed unchanged.
Perhaps it was just the somber atmosphere of the graveyard
making her feel uneasy.
As she forced herself to ignore the discomfort and tried to
calm herself, a chill suddenly prickled her body from her
fingertips to her toes—a cold, eerie foreboding.
Gripping the hem of her skirt tightly, Elise’s hands shook.
Slowly, her gaze followed the source of the chilling
sensation.
And then she met his eyes.
‘…!’
Her heart plummeted. Only one thought flooded her mind.
‘I can’t let him catch me.’
Elise took a step back, the blood-red eyes stared at her with
an expression that pierced through her.
‘If he catches me… the baby will be in danger.’
She might lose everything.
At that moment, a crow cawed ominously in the distance.
By the time she realized what was happening, she had
already turned and started running, with no time to think of
anything else.
“According to Imperial law, the punishment for treason is to
execute the direct male heirs, while women and children are
sold into slavery.”
The life of an “illegitimate girl” had been brutal, with no
choice but to endure it silently.
But at least she hadn’t been a slave. There had always been
the hope that someday she could live a normal life.
‘But my child…’
A life doomed to a miserable fate simply because it had
come to her. She could never let that happen to her child.
With that single thought driving her, Elise ran desperately.
But her weak, malnourished body, exhausted from days of
poor sleep and little food, wouldn’t cooperate.
Her legs wobbled, her strength fading. Her head spun.
‘Please, help me, just this once. Let me escape…’
Elise gasped for air, silently pleading with the heavens.
Though her prayers had never been answered before, she
yearned for a miracle for the first and last time.
Suddenly, she noticed the silence around her and
instinctively halted.
The eerie stillness felt ominous.
As her head turned in dread, she saw him—aiming a gun at
her.
‘No!’
Her mind went blank with fear.
‘Please, save my child…’
Before she could even voice her plea, he pulled the trigger.
A deafening gunshot echoed, shaking her to her core as her
body collapsed.
Panting in terror, Elise checked herself, her heartbeat
thundering in her ears.
‘I wasn’t hit. I’m… I’m still okay.’
Trembling, she gingerly touched her belly. She and her baby
were unharmed. If she ran now, they could be safe.
But her mind, paralyzed by fear, struggled to grasp the
situation fully.
With pale hands, she braced herself against the ground,
attempting to stand, only for her trembling legs to fail her.
Then, another shot rang out with a dull thud as the soil near
her head exploded.
Elise froze.
‘Please… someone… help me.’
Her entire body shook, her teeth chattering as she begged
like prey caught in a predator’s snare, awaiting her end.
‘Please, spare me… The baby… has done nothing wrong…’
A shadow loomed over her. Instinctively, Elise curled
inwards, her body moving to protect her unborn child.
A large hand pressed down on her back, familiar yet more
terrifying than she’d ever imagined.
“Elise.”
A deep, menacing voice called her name—the voice she had
dreaded, yet it wasn’t the divine intervention she had
prayed for.
No, it was her master, Cardale Vassenberg.
He forced her to look up at him, tilting her chin. She had no
choice but to meet his gaze, his crimson eyes cold and
harsh.
“If you pull a stunt like this again…”
His grip tightened around her ankle as if it were caught in a
snare. She let out a stifled cry from the sharp pain.
“I won’t miss next time.”
‘I can’t let him know. He mustn’t find out about the baby…’
The tears she thought she had exhausted started to flow
again, one by one, unbidden.
“How disappointing.”
His hands cupped her face, pressing her cheeks and ears,
before his head dipped down, his tongue brushing against
her tear-streaked skin. The scorching sensation made her
flinch as if it would leave a mark.
But before she could pull away, he tightened his grip,
leaving her no room to move.
Elise shut her eyes, her skin burning with each touch.
His lips continued their cruel invasion, reaching her closed
eyelids, as if he could taste her fear.
“Open your eyes.”
Having licked every tear from her face, he ordered her
coldly.
Elise’s eyelids quivered, but she couldn’t bring herself to
obey, fearing his gaze more than anything. She was terrified
he would take her to the authorities to be interrogated.
“I said, open your eyes.”
His command was absolute. Reluctantly, Elise forced her
eyes open, meeting his gaze.
“I told you to stay put, yet here you are, wandering around.”
The fear was suffocating. She thought back on the difficult
days she had endured, and they seemed almost preferable
compared to this moment.
Looking up at Cardale, Elise shook with fear. He scrutinized
her with an expression as cold as ice, his gaze sweeping
over her before he spoke, his tone bitter.
“We’ll discuss the rest back at the estate.”
The implication of an interrogation drained the color from
Elise’s face.
She immediately fell to her knees, skin scraped and
bleeding from the harsh ground, yet she felt nothing.
“What do you think you’re doing?”
As his brows furrowed, her heart sank, yet all she could
think about was her child.
“Y-Your Grace…”
Her hands trembled as she clasped them together, her voice
shaky with a pleading tone.
“Please… I’m begging you. Let me go.”
Her vision blurred with fresh tears, and in her desperation,
she failed to notice Cardale’s eyes grow colder.
“Let you go?”
“If… if you forgive me this once…”
Unaware of the sinister calm in his voice, she begged him
fervently.
“I’ll leave the capital and never return. You’ll never have to
see me again…”
“Enough.”
A chill seeped through her body as if she had been plunged
into a frozen lake.
Elise’s tongue felt numb, silencing her words.
Cardale’s gaze had grown even colder, as if any warmth had
been permanently extinguished.
“I’ve been too lenient with you.”
A cruel twist tugged at the corner of his mouth.

Elise’s wrists were suddenly seized and yanked above her
head.

A gasp, like a muffled scream, escaped her lips in shock.
But Cardale didn’t flinch, gripping her wrists even tighter.
“Agh!”
A frail whimper slipped through her lips. It hurt, but the pain
in her wrists was nothing compared to the agony gnawing at
her heart.
Holding her effortlessly in his control, he spat out her name
as if it were venomous.
“Elise Schuvan.”
The low, ominous voice carried a chilling anger.
Elise’s already pale face lost what little color remained as
fear overtook her, and her body trembled. She tried to avert
her gaze, not daring to look at him, but his hand gripped her
chin, forcing her to meet his eyes.
“Where do you think you’re going?”
Now forced to look at him, Elise’s breath caught as she
stared into his face, twisted with cruelty, his gaze filled with
fierce intensity.
She had never seen him look this terrifying before. The
overwhelming fear seemed to burrow into her mind,
numbing her senses.
“Am I a joke to you?”
Elise frantically shook her head, but his cold, merciless
expression didn’t waver.
Too late, a thought crossed her mind that she had made a
mistake, that something was terribly wrong.
Yet whatever she was about to say was swallowed by his
next words.
“Did you think that after sharing a bed for a few months,
you had any kind of power here? That I’d simply let this
slide?”
The impact of his words struck her like lightning. And in that
moment, Elise understood.
She had clung to a desperate hope, denying her own foolish
expectations—that Cardale might save her, that by some
miracle, her family would escape the accusations of treason.
She had allowed herself to dream an impossible dream.
But it was nothing more than a fragile illusion.
Elise looked up at Cardale, her tear-filled eyes wide with
despair.
The cold detachment in his gaze and the harsh words cut
her deeply.
‘The Duke truly…’
Raymond’s words had been true. Cardale had never
intended to save her or her family.
‘I’m nothing at all.’
A painful swell rose from deep within her chest, forcing her
to swallow it back down.
The one who’d foolishly harbored expectations, who had
dreamed in vain, was none other than her.
“You’re just a servant, a mere plaything, daring to
overstep.”
But the brutal words struck her heart mercilessly, making it
nearly impossible to bear.
Her already shattered heart, hanging by a thread, trembled
painfully.
Tears welled up beneath her wide, innocent eyes.
‘If I confessed that I was carrying his child… would he help
me?’
A hopeless thought almost took hold of her, but she quickly
dismissed it.
‘No.’
As a mere servant who dared to carry his precious bloodline
without permission, she might face even greater
punishment.
If the burden was hers to bear alone, she could endure it.
She could face whatever she had to.
But the greatest fear gnawing at her was that her unborn
child might bear the weight of her sins.
‘…I might lose the baby.’
The terrifying thought that her child’s life could be taken by
the duke’s own hand paralyzed her with horror.
Tears spilled over, trailing down her cheeks.
But her tears seemed to stir no reaction in him.
Releasing her wrists, Cardale straightened, his expression
cold and commanding.
“Get up.”
Her heart sank. She wasn’t ready. She had no plan, no
alternative.
Elise called to him in a trembling, pleading tone.
“M-my lord…”
“I said, get up.”
But the man was merciless. He offered no reprieve, no hint
of opportunity.
“Are my words not clear?”
The ice-cold voice fell upon her like a weight.
What could she do? How could she get out of this? In such a
desperate, precarious situation, no solution came to mind.
“You continue to resist.”
When Cardale seized her hands, forcibly pulling her up,
Elise’s mind crumbled, overwhelmed by the dread of being
taken to the authorities.
“No… I don’t want to go…”
Her thoughts, consumed by terror, left no room for reason.
“I don’t want to go… please, let me go…”
All she could do was beg, senselessly repeating herself,
asking to be let go, to be freed from this fate.
And her desperate pleas finally broke his patience.
She was suddenly pulled close, his lips brushing her ear as
he spoke in a cold, dry tone.
“If you want to live, listen closely.”
The sinister warning sent a shiver down her spine, and Elise
looked up at him, trembling.
“Do you know what my hobby is?”
His gaze bore into her as if trying to reach into her very
mind.
Elise recalled the countless trophies displayed throughout
the duke’s estate—the stuffed animals and hunting mounts.
‘Hunting.’
Cardale’s mouth twisted into a sinister smile as he watched
her expression shift.
“Usually, I kill and mount my trophies. But sometimes, I
keep them alive for a while.”
He paused, letting his words sink in, his expression chilling.
“But very few remain. Do you know why?”
A cold sweat ran down Elise’s back.
She wanted him to say he released them, that they were
allowed to live freely. But deep down, she knew that wasn’t
the answer.
As she stared at him with wide, frightened eyes, he
continued.
“Because I killed them. Every single one that dared to defy
me, annoy me, or…”
“Ah!”
“…run away.”
Cardale pressed his thumb against her wrist, right where her
pulse beat, the pressure sending a sharp pain through her
as she gasped.
“Those who were arrogant enough to flee beyond their
designated boundaries…”
Unbothered, he traced the spot with his thumb, his voice
darkening.
“They all died, struggling in pain to the very end.”
With a sickening smile, he looked down at her and asked,
“Do you think you’d be any different?”
Elise’s face turned pale. His thinly veiled threat made it
clear he could kill her any time if she crossed him, that her
life held no more value than the hunted creatures he’d
discarded.
She could only breathe in shallow, trembling gasps, realizing
her fate as a mere prey.
‘I am…’
Even now, with his child within her, she was nothing to him.
She was not even a mistress or a concubine, but an object,
less than human.
“Do you still believe the Duke will come for you? Perhaps he
will. But if he does, it will only be to keep you as his toy,
nothing more.”
Elise’s head began to spin, her vision flickering as darkness
encroached.
She felt weak and powerless.
‘My baby…’
As the world dimmed, her final thought was not for herself
but for the tiny life growing inside her.

Cardale pulled Elise’s unconscious form into his arms. Her
small, fragile body slumped against him, light as if she’d
wasted away.
Her cheeks, once filled with life, were now pale and drawn,
almost sickly.
He retraced his steps back down the path.
Elise had run this route with every ounce of her strength,
yet Cardale moved at a calm pace, his breathing steady,
barely exerted. They reached the edge of the cemetery
quickly.
A carriage waited at the entrance, one Elise had missed in
her frantic escape.
Michael and the other attendants stationed near the
carriage gave a respectful nod.
“As you ordered, the physician is prepared.”
“Move quickly.”
“Yes, Your Grace.”
Cardale climbed into the carriage, still holding Elise securely.
The horses began to gallop, the carriage surging forward at
a brisk pace.
Inside, Cardale looked down at the unconscious woman, her
face flushed and eyes swollen from her frantic, terrified
sobbing.



Her lips were cracked and peeling, and the backs of her
hands were chapped from the dry autumn wind.
In such a pitiful state.
The man brushed her wet, silver-tinged eyelids with his
thumb, his blood-red eyes suddenly gleaming with a chilling
intensity.
‘How dare you.’
A twisted smirk crept across his lips, though his eyes were
devoid of any warmth, giving him an eerie look. The cold
smile that played on his face only made his presence more
unsettling.
‘You think you can run from me?’
The feeling was filthy, like his heart was pounding erratically
with contempt.
It was the kind of feeling most people would call shock or
betrayal, but he recognized it only as anger.
Until just moments ago, Cardale had been certain he knew
everything about Elise Schuvan, down to her innermost
emotions.
The woman liked him.
Her clear eyes revealed her feelings. Her responses in bed,
her unguarded expressions, the words and looks—all of it.
For this reason, he had never considered that Elise might
deceive him.
The idea that she might leave his “fence” after only a few
days’ walk had also never crossed his mind.
But when he finally tracked her down with every resource
the Duke of Vassenberg had at his disposal, she had the
audacity to say something absurd:
“Please… I’m begging you. Let me go.”
“I’ll leave the capital and never return. You’ll never have to
see me again…”
It was clear deception. Still, Cardale made excuses for her.
He told himself that it was only nonsense brought on by the
shock and terror of being taken, the cold and hunger she’d
likely faced wandering the streets alone, the fear of being
caught by Raymond Hartmann.
But Elise truly feared him. She wanted to escape. She
wanted to leave the capital forever.
That’s why he had forced her to meet his gaze so many
times.
To read the heart of Elise Schuvan, who could never hide her
feelings. He didn’t trust what he’d read in her heart—or
rather, he simply didn’t want to believe it.
Cardale abruptly cut off his thoughts. Instead, the words
Raymond Hartmann had spat at him in rage returned to his
mind:
“Didn’t I tell you? Given the chance, Elise would run from
you in an instant.”
Cardale let out a low, humorless laugh, one tinged with
bitter realization as he suddenly saw how he’d fallen into his
own trap.
Then, his expression turned cold.
Well, does it really matter?
What he wanted from Elise Schuvan wasn’t her heart. Did
such a thing hold any true value?
In the end, she was something he could enjoy for a while
and discard once he grew bored.
Thinking this, the anger that had been boiling inside him
began to settle, leaving him feeling unexpectedly at ease.
…But was he truly at ease?
The doubt tried to surface, but he quickly brushed it aside.
Then, he traced his fingers over Elise’s red-rimmed eyes,
her dry cheeks, and finally, her chapped lips.
“I warned you that there wouldn’t be a second time.”
His low, murmuring voice fell over her sleeping face.
“I’ve been far too lenient.”
He carefully reviewed every choice he’d made regarding
Elise.
This was a woman who had made countless unforgivable
mistakes, yet she had repeatedly been given reprieves
rather than punishment.
After staring at her for a long moment, Cardale finally
arrived at a satisfying reason for his decisions.
Her body.
Yes, it was this trifling body of hers. The flesh that brought
him immense pleasure in bed, a body he found satisfying
enough to overlook her faults.
“So, when you wake up, you’ll have to beg for my
forgiveness, Elise.”
Finally coming to a suitable conclusion, Cardale, satisfied,
pulled her closer in his embrace.
The softness of her body pressed against him, her faint
scent filling his senses and softening his dark gaze.
With that, everything fell into place.
The world still moved as he desired. The arrogant man was
confident it would remain so, without a hint of doubt.

The Duke’s mistress had returned.
Her arrival brought a collective sigh of relief to the staff at
Vassenberg residence.
After capturing Raymond Hartmann but failing to locate
Elise Schuvan, the Duke had returned in a dark rage, casting
a pall over the household. For several days, they had felt as
if they were walking on thin ice.
“Welcome back, my lord.”
Even Norman, the head steward who understood the
servants’ anxieties well, felt a hint of relief as he greeted
the duke.
‘Is the lady alright?’
Norman glanced at Elise’s face, wrapped in a wool blanket
and held in the duke’s arms.
Her pale face looked weak, her condition visibly poor, and
Norman’s expression darkened with concern.
“The physician?”
“Waiting in the bedroom with the housekeeper.”
Norman, replying promptly, added, “Also, my lord, a letter
has arrived from the palace.”
Cardale’s eyes narrowed at the sight of the golden wax seal
in the steward’s hand.
“I’ll read it later.”
With a brief nod, Cardale crossed the hall. Instead of
heading to Elise’s room, he went to his own chamber.
After laying her on his bed himself, he straightened and
gave an order.
“Examine her.”
“Yes, my lord.”
Cardale’s gaze lingered on Elise for a moment. Looking
down at the woman he’d brought back, he spoke in a low
voice.
“If she wakes, make sure she doesn’t leave the bedroom.”
Linda, who had been about to assist the physician in
examining Elise, looked at him in surprise.
But Cardale didn’t stop there, issuing several more
instructions that left even Michael and Norman bewildered.
‘What on earth…?’
A sense of foreboding swept over the three.
But none dared to speak. While it was clear something had
transpired between the master and the lady, none of them
could guess what it might have been.
As Cardale left the bedroom, Norman and Michael followed
him.
“The letter?”
“Here it is.”
Breaking the seal, Cardale quickly scanned its contents, a
smirk twisting his lips.
“So, the emperor chose his son.”
It was unexpected that he would side with the traitorous
crown prince.
After all his debauchery, it seemed he still cherished the son
of the woman to whom he’d first given his heart.
“How foolish. If he had chosen his daughter, he wouldn’t
have to lose either of his children.”
Cardale sneered. For him, it was all the better.
“Will you go to the palace?”
“Yes.”
He was more than willing to send off the Princess.
She would never set foot on Imperial soil again.

Elise regained consciousness not long after Cardale left the
estate.
As she blinked, a familiar ceiling came into focus, and her
vision slowly cleared, her scattered thoughts gathering.
“Are you alright, miss?”
Linda’s face appeared unexpectedly close. Elise exhaled,
her hands clenched tightly beneath the blanket.
‘They haven’t sent me to the authorities yet.’
It seemed she had been brought temporarily to the duke’s
manor because she’d fainted. Though she had escaped the
immediate danger, her body still trembled with anxiety.
“Would you like help sitting up?”
Elise nodded, allowing Linda to assist her as she sat back
against the bed.
Somehow, she’d been dressed in fresh nightwear, replacing
her worn clothes.
“Um…”
As she looked around the room, she noticed another figure
besides Linda and recognized a familiar face.
Her face turned pale.
It was the physician.
He had examined her after her first night with Cardale and
had attended to her several times since.
It seemed he was about to leave, a bag in hand.
‘Did he realize?’
‘That I’m carrying the duke’s child?’
Elise gripped the sheet tightly, her heart racing, her eyes
darting to gauge the physician’s expression.
But his face was as calm as always, with no visible reaction.
‘Maybe he hasn’t noticed yet.’
Just as she began to feel a small sense of relief, patting her
chest, she overheard the physician speaking to Linda.
“Make sure she eats something first and gets some rest.”
“I’ll see to it.”
Her heart sank at their words.
‘What should I do? The smell of food might make me gag
uncontrollably…’
If that happened, the pregnancy she had tried so hard to
hide would surely be discovered.
As fear washed over her, Elise watched the two exchange a
subtle glance.
“Well, then, I’ll be going. If you need anything, don’t
hesitate to call for me.”
With a polite bow, the physician left the room, leaving only
Elise and Linda behind.
Elise bit the inside of her lip, swallowing her anxiety. She felt
Linda’s gaze on her, but she couldn’t bring herself to
respond.
“Miss Elise.”
It was then that Linda approached the bed, speaking gently.
“L-Linda.”
Her voice faltered, as if she were guilty of a crime. Her
hands clenched the sheets tightly.
Holding her breath, she waited, unsure what Linda might
say.
“Do you happen to remember when your last cycle was?”

Elise’s eyes shook with fear. Linda’s question about her
cycle made it clear what she might be suspecting.
At the same time, it hinted that Linda wasn’t entirely
certain. The signs were still early; nothing in her body
betrayed her condition yet.
‘Besides, the Duke… he drank his contraceptive tea. She
was sure of it.’
Gathering strength in her trembling lips, Elise replied, “My
cycle ended a few days ago.”
“Ah, I see.”
A mix of sympathy, concern, and a slight relief flickered
across Linda’s face.
“I asked because your cycle seemed delayed, and I was
worried, knowing you’ve been through so much lately. I
imagine the sudden return of it was difficult to manage on
your own.”
“I was alright; I had a place to stay,” Elise replied, curling
her shaking fingers inward to hide them, hoping Linda
wouldn’t notice her nervousness.
Linda offered a gentle apology. 
“I’m sorry, Miss Elise. I failed to protect you, and it put you
in harm’s way.”
“No,” Elise quickly shook her head. “No one could have
anticipated what happened.”
A warm smile touched Linda’s lips. Her voice softened as
she offered, “I’ll prepare something for you to eat. Is there
anything in particular you’d like?”
Elise perked up at this. If she could choose her food,
perhaps she could keep her nausea hidden. Quickly, she
listed a few simple items: soft bread and some fruit.
Linda listened carefully and nodded. “I’ll prepare that and
add something nourishing for your strength.”
“Oh—no, that’s not necessary!” Elise raised her voice
without realizing it, and Linda’s curious look made her
hastily add, “My stomach hasn’t been well… it’s hard to
digest rich food.”
Elise’s unpracticed lie hung awkwardly in the air, but Linda
didn’t press further.
“I understand, Miss Elise.”
Soon, the meal was prepared.
With Linda’s help, Elise ate. It was her first proper meal in
days.
The warmth of the steaming soup and soft bread eased the
hollow ache in her stomach, and a drowsiness crept over
her, heavy and inevitable.
Linda noticed Elise’s fatigue and gently urged her to rest.
“Once you wake, you’ll feel much better.”
Though it was still early, Elise lay back in bed. Her eyelids
grew heavier, her last thoughts wandering to Cardale.
Where was he?
Though she hadn’t asked directly, she’d been curious since
she’d woken up in the estate, without sight or news of him.
As if sensing her unspoken question, Linda said softly, “The
Duke has gone out on urgent business. He won’t return until
dawn, so rest well without worry.”
‘That’s why I haven’t seen him…’
Elise’s eyes finally closed.
A brief, troubling thought flickered through her mind—was it
possible he’d gone to the authorities? But it faded quickly as
she drifted deeply into sleep.

In her dream, Elise found herself wandering aimlessly when
she suddenly paused at a sound.
Someone was crying.
It was a mournful sobbing that tugged painfully at her heart.
She walked toward the sound, and at the end of the path,
she saw a woman—a small figure clutching a tiny baby’s
garment, weeping.
The sight stirred something deep within Elise, and sorrow
surged through her.
“Why… why are you crying?” she asked softly.
The woman, sniffling, managed a strained response.
“The baby… is gone…”
“Gone?”
“Gone to heaven.”
The woman held the small garment close, as though it were
a real child, her head bowed.
Tears fell one by one onto the tiny fabric, soaking it.
“This world must have been too harsh, too difficult…”
Elise pressed a hand to her chest. The woman’s anguish was
so vivid, so piercing, it felt as if she were feeling it herself.
Tears streamed from Elise’s eyes.
“I should be happy that they’ve gone to a better place… so
why does my heart ache so terribly?”
The woman lifted her head.
Through her tear-blurred vision, Elise could make out the
woman’s face—and her eyes widened in shock.
“Mother?”
At that moment, a memory long buried resurfaced.
Once, when she was very young, she had seen her mother
cry like this.
“My poor baby…”
It was the first and last time her mother had ever spoken of
the brother who had died as a newborn.
Despite her young age, the memory had etched itself
deeply into Elise’s mind, a memory that would have
remained forgotten if not for this dream.
Elise knelt before the grieving woman and wrapped her
arms around her.
“Please, don’t cry, Mother…”
She could feel her mother’s frail, slender frame, and the
pain in her chest grew sharper. Another tear slipped down
her cheek as she clung to her mother.
“…My child.”
The familiar voice startled her, and she pulled back, eyes
wide.
The woman’s face…
The woman she’d thought was her mother was herself.
It was like looking into a mirror as the woman—her
doppelgänger—sobbed, clutching her chest.
“I wanted to protect you, to give up everything if I had to…”
Why, why couldn’t I save you?
She wanted to ask, but her voice failed her, her lips moving
soundlessly like a fish out of water.
But the woman seemed to understand, lifting her head to
look at her. Her red, tear-filled eyes were deeply sorrowful,
and she stared at Elise in silence.
As Elise gazed back, a horrifying realization struck her.
“No…”
A shuddering gasp escaped her, and she shook her head,
refusing the thought. She struggled, denying what she’d
seen.
The Duke doesn’t want my child.
But the truth was too close, too stark, to ignore.
The ground beneath her crumbled. Her world was
shattering. Elise screamed as she plummeted into the
darkness.

With a strangled gasp, Elise awoke.
It had been a nightmare. Her entire body was drenched in a
cold sweat. She tried to steady her breathing, but her heart
continued to race, and nausea churned in her stomach.
Shaking, she dragged herself to the closed window and
opened it, letting the cool breeze of the late afternoon
sunlight wash over her.
But it wasn’t enough. The room, once her haven, now felt
stifling.
‘A walk… a walk will help.’
Wiping the sweat from her brow with her sleeve, she moved
to the door and opened it.
“What are you doing, miss?”
The guards posted outside responded immediately to her
appearance.
‘Something feels different.’
The guards had always been present, but their demeanor
seemed more rigid than usual. Despite her confusion, Elise
spoke cautiously.
“I just wanted to take a brief walk…”
“That won’t be possible.”
Before she could finish, one of the guards cut her off.
“We have strict orders from His Grace that you are not to
leave the bedroom.”
Elise’s face turned pale.
“Miss Elise.”
Linda, returning from an errand, noticed the tension and
hurried over.
“There’s no need to worry too much. This is just a
precaution for your safety. You’ll only need to stay in the
bedroom for a short while,” Linda reassured her.
“Not even a short walk…?” Elise asked, her voice tinged
with desperation.
Linda’s expression showed a flicker of hesitation, but she
quickly composed herself and spoke soothingly.
“It may be a bit unsafe outside, just for now. Once His Grace
returns, I’m sure…”
Linda’s words trailed off, no longer reaching Elise, who stood
there, dazed and silent.
“Are you alright, miss?”
Linda’s voice pulled her back, and Elise nodded hurriedly.
“Y-yes. I’ll… I’ll go back inside now.”
Returning to the bedroom, Elise shut the door behind her,
trembling as she stared at it.
‘The Duke… is keeping me here…’
The old fear, once planted by Raymond’s captivity,
resurfaced in her mind.
Though the door wasn’t locked, the fact that she couldn’t
leave filled her with dread.
She was terrified.
Her body shook uncontrollably, and she wrapped her arms
around herself, but the tremors wouldn’t stop.
Thoughts raced through her mind, a torrent of dark
possibilities.

“If you want to live, you’d better listen.”
“Do you think you’re any different?”
Not knowing what he had decided for her left a gnawing fear
in her heart.

As afternoon faded to dusk, then to the deep black of night,
her terror grew, filling her with an unbearable sense of
suffocation.
And in the dark hours of the night, her mind made a choice
for the sake of the life she carried.

‘My baby…’
In the pitch-black night, Elise made her decision. She would
escape, using the terrace as her way out.
The Duke of Vassenberg’s chambers were on the mansion’s
expansive first floor, connected to the back garden by a
terrace.
Of course, this area was guarded as well. However, Elise,
after spending so many nights with Cardale, had learned the
guards’ rotation times.
She knew she had to use that moment to escape.
As she left the window slightly ajar, biting her lip with
anxious anticipation, time seemed to crawl unbearably
slowly.
Finally, after what felt like an eternity, she heard the change
of guards outside.
‘Now’s my chance…!’
She threw the ink bottle she’d been holding with all her
might.
Crash!
The glass shattered against the ground, its sharp sound
ringing out.
The guards rushed in that direction, and as soon as they
moved away, Elise slipped through the terrace doors and
out into the night.
Closing the door behind her as if nothing had happened, she
quickly hid in the shadowed garden.
The main gate was heavily guarded, so her only option was
the servants’ exit in the back, which led to a path through
the woods used for hunting.
The thought of fleeing into those dark woods made her
uneasy, but she reassured herself.
‘You can do this. You’ve escaped from Raymond before; you
can escape again.’
The experience of successfully fleeing once gave her
courage. 
‘If I’m lucky, I might be able to slip out unnoticed with the
other servants…’
But in her fear and haste, Elise didn’t consider that her
distinctive appearance would immediately reveal her
identity as the Duke’s mistress to anyone she encountered.
‘Goddess of Fortune, please smile upon me.’
She prayed fervently as she walked swiftly through the
garden’s shadows.
“Woof! Woof!”
“Ahh…!”
Suddenly, a fierce barking broke the silence, and Elise cried
out, collapsing onto the ground in fright.
“Woof! Woof!”
A pair of glowing yellow eyes cut through the darkness,
staring at her. Her breath caught in her throat as she
recognized the creature.
‘A wolfhound!’
She remembered vividly how it had snarled at her the first
night she’d arrived, looking at her as nothing more than
prey. Her body froze on instinct.
Since that night, she hadn’t seen the beast, and she
wondered how it had found her now.
“Woof! Woof! Woof!”
But then, Elise noticed something different from before—the
wolfhound only barked and stayed at a distance, not coming
closer.
Though she didn’t know why, she slowly got to her feet,
taking a few cautious steps backward. The beast didn’t
follow.
Swallowing hard, she turned and began to run.
Just as she picked up speed—
‘…!’
Suddenly, her vision went dark.
Not entirely—it had been dim, with only moonlight to guide
her—but this wasn’t that kind of darkness. She realized with
a chill that something was blocking her way.
The moment she became aware, a shiver ran down her
spine, from her neck to her toes.
No, it couldn’t be. Linda had said he would return by dawn…
But her body reacted before her mind fully processed it.
Her thoughts scattered as fear took over, her grip on her
skirt turning her knuckles white.
Elise trembled uncontrollably, like an animal caught in a
predator’s gaze, unable to look up or down, knowing that
even the slightest movement would bring her face
dangerously close to him.
But her feeble resistance was easily crushed with a single
motion from him.
“Out at such a late hour, are we…?”
“Huh…!”
Her chin was caught and lifted, and even in the darkness,
his blood-red eyes blazed like fire.
“What exactly are you doing here?”
He sneered, his smile cold.

Elise was dragged back to the bedroom, her wrist firmly
grasped in Cardale’s iron grip.
“My lord…!” 
Michael exclaimed in shock, the other servants who had
been woken up looking on in stunned silence.
But the Duke, lost in fury, paid no attention to anyone
around him.
“Ow…”
Elise swallowed her cry of pain, terrified. Her wrist ached in
his grip, and her legs barely held her up. She tried to keep
pace, but her weakened legs failed to match his stride,
causing her to stumble several times.
Her shoes slipped off somewhere along the way, but he
ignored her struggle.
Bang!
The bedroom door was thrown open, and she was shoved
onto the bed, her face pressing into the sheets.
“Ah!”
“You’re quite convincing, pretending to be so weak. Almost
had me fooled. But planning an escape? Seems you’ve been
perfectly fine.”
As she tried to lift herself, his hand pressed heavily on the
back of her neck.
Rip—the sound of fabric tearing hit her ears, and cold air
touched her back before she could react. The shock
snapped her to full attention.
She thrashed helplessly, her thin arms flailing in resistance,
but it was useless.
He only gripped her thigh harder, mocking her futile
struggle.
“Your Grace…!”
Desperation clawed at her voice as she called his name.
‘Please… please, just wait…’ But his hands only ventured
deeper, ignoring her plea.
‘No, the baby…!’
She knew that intimacy during early pregnancy could be
dangerous.
Terrified of losing the child, she blindly reached back,
grabbing his wrist.
Finally, he paused.
“Take your hands off me.”
His voice was icily cold, colder than she’d ever heard. But he
loosened his grip slightly.
Seizing the chance, Elise quickly sat up and knelt, her head
bowed.
“Have you forgotten your place again?”
“No, it’s not that…” She shook her head frantically, meeting
his eyes despite her fear of his blazing, furious gaze. She
forced herself to think only of the child.
This small, helpless life that desperately needed its
mother’s protection.
“I’ll… I’ll use my hands… or my mouth…” she stammered.

“You said… you said you liked it when I did that.”
She pleaded, hoping she could persuade him, hoping he
wouldn’t notice her secret.
But her urgency, her desperation, stirred something
unfamiliar within him, and he sensed something off about
her.
Cardale hadn’t missed the strange unease surrounding Elise
from the moment he found her.
Her absurd plea to let her go, her terror of him, her sudden
attempt to escape…
And now…
His gaze dropped instinctively to her hand resting
protectively over her stomach.
As realization dawned, a slow, triumphant gleam filled his
eyes.
It was the gaze of a hunter who had finally, completely,
ensnared his prey, ensuring it could never escape.
With a twisted smile, he looked down at her. His sinister grin
made her bright, round blue eyes tremble.
Keeping his gaze fixed on her, he spoke at last.
“You’re carrying a child.”
The blood drained from Elise’s face. Her lips moved
soundlessly, her mouth opening and closing in shock.
“N-no…”
Her voice trembled, the denial slipping out, but it was too
late. Her response only deepened his anger.
It was remarkable, even admirable, that her frail body had
managed to bear his child. But she had hidden the
pregnancy from him, and she had tried to escape with his
seed still within her.
A clear betrayal, an undeniable deception.
“So predictable.”
His words came out like a sharpened blade.
“It’s not uncommon for a mistress to run off to secretly give
birth. Many then use the child to demand money.”
Her eyes widened, shaking as they met his.
“Was that your plan too?”
Her gentle eyes twisted in pain.
Even though he knew she was hurt by his accusation and
doubted she would truly do such a thing, Cardale mocked
her nonetheless.
“No, no, it wasn’t…”
“Oh, really? Then why were you trying to leave? Hiding the
fact that you’re carrying my child?”
He expected her to react like a frightened deer, promising to
never attempt such a thing again.
What Cardale failed to anticipate was that the trials she’d
endured while carrying their child had left her emotions
dangerously unstable.
Tears welled up under her wide blue eyes.
She felt betrayed. She wasn’t the only one who had hidden
something, but she hadn’t wanted to resent him. All she
wanted was to protect her baby…
With a soft sob, the emotions she’d held back, buried and
denied, finally spilled over.
“Your Grace… you deceived me too."

Cardale’s brow twitched.
“What?”
The words Elise had buried deep inside, those she had never
thought she’d utter, now poured out in a rush, as if they had
been waiting all this time.
“You said you would bring my mother back. You promised
you’d rescue her, that she was safe and well…!”
Her small voice grew louder, though only slightly above a
whisper.
“I trusted you. I believed in the promises you made… but it
was all a lie…”
She hadn’t wanted to believe Raymond Hartmann’s words…
but he had been right.
At the mention of Raymond’s words, a savage glint sparked
in Cardale’s eyes.
‘Daring to speak of him in front of me?’
Elise’s words, though said in grief, struck Cardale as
something far worse. To him, it sounded like she regretted
not choosing Raymond over him.
‘No matter how well I treat her, what I get in return is
nothing but foul, disgusting betrayal.’
A voice from his past, similar to his own but rougher and
heavier, echoed in his mind like the tolling of a clock.
He knew all too well how futile it was to believe in anyone’s
loyalty, how meaningless it was to open himself up. Even
though he’d seen how Elise was inept at hiding her feelings,
how transparent and sincere she seemed to be when she
smiled…
Feelings were never permanent; Elise would inevitably
change as well.
And as he had foreseen, Elise Schuvan had ultimately
betrayed him.
The world was, as always, moving exactly as he had
predicted.
Then why did he feel so filthy, so consumed by rage?
Cardale couldn’t understand it.
It was this bewildering anger that drove him to shatter his
carefully maintained composure, his reasoning obliterated
by his own hand.
Enraged, he grew terrifyingly calm, his face drained of any
warmth or expression.
“A promise?”
His cold, mocking tone cut through her heart like a blade.
“How laughable. Who do you think you are that I would
make promises to you?”
His merciless words struck Elise’s heart.
Her wide, blue eyes filled with disbelief. The small heart that
had clung so desperately to life quivered, pierced by his
cruelty.
With tears glistening in her eyes, Elise looked up at Cardale,
her lips trembling.
“Then why…?”
‘Why did you say those things to me?’
Cardale’s lip twisted into a crooked smile as he read her
unspoken question, and she clenched her skirt tightly.
“Because it amused me.”
His cruel sneer fell upon her like a thousand blades.
Tears streamed from Elise’s eyes, yet he didn’t stop.
“It was funny, watching you cling so pathetically, crawling
on your knees out of fear of being cast aside.”
Her vision blurred with each tear, obscuring everything in
front of her.
She clutched her chest, the agony in her heart was raw as if
a blade twisted deeper with each of his words.
“Your Grace… you’re… truly a cruel man…”
Despite the unbearable pain, her only reproach was a small,
trembling whisper.
Though she felt utterly shattered and consumed by sorrow,
her self-blame emerged once again, cutting into herself with
sharp regret.
‘I knew…’
She had known from the start how little she meant to him,
the lack of worth she held in his eyes.
An obedient toy, a doll that followed his commands.
She could no longer pretend otherwise—not when everyone
around her had warned her of the truth, from Fritz to
Raymond.
But why did it still hurt so much? Why did she feel so sad,
why did she cry?
Once more, the question that had haunted her, which she
had never been able to answer, rose to the surface.
‘Ah…’
In a brief, lightning-quick revelation, clarity struck her.
‘I… loved him.’
Her breath caught, and she shook her head in denial.
She knew well that tragedy often sprouted from
unreasonable expectations, from futile hopes and misplaced
desires.
Just like her mother…
Drawn to a bright flame, only to be consumed without
realizing it.
‘I loved him…’
Her own foolishness, the sin of harboring feelings she should
never have had, had cost her her mother. This was all her
fault.
“I’m sorry, I’m so sorry…”
Clutching her chest, Elise wept.
Cardale looked down at the sobbing woman, unmoved.
She was a woman who cried at the slightest hint of pain.
Such cheap tears had no value to him.
He ignored the heaviness that stirred in his chest.
Then, in the midst of her anguish, she whispered to herself,
barely audibly.
“I should have… asked him for help when he offered…”
Her voice was almost too faint to hear amidst her sobs.
But Cardale, attuned to every sound she made, didn’t miss
it.
‘Help? From whom? Raymond Hartmann?’
He reacted instantly.
Lowering himself, he grabbed Elise’s chin, forcing her face
up to meet his gaze.
He didn’t care that her face was soaked in tears. All restraint
abandoned, he threatened her without mercy.
“You’ve heard of your mother’s death, but have you not
heard the fate of your family?”
When her blue eyes widened with alarm, he sneered bitterly.
‘Of course not.’
He could imagine all too well the lies that cunning fox
Raymond might have whispered to her.
Fine. He would gladly use the seeds of doubt Raymond had
planted.
The cruelty he had unconsciously hidden from her until now
finally surfaced.
“Seems you still don’t understand your position.”
He tapped her tear-stained cheek with his finger. The feel of
her wet skin clinging to his touch pleased him.
“You know well enough what happens to a woman of a
traitor’s blood, don’t you?”
He lowered his gaze to her stomach.
A leash to keep her bound to him, taking the place of her
deceased mother.
“Born from a slave, your child will be sold off the moment
he’s born.”
As soon as the words left his mouth, Elise gasped. Her face
turned white, drained of color.
Her mouth opened and closed in shock before she managed
to whisper a single, desperate plea.
“But… he’s your child…”
But Cardale had anticipated this response. His tone was cold
and unfeeling.
“Why should I believe that?”
She looked stunned, her face paling further.
“H-how could you… how could you say such a thing…”
Her slender body trembled, as though it couldn’t bear the
weight of his words. Cardale intentionally chose even
crueler words.
“You were hardly a pure lady.”
The jab at her circumstances—the very reason she had been
sold to him—drove fresh tears from her clear, lake-like eyes.
For a brief moment, Cardale felt his heart pounding
erratically, harder than usual.
But he brushed it off, attributing the sensation to the
pleasure of finally shattering Elise Schwan completely, of
fulfilling his long-held desire to break her.
“You know I… I’ve never…”
“Really? Because I don’t know.”
“Please, Your Grace, please don’t…”
Her words faltered as she clutched at her chest, as if trying
to hold her breaking heart together.
“Please… this child is yours…”
His heart thudded even harder in response to her despair.
But once again, Cardale ignored the sensation.
“That depends on you.”
And he reverted to his usual methods.
Cornering his prey, inciting her fear, and tightening his grip
on her.
“Tell me what I want to hear.”
Elise blinked, her teary eyes widening. Each blink shed a
fresh tear.
“I… I…”
Her desperate look, so piteous and helpless, stirred
something in him. He added one final blow.
“This is your last chance.”
The message was clear enough for her to understand.
As he expected, Elise knelt before him, looking up with
trembling hands as she reached out to him.
Yes. This was what she should have done from the
beginning.
There had been no need for tenderness or persuasion. He
shouldn’t have tried to feign kindness. He should have
stamped down her pride from the start, made her accept
her place.
‘Beg for me, Elise.’
‘All you can do is beg.’
“S-save me…”
At last, the woman he had forced to the very edge, the one
he had dragged down into the dirt, surrendered completely,
begging for mercy. Tears streamed freely down her cheeks.
“Please… save me, my lord…”
With an air of false compassion, Cardale lifted her chin and
pressed a kiss to her tear-streaked lips. Her soft, trembling
lips were sickeningly sweet.
In that moment, he failed to notice the light dimming in
Elise’s eyes, blurred by tears, as the last glimmer of hope
quietly extinguished.

Cardale left the bedchamber.
Standing by the door, the head maid Linda waited with a
troubled expression, accompanied by Michael. As he passed
them, Cardale spoke indifferently.
“It appears the physician was unaware of her pregnancy.”
Surprise and realization crossed Linda’s face. She quickly
bowed her head in apology.
“I’m sorry, my lord. We had a hint of the possibility, but it
was too early to be certain.”
Linda refrained from mentioning Elise’s lie about her
monthly cycle. She knew Elise had been caught trying to
escape and dragged back into the bedchamber by the Duke
himself. She could only imagine how severe the situation
must have been and how Elise might have been treated in
his anger.
Finishing her explanation, Linda held her breath, awaiting
his reaction. Fortunately, Cardale refrained from further
questioning and gave a quiet command.
“Settle her and put her to sleep.”
“Yes, my lord.”
Once Linda entered the room, Cardale turned away, with
Michael trailing silently behind him. Their footsteps echoed
through the quiet corridor until Cardale halted abruptly.
“Meet me in the study.”
Michael hesitated briefly before bowing and departing
ahead.
Left alone, Cardale straightened his posture and lifted his
gaze, meeting the eyes of his father’s portrait. He
addressed the silent figure calmly.
“It seems I, too, am undeniably a Vassenberg.”
Memories long buried surfaced clearly in his mind.

The boy, who had matured too early in a life of neglect and
cruelty, was no longer young, yet he couldn’t comprehend
his parents’ relationship.
Why did his father keep his mother close, only to drive her
to near madness without ever forgiving her? Why did the
Duchess, who despised her husband, refuse to leave?
So one day, Cardale had asked—not his mother, but his
father, as he saw himself more in his father than in her.
With an unreadable expression, the duke regarded his son,
his mirror image, before he finally spoke.
“Because once someone has betrayed you, they’ll betray
you again.”
The boy frowned. His father’s words seemed inconsistent
with his actions.
“Then why don’t you just let her go?”
“Let her go?”
Before his question was even finished, the Duke’s face
contorted with rage.
“Give what’s mine to someone else?”
The crimson eyes, identical to Cardale’s, glimmered with
fierce possessiveness.
“Better to break it myself, so that no one else will ever want
it. So that Victoria understands she has no one but me.”
And indeed, the duke had broken his wife, leaving her only a
single escape—her title as Duchess of Vassenberg and the
immense wealth of the duchy.
Knowing that Victoria would never abandon such privileges
and that she desired, above all, to remain a Vassenberg
until her death. He had laid a calculated trap.
“When you desire something…”
The duke leaned close, his mad gaze gleaming as he
whispered into his son’s ear, his voice chillingly intent.
“Exploit its weakness and destroy it completely. That’s the
only way to ensure your safety.”

Cardale had only learned one valuable lesson from his
father’s life.
And so, when he decided to make Elise Schuvan his own, he
applied that lesson exactly as he’d been taught.
It had been effortless to uncover the delicate prey’s deepest
vulnerability, and even easier to use it.
That was why he had taken control of Marissa’s fate, using
her health, her very life, to bind Elise to him.
When he first found her and brought her back to the
mansion earlier, he had planned to tell her about Marissa’s
survival, using it as a leash.
But now, with this new revelation, his plans had changed.
Elise’s child would become her ultimate weakness. A cruel
smile spread across his lips as he decided to wield this
weakness over the woman who had dared betray him.
Yes, even if she became a bit broken, it doesn’t matter.
Even if she was half-shattered and wounded, she would still
be his Elise—and that would be enough to satisfy him.
The face of a woman broken and vulnerable was still
beautiful.
Imagining Elise utterly helpless, leaning on him, made his
blood stir with excitement. Like this, she would never
escape him; she would breathe only in his presence. The
woman whose very tears tasted sweet would remain
completely his.
For a moment, his eyes softened with pleasure, then
returned to their usual hardness.
Cardale broke his gaze from his father’s portrait and turned
away, dismissing the faint echo of Elise’s sorrowful cries
that lingered in his mind.

Theresia couldn’t fathom the whirlwind of events unraveling
around her.
When the Emperor had confronted her after her efforts to
reclaim her position as heir were exposed, she hadn’t
expected things to escalate so quickly.
She hadn’t even had time to respond. Soldiers arrived at her
chambers, forcing her to sign a marriage contract.
“You want me to sign a marriage contract? Ridiculous! Why
should I…”
“The Emperor has commanded that you shall not leave until
you sign.”
“What?!”
Theresia tried to appeal to the Emperor, but no response
came. Not even her personal guard, Dietrich Klein, was
allowed to see her.
‘I need my allies back.’
Theresia finally signed the contract, hoping to regain her
freedom to act. But no sooner had she signed than the next
morning, a carriage awaited her outside her palace.
Royal guards, clad in their splendid armor, informed her of
her impending journey to the Kingdom of Roshild.
“This is preposterous…!”
Her outbursts were swiftly quelled by the soldiers’ firm grip,
and she was forcibly placed inside the luxurious carriage,
the door locked behind her.
“Let me out! Open this door immediately!”
Her high-pitched cries echoed within the sealed carriage,
with only muffled responses from the guards outside.
“Dietrich! Dietrich!”
After desperately calling for her missing guard, she
collapsed in her seat, defeated.
The truth hit her hard.
Her father, the Emperor, had chosen her brother over her.
Not only that, but she was being sent to a foreign land
under the guise of an alliance—a silencing exile.
‘Was that bastard son really worth so much? Enough to
erase his crimes?’
Theresia’s hollow laugh echoed within the carriage, mingling
with her bitter self-reproach.
The carriage traveled through the night and arrived at the
port by morning. The salty sea air seeped through the
cracks, and she knew her fate was sealed.
Her handmaidens had likely deserted her the moment her
fate was determined. After all, their loyalty had always been
one of convenience.
But…
Grasping the fabric of her dress, she thought of her loyal
guard and the vows he had made to her.
At that moment, the carriage door unlocked.
Squinting against the sudden light, she was startled to see
the man standing outside.
“How… How did you…?”
“Perhaps the Princess didn’t know,” Cardale replied
smoothly, “but His Majesty assigned me as your escort until
your departure.”
Realization dawned, and her expression twisted in rage.
“You vile fiend! When I return, I’ll ensure you…!”
“With what resources?”
He tilted his head mockingly.
“If you’re relying on Raymond Hartmann, you’d better forget
it. He won’t leave his territory again.”
She clenched her jaw, glaring at him with seething hatred.
“Thanks to your meddling, Hartmann has learned far too
much. The Emperor had no choice but to act.”
Stripped of the Emperor’s favor, Hartmann faced an
impossible decision—watch his house decline or appoint a
new, politically neutered heir.
Theresia was sure of his choice, her hand clenching into a
fist.
‘All this… for the sake of that bastard-born mistress?’
But Hartmann’s fate was no concern of her’s; her priority
was herself.
The noble princess, humiliated by a common-born mistress,
forced into an ignominious marriage.
Her anger, frustration, and searing resentment crystallized
into a burning desire for revenge.
Her target stood right in front of her: the proud and arrogant
Duke Cardale Bassenberg.
“You found Elise Schuvan, didn’t you?”
She didn’t miss the subtle flicker in his eyes.
“Perhaps you got lucky this time, but how long do you think
she’ll last at your side?”
She spat her final barbed words, her last act of defiance.
“I guarantee she’ll either run or be broken—like all the prey
you’ve hunted.”
She took satisfaction in her spiteful words, but her
smugness was short-lived.
“What of it?” he replied, disarmingly calm. His expression
was so unaffected that it almost seemed gentle.
But his next words chilled her to the core.
“I’ll just preserve her—while she’s still alive.”
“What…?”
For a moment, she faltered, taken aback by the horrifying
ease in his voice.
“You know how my mother lived, don’t you? You two were
close.”
His matter-of-fact tone drained her defiance.
“Utterly monstrous.”
As the horn sounded, signaling the ship’s departure, Cardale
offered his final, polite farewell.
“From here on, others will attend to you, Princess.”
Soon after, the ship carrying the princess set sail from the
Empire, bound for a distant land.
A few days later, extraordinary news spread throughout the
Empire.
A fierce storm had struck the ship destined for the Kingdom
of Roshild.
Although the ship avoided capsizing and most passengers
survived, there were, unfortunately, a few casualties.
Theresia, the Emperor’s daughter, was among the unlucky
few.


----

Continue in part 4!!
